Diyaloglar ile İngilizce Tematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 
TEMA	
YOLDA
	Clara: Excuse me, I am new in the city. How can I go to University of London? 
John: University of London is on Malet Street. 
Clara: Is it far? 
Clara: No, it is close. You can walk there. It takes about 15 minutes. 
Clara: OK. How can I get to Malet Street? 
John: It’s easy. Go straight ahead up to the crossroads on this Street. Turn left at the crossroads and then walk about 500 m until you reach Palace Street. Go past the street and turn right to Longmoore Street. Go. Straight ahead and you will see a park on your right. Turn right at the traffic lights. Go through Vincent Street and turn left at the crossroads to Malet Street. University of London is there.  
Clara: OK… Straight ahead, left at the crossroads, straight to Palace Street, then left. Turn right at the lights and… I am confused.  
John: Then let’s go there together. Come with me! 
Clara: Are you a student? 
John: Yes. 
Clara: What is your department? 
John: English Literature. 
Clara: Today is my first day at the university. I am studying English. 
John: Good. Do you know the campus well? 
Clara: Not yet. How do I get to my building? 
John: You can walk there, too. This road leads to the campus. The Department of English is in the School of Foreign Languages, in building C12.   
Clara: Thanks a lot for your help! 
John: You’re welcome. What’s your name? 
Clara: I’m Clara. What’s your name? 
John: I’m John.  
Clara: Where are you from, John? 
John: I’m from here. And you? 
Clara: I’m from Cambridge. Where do you live here? 
John: I stay in a dorm on Keppel Street. What about you? 
Clara: I live in a flat on Museum Street. 
John: How old are you? 
Clara: I’m 18. And you? 
John: I’m 20. We’re here! 
Clara: Shall we have a coffee after class? 
John: Sure! I’ll give you a call after class. What’s your number? 
Clara: Great! My number is 2071484567. 
John: I’ll call you. See you! 
Clara: See you!

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	Jane: Hello.
John: Hi, Clara.
Jane: Excuse me, who is this?
John: This is John. Who am I talking to?
Jane: This is Jane Feathers.
John: Isn’t this 555 006 7192?
Jane: No, this is 555 006 7182
John: Oh! I’m sorry. It’s the wrong number.
Jane: No problem, goodbye!
Clara: Hello!
John: Clara?
Clara: Yes, this is Clara.
John: Hi, Clara. This is John.
Clara: Hey John! How are you?
John: I am fine, thank you. How are you?
Clara: I’m fine too.
John: Do you have time today? 
Clara: Yes, I do.
John: Will you come to the café with me?
Clara: That sounds great! What time?
John: Half past one. Is that good for you?
Clara: Oh, I have a class at that time. My class ends at three. Does three o'clock suit you? 
John: Yes, it does. See you at three then.
Clara: See you!

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
Bir cafe ortamında
	Clara: Hello everyone!
John: Hi! How are you?
Clara: Thanks, I'm fine. And you?
John: I'm fine too. This is my friend Clara. She is from Cambridge. 
Lucy: Hello Clara. I am Lucy. I'm from Manchester.
Nick: Hi, Clara. I'm Nick. I am from Derby.
Clara: Nice to meet you.
Nick: How old are you, Clara?
Clara: I'm eighteen. And you?
Nick: Nineteen. But Lucy is twenty.
John: I am older than you. I was born on December 20, 2002. I'm twenty years old.
Clara: Then your zodiac sign is Sagittarius.
John: Exactly. And what is your sign?
Clara: My sign is Aries. I was born in April.
Lucy: Good, I'm a Pisces. I was born in March. So Clara, which department are you studying in?
Clara: I'm studying English Language Teaching. I just enrolled. You?
Lucy: I'm studying at the Faculty of Medicine.
Clara: What semester are you in?
Lucy: Second. And you?
Nick: It's my second semester in the Linguistics Department.
Clara: I am in my first semester.
Nick: Clara, what do you think about the English Language Teaching Department in London?
Clara: My classmates are good; the environment is very nice... It is good to study here.
John: Oh my God! I'm so late, sorry, I have class at 14.00.
Clara: Bye!
John: See you!

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	Clara: Excuse me, where are the potatoes? 
Seller: Over there, in the front, in the vegetable section. 
Clara: I looked there but I couldn't see them.
Seller: In front on the right, right at the entrance. 
Clara: Thanks, let me look again. 
Clara: Oh, John, what a nice coincidence!
John: Yes.
Clara: I need to shop urgently. My fridge is empty. 
John: I want to buy fresh fruit and vegetables. Is there anything on sale right now? 
Clara: Apples are on sale. Fuji apples. £1.80 a kilo. 
John: Good, one kilo please! Is there any spinach?
Clara: It’s over there, next to the onions.
John: Thank you very much!
Clara: And did you get everything you wanted?
John: I need a liter of milk, a can of coke and a bottle of water. 
Clara: They are in the drinks aisle.
John: Thank you.
Clara: Are you all set? 
John: Yes, thank you, that's all. Do you need anything? 
Clara: Hmm. What do I need? Let me check my shopping list. I need a kilo of rice, a bunch of parsley, 250 grams of cheese, 100 grams of salami and a jar of honey. 
John: What kind of salami do you want? 
Clara: Turkey salami. 
John: Salami is next to meat products, rice is next to grains, cheese is in the cheese aisle and parsley is next to vegetables and fruits. Look. Honey is in the sale section. Do you need anything else?
Clara: No, that's all. Now we can go to the checkout. Luckily, there isn’t a long line at the checkout. 
Seller: Do you want a plastic bag?
Clara: No, I have a bag. 
Seller: 12 Pounds 50 for all of them. 
Clara: Here you go. I want to pay by card. 
Seller: Is your card contactless?
Clara: Yes.
Seller: Hold your card to the POS device. 
Seller: Thank you very much. Have a nice day. 
John: Have a nice day!
Seller: Good afternoon, would you like a bag? 
John: Yes, please. 
Seller: 8,75 please. Do you want to pay by card?
John: I would like to pay in cash, please!
Seller: Your change is 1,25.
John: Thank you.
Clara: The shopping bags are very heavy. 
John: I'll help you home. Give me the bags!
Clara: Are you sure?
John: Yes.
Clara: Thanks a lot for your help.

TEMA	
EVDE
	Clara: Welcome. 
John: Thanks for the invitation. Where can I hang my coat?
Clara: In the cupboard here. 
John: Thank you.
Clara: Please sit down, rest.
John: Thank you.
Clara: Would you like to have a drink?
John: I can have a coffee. 
Clara: With or without milk?
John: Without milk.
Clara: OK, I'll get it right away. This is your black coffee and this is my coffee with milk.
John: Oh, thank you. 
Clara: You're welcome!
John: How big is the apartment?
Clara: 80 square metres. 
John: Isn't it too big for you alone? How many rooms does it have? 
Clara: Not at all. This flat is perfect for me. It is very nice and quiet. It has a lounge, two bedrooms and a kitchen. It also has a bathroom and a balcony. 
John: Wow, it's great! How is the location?
Clara: It is very central. There is a bus stop and a shopping centre nearby. 
John: Do you own the flat? 
Clara: No, I pay rent. 
John: Is it expensive?  How much do you pay a month?
Clara: No, it is cheap. The rent is £1500 and the monthly fee is about £80. 
John: It's not expensive and the flat is nice. It is on the 4th floor but there is no lift. That's why it's so cheap. Can I have a look around the flat? 
Clara: Sure!
Clara: This is the corridor. Unfortunately, it's very narrow. There are two rooms here on the right. 
John: The rooms are quite bright.
Clara: Yes, that's right. There's a big living room opposite this one.
John: The living room has a balcony. 
Clara: Yes, but it's not big.
John: Is this the kitchen?
Clara: Yes, the kitchen is useful and has a view of the river.
John: Is this the bathroom?
Clara: Yes, small but bright.
John: Does the house have a garage?
Clara: Yes, each flat in this apartment block has its own garage. 
John: Is the flat well heated?
Clara: Yes, this house is south facing and well insulated.
John: The flat is very nice. It has everything you need.
Clara: Exactly, I am very happy with this flat. 
John: Now it's time to eat. Are you hungry? I know a good restaurant nearby. Shall we have dinner together? 
Clara: I'm starving. My stomach is rumbling. 
John: Come on then, let's go eat!

TEMA	
RESTORANDA
	John: We're finally here. Let's go inside.
Waiter: Good afternoon, welcome to our restaurant. Do you have a reservation? 
John: No, I'm afraid not. Do you have a free table for two? 
Waiter: Yes, no problem. Where would you like to sit? 
John: By the window, please. 
Waiter: Unfortunately, the tables by the window are reserved. 
Clara: OK, a table at the entrance is fine for us. 
Waiter: Wait a minute! Yes, the table at the entrance is still empty. Please come in! Here is the one just round the corner. Is this table suitable? 
John: Yes, it's fine. Can we have the menu?
Waiter: Sure.  Are you ready to order?
John: Yes, a cabbage soup and pepper steak for me.
Waiter: Sure. And you? I recommend ravioli, the dish of the day.
Clara: Then I'll have pumpkin soup and ravioli. 
Waiter: Well, what would you like to drink?
Clara: Coke please!
John: And a tea for me. 
Waiter: Would you like dessert?
Clara: Yes, I would like apple pie.
John: Chocolate pudding for me please.
Waiter: Coming right away. Anything else?  
Clara: No, thank you.
Waiter: Here you go. And here's your food. Enjoy your meal! 
John: Thank you.
Waiter: Is there anything missing?
Clara: Could you bring me another napkin?
John: I would like some more bread.
Waiter: Sure! I'll bring it right away. 
Clara: Thank you.
Waiter: You're welcome. Enjoy your meal!
John: Can we get the bill?
Waiter: Sure! Would you like to pay together or separately?
John: Together, please. 
Waiter: Sure! Will you pay by card?
John: No, we'll pay in cash. 
Waiter: That'll be £50.
John: Here you go, keep the change.
Waiter: Thank you and have a nice day. 
Clara: Goodbye. 
John: Did you like the food? 
Clara: Yes, the food was very tasty. So, what shall we do now? 
John: Actually, I have a good idea. My best friend Nick is getting married today. The wedding is at 8pm in Bristol, and I'm invited. 
Would you like to go to the wedding with me? 
Clara: Sure, I would love to go. But what am I going to wear to the wedding? I need a nice dress.
John: And I need a smart suit.

TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	Clara: How is the red dress in the window?
John: I like it. Try it on!
Shop assistant: How can I help you?
Clara: I want to try on the red dress in the window.
Shop assistant: What size do you wear?
Clara: I am a size 6. 
Shop assistant: Well, come with me! Try this dress on!
Clara: Where can I try it on?
Shop assistant: The fitting rooms are over there. Do you like the dress?
Clara: The colour is OK. But it doesn't fit me. Do you have a size up?
Shop assistant: There's one in a size 38.
Clara: OK, I'll try it on.
Clara: Does the dress fit me?
John: It looks great. 
Clara: I like it too. How much is it?
Shop assistant: It is £ 100.
Clara: It's very stylish. I like the colour. It fits me perfectly. I'll take this one. 
Shop assistant: Do you need anything else?
John: Yes, I'm looking for a suit. Where are the suits? 
Shop assistant: On the second floor. 
John: This suit is stylish but it costs £ 300. It's too much. Maybe I can find something cheaper. Oh, there's a discount there. This suit is very nice. But it won't fit me, it's too tight. Excuse me, do you have this suit one size bigger?
Shop assistant: Try this suit here! 
John: Thank you. This one is OK. 
Shop assistant: Do you need anything else?
John: Do you sell bow ties?
Shop assistant: Of course! Today there is a fifty per cent discount on bow ties and ties. 
John: Hmm, I'll buy a new bow tie for this suit. What colour would suit this one? 
Shop assistant: I think this bow tie will fit perfectly. 
John: I'll take it. 
Shop assistant: Is there anything else you're looking for?
John: No, thank you. 
Shop assistant: Goodbye!

TEMA	
GARDA
	John: We’re over with our shopping. Now we can go to Bristol.
Clara: OK.
John: The railway station is over there. Now let's buy our tickets to Bristol. But where can we buy the tickets?
Clara: We can buy tickets from the ticket office. 
John: Good afternoon, I would like to buy two tickets to Bristol. 
Attendant: One way?
John: Round trip please.
Attendant: When do you want to travel? 
John: We would like to catch the first train. 
Attendant: The first train leaves in fifteen minutes. 
John: That's fine with us.
Attendant: It costs £ 160. Will you pay with a card? 
John: No, I'll pay in cash. Here you go. 
Attendant: Your tickets and £40 change. 
John: Thank you! Is the train going to be late?
Attendant: No, it is going to be on time.
John: Thank you.
Attendant: Bye!
Announcement: Attention, please! The train for Bristol is leaving!
Clara: The train is leaving soon. Let's get on the train. 
John: Let's go and find our seats. 
Clara: These are our seats. 
Announcement: Next Station: Bristol Train Station. 
John: Clara, get up, let's get off here. Now let's find a suitable hotel. Come, let's go to the centre. 
Clara: Oh, look!
Clara: This hotel looks very nice from the outside.
John: This 5-star hotel in the centre of Bristol must have rooms with a nice view. 
Clara: Yes, let's go in.

TEMA	
OTELDE
	Receptionist: Good afternoon, welcome to Bristol Hotel! 
John: Good afternoon, we would like two rooms.
Receptionist: Sure, how many nights are you going to you stay?
John: Only one night.
Receptionist: OK. We have a room. Do you want a double room?
John: No, we want two single rooms.
Receptionist: Is breakfast included? 
John: Yes, it is included. And is there internet in the rooms?
Receptionist: Yes, all rooms have internet, bathroom, telephone, television, fridge and air conditioning. 
John: Well, we’ll take the rooms.
Receptionist: OK, can I have your ID cards?
John: Sure, go ahead. 
Receptionist: Thank you, please fill in this form. Write your name, address, date of birth and nationality.
John: Here you go! 
Receptionist: And sign here!
John: All done.
Receptionist: How would you like to pay?
John: I would like to pay by credit card. Here you go.
Receptionist: Payment received. Here are your keys. Your room numbers are 104 and 105. 
John: Which floor? 
Receptionist: First floor. It's on the right when you get off the lift.  
John: When is breakfast?
Receptionist: Breakfast is in the dining room from 7.00 to 10.00. The dining room is on the ground floor. You can request breakfast in the room. 
John: Thank you. Can I ask one more thing, what other services are there in the hotel? 
Receptionist: We have a restaurant, bar, hairdressing salon and pool for our guests. 
John: Very good. What time do you check out of the room?
Receptionist: 12.00.
John: Thank you very much. 
Receptionist: You're welcome.
John: Thank you again. 
Receptionist: Have a good rest. The bellboy will show you to your rooms.
John: Good! Goodbye!
Receptionist: Goodbye!
John: Wow, what a nice room!
Clara: It's a great hotel in Bristol! The rooms are very nice, clean and the beds are comfortable. The location is good, just a few metres from Queen Square.  
John: And the view from the room is great. 
Clara: Let's have a rest first and then we'll go for a walk around the city together. 
John: Shall we meet at five o'clock?
Clara: Yes, yes, that's fine.
John: Good, let's meet at the reception at 5 pm. I'll see you later. 
Clara: Deal, see you later.
John: Time to explore the city. Are you ready for a trip? 
Clara Yes, yes I'm ready.
John: We have enough time to see many places in Bristol. 

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	Clara: Where does our trip start? What is Bristol famous for?
John: I looked on the internet and learnt about the touristic places in Bristol. Our city tour starts from the Old City. 
Clara: Isn't it the historical part of Bristol?
John: Exactly. Another tourist attraction of Bristol is the Castle Park. The castle was built in the 11th century.
Clara: Wonderful!
John: But no building in Bristol is as famous as Clifton Suspension Bridge. It was built in 1864. 
Clara: And what kind of food is Bristol famous for? 
John: The most famous Bristol foods are Easter Biscuits, Shepherd’s Pie, and Mothering Buns. Bristol is one of the most beautiful cities in the UK.
Clara: I completely agree with you.
John: The sun is setting. Let's hurry and not be late for the wedding. You look great in this outfit.
Clara: Thank you. You look very stylish in this suit, too. 
John: Thank you! Are you ready for some fun?
Clara: Yes, I'm ready. 
John: Come on, let's go!

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	Nick: Oh, John, how nice to see you here! You are very welcome. 
John: I wish you and your wife eternal happiness. 
Clara: Congratulations!
Nick: Thank you very much! 
John: We have a present for you. 
Nick: Wow, thank you very much. 
Clara: John, I love this song
John: Would you like to dance with me?
Clara: I would love to.
John: Whose song is this?
Clara: This is Adele’s “Someone Like You”. I like this song very much. 
John: The song sounds very nice. What kind of music do you like to listen to?
Clara: I like listening to everything from classical music to pop music. And you? What kind of music do you listen to?
John: Mostly rock music. 
Clara: What is your favourite song?
John: There are a lot. One of them is Pink Floyd’s “Wish You Were Here.”
Clara: Pink Floyd’s songs are good. 
John: OK, I'm going to get myself a drink. Do you want one? 
Clara: A cocktail for me please.
John: I'll get it right away. 
John: Here you go!
Clara: Thank you!
Nick: Are you having fun?
John: Yes, we are having a lot of fun.
Nick: How do you guys know each other?
John: We study at the same university. 
Nick: How nice!
Clara: And how do you know John?
Nick: We are childhood friends. We grew up together.
Clara: So how did you meet your wife?
Nick: We met through a mutual friend in 2022. We have been together for two years. 
Clara: Great!
Nick: Come on, let's dance.
Clara: We had a really unforgettable evening! I've never danced so much in my life! Hey, John, what happened to you?
Oh, John: I don't feel well.
Clara: What's wrong? Are you in pain?
John: I feel sick.
Clara: You should see a doctor.
John: No, I'm fine.
Clara: What do you mean you're fine? Come on, John, let's go to the hospital.

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	Secretary: How can I help you?
John: Hello, my name is John Wilson, here is my identity card! 
Secretary: Please wait here. We will call your name.
Doctor: John Wilson, please come in. What is your complaint?
John: Hello Doctor. I feel very bad. I am nauseous and dizzy. 
Doctor: For how long?
John: About an hour.
Doctor: What did you eat or drink?
John: I ate snacks at a wedding and drank too much alcohol.
Doctor: This may be the cause of your complaints. I would like to examine you in more detail. Please lie down on the stretcher and turn your back towards me. Breathe in and out deeply. Do you have any other complaints?
John: Yes, I feel a little cold. 
Doctor: OK. Let me take your temperature. 37.5 degrees. You don’t have a fever. Please open your mouth. It looks fine. Your throat isn't red. Let's take your blood pressure. Open your upper arm. 130/90. Your blood pressure is slightly high. Let's check your blood counts. I'll take your blood for a blood test. OK!  Press hard on the cotton wool, please! 
Doctor: According to the results of the blood test, you probably have food poisoning. First, we'll put you on an IV drip. I'm also prescribing you a medicine. Take it twice a day for a week. I am writing you a report for two days. 
John: I understand, thank you very much, Doctor! 
Doctor: Get well soon!
Clara: Are you feeling better now, John?
John: Yes, I'm much better. But now we need to find a pharmacy nearby. 
Clara: Just a minute, let me look on the Internet. Okay, I found it. The nearest open pharmacy is about 500 metres away. 
John: We can go on foot.
Clara: Come, let's go.
John: We finally got to the pharmacy. 

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	Pharmacist: How can I help you?
John: The doctor wrote a prescription. Here is the prescription. 
Pharmacist: Let me see if we have this medicine.
John: Thank you, I'll wait.
Pharmacist: Yes, we have it. 
John: How should I use the medicine?
Pharmacist: Let me see the instructions for use. Take the medicine twice a day. One tablet in the morning and the second in the evening. Take these pills for a week.
John: Before or after a meal?
Pharmacist: On an empty stomach. 
John: And are there any side effects of the medicine?
Pharmacist: No, but don't take it for more than a week.
John: Yes. And how many pills are in it?
Pharmacist: There are 25 in a box. Do you need anything else?
John: No, thank you. How much is one box? 
Pharmacist: £12 per box.
John: OK, I'll take it. Here's my credit card. 
Pharmacist: Enter the password, please! Thank you, get well soon.
John: Thank you. Goodbye. It's already morning. We have to go back to the hotel and check out. 
Clara: Check-out time is 12.00. In the meantime, we can stop by a bank and withdraw money.
John: Can't you withdraw the cash from an ATM?
Clara: Unfortunately. The ATM swallowed my bank card.
John: Then we should go to a bank right away.

TEMA	
BANKADA
	Bank Teller: How can I help you?
Clara: My name is Clara Feathers. The ATM swallowed my bank card.
Bank Teller: Have you repeatedly entered your password incorrectly?
Clara: Yes, I entered the wrong password three times.
Bank Teller: I see, the bank ATM has swallowed your bank card for security reasons. You should have your card cancelled and apply for a new card.
Clara: Okay. So how do I apply for a new bank card and how much does it cost?
Bank Teller: Cancellation is free of charge, but renewing the debit card costs 5 Pounds.
Clara: Okay. 
Bank Teller: Do you have your ID card with you? I need your name, address and date of birth.
Clara: Yes, here it is. 
Bank Teller: Please fill in and sign this form!
Clara: OK.
Bank Teller: We will send your card to your address.
Clara: When is it going to arrive?
Bank Teller: It will take about two weeks. 
Clara: Thank you very much. I have one more request: I want to withdraw money from my account.
Bank Teller: Sure, what is your customer number?
Clara: 123456.
Bank Teller: How much money do you want to withdraw?
Clara: I want to withdraw £ 200.
Bank Teller: OK. Here you go. 
Clara: Thank you. Can I also find out my balance?
Bank Teller: Sure! Your current balance is £ 1000.
Clara: Thank you very much. 
Bank Teller: Do you have any other requests?
Clara: No, thank you. 
Clara: We have taken care of all our business , now it is time to check out of the hotel. The train to London leaves at 12.00. 
John: We had a really good time. We can go back home now.
 
 
 




 
 













 
  EK-3 Diyaloglar ile Almanca Tematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 

TEMA	
YOLDA
	c

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	Sandra: Hallo.
Alfred: Hallo, Anna.
Sandra: Entschuldigung, mit wem spreche ich?
Alfred: Ich bin Alfred. Wer sind Sie?
Sandra: Ich bin Sandra Müller.
Alfred: Ist das nicht 178 225 55 55?
Sandra: Nein, das ist 178 225 55 45.
Alfred: Oh, entschuldigen Sie! Ich habe die falsche Nummer gewählt.
Sandra: Kein Problem. Auf Wiederhören!

Anna: Hallo!
Alfred: Anna?
Anna: Ja.
Alfred: Hallo Anna, ich bin Alfred.
Anna: Hallo Alfred. Wie geht es dir?
Alfred: Mir geht es gut, danke. Und dir?
Anna: Mir geht es auch gut.
Alfred: Hast du heute Zeit?
Anna: Ja, habe ich.
Alfred: Kommst du mit ins Café auf dem Campus?
Anna: Das wäre toll! Um wie viel Uhr?
Alfred: Um halb zwei. Passt dir das?
Anna: Schade, um diese Zeit habe ich Unterricht. Mein Unterricht endet um drei. Passt es dir um drei Uhr?
Alfred: Ja, das passt. Dann sehen wir uns um drei im Café.
Anna: Bis dann!

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
	Anna: Hallo alle zusammen! 
Alfred: Grüß dich! Wie geht es dir?
Anna: Danke, es geht mir gut und dir? 
Alfred: Mir geht es auch gut. Das ist Anna. Sie kommt aus Berlin. 
Nina: Hallo Anna, ich heiße Nina. Ich komme aus Bremen. 
Heinz: Hi, Anna, ich bin Heinz. Ich komme aus München.
Anna: Freut mich.
Heinz: Wie alt bist du Anna?
Anna: Ich bin achtzehn Jahre alt. Und du?
Heinz: Neunzehn. Aber Nina ist zwanzig Jahre alt. 
Alfred: Ich bin älter als ihr. Ich bin am 20. Dezember 2002 geboren. Ich bin zweiundzwanzig Jahre alt. 
Anna: Dann ist dein Sternzeichen Schütze. 
Alfred: Genau. Und was ist dein Sternzeichen?
Anna: Mein Sternzeichen ist Widder. Ich bin im April geboren. 
Nina: Toll, ich bin Fische. Ich bin im März geboren. Und Anna, was studierst du denn? 
Anna: Ich studiere in der Abteilung Deutsch auf Lehramt. Ich bin neu immatrikuliert. Und du? 
Nina: Ich studiere an der Medizinischen Fakultät. 
Anna: Im wievielten Semester bist du?
Nina: Im zweiten. Und du?
Heinz: Ich studiere auch im zweiten Semester Linguistik.
Anna: Ich bin im ersten Semester. 
Heinz: Anna, wie findest du das Studium in der Abteilung Deutsch auf Lehramt in Paderborn?
Anna: Meine Kommilitonen und Kommilitoninnen sind nett, das Klima ist sehr angenehm... Es ist schön, dass man hier studiert.
Alfred: Oh Gott, ich bin zu spät. Entschuldigt mich jetzt, ich habe um 14:00 Uhr eine Vorlesung. 
Anna: Auf Wiedersehen!
Alfred: Tschüs!

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	Anna: Entschuldigung, wo sind die Kartoffeln?
Verkäufer: Da vorne, in der Gemüseabteilung.
Anna: Da habe ich schon nachgeschaut, aber ich habe sie nicht gesehen.
Verkäufer: Doch, sie sind vorne rechts, gleich am Eingang.
Anna: Danke, ich sehe nochmal nach.
Anna: Oh, Alfred, was für ein Zufall!
Alfred: Ja.
Anna: Ich muss dringend einkaufen. Mein Kühlschrank ist leer.
Alfred: Ich möchte frisches Obst und Gemüse kaufen. Gibt es gerade irgendwelche Angebote?
Anna: Äpfel sind im Angebot. Bayerische Äpfel. Das Kilo kostet 5 €.
Alfred: Schön, ein Kilo, bitte! Haben Sie auch Spinat?
Anna: Die sind dort drüben, neben den Zwiebeln.
Alfred: Vielen Dank.
Anna: Hast du alles, was du wolltest?
Alfred: Ich brauche einen Liter Milch, eine Dose Cola und eine Flasche Wasser.
Anna: Sie sind bei den Getränken.
Alfred: Danke.
Anna: Ist das alles?
Alfred: Ja, danke, das ist alles. Brauchst du noch etwas?
Anna: Hm, was brauche ich? Moment, ich schaue auf meine Einkaufsliste. Ich brauche einen Beutel Reis, ein Bund Petersilie, 250 Gramm Käse, 100 Gramm Salami und ein Glas Honig.
Alfred: Welche Salami möchtest du?
Anna: Putensalami.
Alfred: Salami ist bei den Fleischwaren, Reis beim Getreide, Käse bei der Käsetheke und Petersilie bei Obst und Gemüse. Schau mal dort. Honig ist in der „Günstig-Abteilung“. Brauchst du noch etwas?
Anna: Nein, das ist alles. Wir können jetzt zur Kasse gehen. Glücklicherweise gibt es keine lange Schlange an der Kasse.
Verkäuferin: Möchten Sie eine Tasche?
Anna: Nein, ich habe eine Tasche.
Verkäuferin: Das macht zusammen 50 €.
Anna: Hier, bitte. Ich möchte mit Kreditkarte bezahlen.
Verkäuferin: Ist Ihre Kreditkarte kontaktlos?
Anna: Ja.
Verkäuferin: Halten Sie Ihre Karte ans Kartenlesegerät.
Verkäuferin: Vielen Dank. Ich wünsche Ihnen einen schönen Tag.
Alfred: Guten Tag!
Verkäuferin: Guten Tag! Möchten Sie eine Tüte?
Alfred: Ja, bitte.
Verkäuferin: 45,56 €, bitte. Möchten Sie mit Karte bezahlen?
Alfred: Ich möchte bar bezahlen. Hier, bitte!
Verkäuferin: 4,44 € zurück.
Alfred: Vielen Dank.
Anna: Die Einkaufstüten sind viel zu schwer.
Alfred: Ich helfe dir, sie bis nach Hause zu tragen. Gib mir die Tüten!
Anna: Bist du sicher?
Alfred: Ja.
Anna: Vielen Dank für deine Hilfe.

TEMA	
EVDE
	Anna: Willkommen!
Alfred: Vielen Dank für die Einladung. Wo kann ich meinen Mantel aufhängen?
Anna: Hier in der Garderobe.
Alfred: Danke.
Anna: Setz dich und ruh dich aus!
Alfred: Danke.
Anna: Möchtest du etwas trinken?
Alfred: Ich nehme einen Kaffee.
Anna: Mit oder ohne Milch?
Alfred: Ohne Milch.
Anna: Okay, ich bringe ihn sofort. Das ist dein Kaffee ohne Milch, und das ist mein Kaffee mit Milch.
Alfred: Oh, danke schön.
Anna: Gern geschehen!
Alfred: Wie groß ist die Wohnung?
Anna: 100 Quadratmeter.
Alfred: Ist sie nicht zu groß für dich allein? Wie viele Zimmer hat sie?
Anna: Nein, sie ist perfekt für mich. Sie ist sehr schön und ruhig. Sie hat ein Wohnzimmer, zwei Schlafzimmer und eine Küche. Außerdem gibt es ein Bad und einen Balkon.
Alfred: Oh, toll! Wie ist die Lage?
Anna: Sehr zentral. In der Nähe gibt es eine Straßenbahnhaltestelle und ein Einkaufszentrum.
Alfred: Gehört dir die Wohnung?
Anna: Nein, ich wohne zur Miete.
Alfred: Ist sie teuer? Wie viel zahlst du im Monat?
Anna: Nein, sie ist günstig. Die Miete beträgt 800 €, und die Nebenkosten liegen bei etwa 200 € im Monat.
Alfred: Das ist nicht teuer, und die Wohnung ist schön. Sie liegt im 4. Stock, aber es gibt keinen Aufzug – deshalb ist sie so günstig. Kann ich die Wohnung besichtigen?
Anna: Natürlich!
Anna: Dies ist der Flur. Leider ist er ziemlich schmal. Hier rechts sind zwei Zimmer.
Alfred: Die Zimmer sind sehr hell.
Anna: Ja, genau. Gegenüber ist das große Wohnzimmer.
Alfred: Das Wohnzimmer hat einen Balkon.
Anna: Ja, aber er ist nicht besonders groß.
Alfred: Ist das hier die Küche?
Anna: Ja, sie ist praktisch und hat einen Blick auf den Fluss.
Alfred: Und das hier ist das Bad?
Anna: Genau, es ist klein, aber sehr hell.
Alfred: Hat die Wohnung eine Garage?
Anna: Ja, jede Wohnung in diesem Gebäude hat eine eigene Garage.
Alfred: Wird die Wohnung gut warm?
Anna: Ja, sie ist nach Süden ausgerichtet und gut isoliert.
Alfred: Die Wohnung ist wirklich schön. Alles, was man braucht, ist vorhanden.
Anna: Genau, ich bin sehr zufrieden hier.
Alfred: Es ist jetzt Zeit zu essen. Hast du Hunger? Ich kenne ein gutes Restaurant in der Nähe. Willst du mitessen? 
Anna: Ich habe Bärenhunger, mein Magen knurrt. 
Alfred: Los, wir gehen was essen.

TEMA	
RESTORANDA
	Alfred: Endlich angekommen! Los, wir gehen rein!
Kellner: Guten Tag, herzlich willkommen in unserem Restaurant! Haben Sie eine Reservierung?
Alfred: Nein, leider nicht. Haben Sie einen freien Tisch für zwei Personen?
Kellner: Ja, kein Problem. Wo möchten Sie sitzen?
Alfred: Am Fenster, bitte.
Kellner: Leider sind die Tische am Fenster reserviert.
Anna: Na gut, ein Tisch am Gang ist für uns in Ordnung.
Kellner: Einen Moment! Ja, ein Tisch am Gang ist noch frei. Kommen Sie bitte mit! Hier, gleich in der Ecke. Ist der Tisch in Ordnung?
Alfred: Ja, er ist in Ordnung. Könnten wir bitte die Speisekarte haben?
Kellner: Sehr gern. Haben Sie schon gewählt?
Alfred: Ja, für mich bitte die Gulaschsuppe und die Penne mit Pilz-Sahnesoße.
Kellner: Sehr gern. Und für Sie? Als Tagesgericht kann ich Ihnen heute besonders unsere Forelle blau mit Salzkartoffeln empfehlen.
Anna: Dann nehme ich Tomatencremesuppe und Forelle blau mit Salzkartoffeln.
Kellner: Gut, was möchten Sie trinken?
Anna: Ein Bier, bitte.
Alfred: Und für mich eine Apfelschorle.
Kellner: Möchten Sie noch einen Nachtisch?
Anna: Ja, ich hätte gern eine Sachertorte.
Alfred: Für mich ein Apfelstrudel.
Kellner: Kommt sofort! Haben Sie sonst noch einen Wunsch?
Anna: Nein, danke.
Kellner: Bitte schön. Guten Appetit!
Alfred: Dankeschön.
Kellner: Fehlt noch etwas?
Anna: Können Sie mir bitte noch eine Serviette bringen?
Alfred: Ich hätte gern noch etwas mehr Brot.
Kellner: Natürlich! Ich bringe es sofort.
Anna: Dankeschön.
Kellner: Bitte sehr! Ich wünsche Ihnen guten Appetit!
Alfred: Könnten wir bitte die Rechnung bekommen?
Kellner: Natürlich! Möchten Sie zusammen oder getrennt zahlen?
Alfred: Zusammen, bitte.
Kellner: Gerne. Zahlen Sie mit Karte?
Alfred: Nein, wir zahlen bar.
Kellner: Das macht dann 80 €.
Alfred: Bitte, stimmt so!
Kellner: Vielen Dank! Ich wünsche Ihnen noch einen schönen Tag.
Anna: Auf Wiedersehen!
Alfred: Hat dir das Essen geschmeckt?
Anna: Ja, das Essen war sehr lecker. Und was machen wir jetzt?
Alfred: Ich habe eine gute Idee! Heute heiratet mein bester Freund Daniel. Die Hochzeit findet um 20:00 Uhr in Münster statt und ich bin eingeladen. Hast du Lust, mitzukommen?
Anna: Sehr gern! Aber was soll ich zur Hochzeit anziehen? Ich brauche ein schönes Kleid.
Alfred: Ich brauche auch einen schicken Anzug.

TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	Anna: Wie findest du das rote Kleid im Schaufenster?
Alfred: Es gefällt mir. Probiere es doch mal an!
Verkäufer: Wie kann ich Ihnen helfen?
Anna: Ich möchte das rote Kleid im Schaufenster anprobieren.
Verkäufer: Welche Größe haben Sie?
Anna: Ich habe Größe 36.
Verkäufer: Kommen Sie bitte mit! Probieren Sie dieses Kleid an.
Anna: Wo kann ich es anprobieren?
Verkäufer: Die Umkleidekabinen sind dort. Wie gefällt Ihnen das Kleid?
Anna: Die Farbe ist schön, aber es passt mir nicht. Haben Sie es eine Nummer größer?
Verkäufer: Ja, hier ist es in Größe 38.
Anna: Ok, ich probiere es an.
Anna: Steht mir das Kleid gut?
Alfred: Es steht dir ausgezeichnet.
Anna: Ich mag es auch. Wie viel kostet es?
Verkäufer: Es kostet 400 €.
Anna: Sehr schick. Ich mag die Farbe. Es passt mir perfekt. Ich nehme es.
Verkäufer: Brauchen Sie sonst noch etwas?
Alfred: Ja, ich suche einen Anzug. Wo sind die Anzüge?
Verkäufer: Im zweiten Stock.
Alfred: Dieser Anzug ist schick, aber er kostet 1000 TL. Das ist zu viel. Vielleicht kann ich etwas Günstigeres finden. Ah, dort gibt es einen Rabatt. Dieser Anzug ist sehr schön. Aber er passt mir nicht, er ist zu eng. Entschuldigung, haben Sie diesen Anzug eine Nummer größer?
Verkäufer: Probieren Sie diesen Anzug hier an!
Alfred: Danke. Der ist in Ordnung.
Verkäufer: Brauchen Sie sonst noch etwas?
Alfred: Haben Sie Fliegen?
Verkäufer: Natürlich! Dort. Heute gibt es fünfzig Prozent Rabatt auf Fliegen und Krawatten.
Alfred: Hm, ich kaufe eine neue Fliege zu diesem Anzug. Welche Farbe passt dazu?
Verkäufer: Ich finde, diese Fliege passt perfekt.
Alfred: Die nehme ich.
Verkäufer: Suchen Sie noch etwas?
Alfred: Nein, danke.
Verkäufer: Auf Wiedersehen!

TEMA	
GARDA
	Alfred: Wir haben unseren Einkauf erledigt. Nun können wir nach Münster fahren.
Anna: OK.
Alfred: Da ist der Bahnhof. Kaufen wir jetzt unsere Fahrkarten nach Münster. Aber wo können wir Fahrkarten kaufen?
Anna: Die Fahrkarten können wir am Schalter kaufen.
Alfred: Guten Tag, ich möchte bitte zwei Fahrkarten nach Münster kaufen.
Frau am Schalter: Einfache Fahrt?
Alfred: Hin- und zurück, bitte.
Frau am Schalter: Wann möchten Sie verreisen?
Alfred: Wir möchten den nächsten Zug nehmen.
Frau am Schalter: Der nächste Zug fährt in fünfzehn Minuten ab.
Alfred: Das passt uns.
Frau am Schalter: Das macht 120 €. Zahlen Sie mit Karte?
Alfred: Nein, ich zahle bar, bitte!
Frau am Schalter: Hier sind Ihre Fahrkarten. Und 80 € zurück.
Alfred: Danke! Wird der Zug sich verspäten?
Frau am Schalter: Nein, er kommt pünktlich.
Alfred: Danke!
Frau am Schalter: Auf Wiedersehen!
Durchsage: Achtung, Achtung! Der Zug nach Münster fährt ab.
Anna: In Kürze wird der Zug abfahren. Steigen wir in den Zug ein.
Alfred: Gehen wir weiter und finden unsere Sitzplätze.
Anna: Das sind unsere Sitzplätze.
Durchsage: Nächster Halt: Hauptbahnhof Münster. 
Alfred: Anna, steh auf, lass uns hier aussteigen. Wir müssen nun ein passendes Hotel finden. Komm, wir gehen ins Zentrum.
Anna: Hey, guck mal!
Anna: Dieses Hotel scheint von außen sehr schön.
Alfred: Dieses 5-Sterne-Hotel im Zentrum von Münster hat bestimmt Zimmer mit schöner Aussicht.
Anna: Ja, komm, lass uns reingehen!

TEMA	
OTELDE
	Rezeptionist: Guten Tag, Willkommen im Hotel Münster.
Alfred: Guten Tag. Wir möchten zwei Zimmer.
Rezeptionist: Natürlich, wie viele Nächte bleiben Sie?
Alfred: Nur eine Nacht.
Rezeptionist: In Ordnung. Wir haben Zimmer. Möchten Sie ein Doppelzimmer?
Alfred: Nein, wir möchten zwei Einzelzimmer.
Rezeptionist: Ist Frühstück inbegriffen?
Alfred: Ja, es ist inbegriffen. Gibt es Internet in den Zimmern?
Rezeptionist: Ja, in allen Zimmern gibt es Internet, ein Bad, Toilette, Telefon, Fernseher, Kühlschrank und Klimaanlage.
Alfred: In Ordnung, wir nehmen die Zimmer.
Rezeptionist: Okay, könnte ich bitte Ihre Ausweise sehen?
Alfred: Natürlich, bitte.
Rezeptionist: Danke, bitte füllen Sie dieses Formular aus. Geben Sie bitte Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse, Ihr Geburtsdatum und Ihre Nationalität an.
Alfred: Hier, bitte!
Rezeptionist: Und bitte hier unterschreiben!
Alfred: Alles ist in Ordnung.
Rezeptionist: Wie möchten Sie bezahlen?
Alfred: Ich möchte mit Kreditkarte bezahlen. 
Rezeptionist: Zahlung erhalten. Hier sind Ihre Schlüssel. Ihre Zimmernummern sind 104 und 105.
Alfred: In welchem Stock?
Rezeptionist: Im ersten Stock. Wenn Sie aus dem Aufzug kommen, ist es gleich rechts.
Alfred: Wann ist das Frühstück?
Rezeptionist: Das Frühstück ist von 7 bis 10 Uhr im Speisesaal. Der Speisesaal ist im Erdgeschoss. Sie können das Frühstück aufs Zimmer bestellen.
Alfred: Danke. Darf ich noch etwas fragen? Welche anderen Dienstleistungen bietet das Hotel an?
Rezeptionist: Für unsere Gäste haben wir ein Restaurant, eine Bar, einen Friseursalon und einen Pool.
Alfred: Sehr gut. Wann ist die Checkout-Zeit?
Rezeptionist: Um 12:00 Uhr.
Alfred: Vielen Dank.
Rezeptionist: Gern geschehen.
Alfred: Nochmals vielen Dank.
Rezeptionist: Ich wünsche Ihnen einen schönen Aufenthalt. Der Portier wird Ihnen die Zimmer zeigen.
Alfred: Schön! Auf Wiedersehen!
Rezeptionist: Auf Wiedersehen!
Alfred: Wow, was für ein schönes Zimmer!
Anna: Ein super Hotel in Münster! Die Zimmer sind sehr schön, sauber und die Betten sind bequem. Die Lage ist gut, nur wenige Meter von der Aasee entfernt.
Alfred: Außerdem ist die Aussicht aus dem Zimmer fantastisch.
Anna: Lass uns erst ein bisschen ausruhen und dann die Stadt zusammen erkunden.
Alfred: Sollen wir uns um 17.00 Uhr treffen?
Anna: Ja, das passt.
Alfred: Gut, dann treffen wir uns um fünf Uhr an der Rezeption. Bis später!
Anna: Einverstanden! Bis später!
Alfred: Zeit, die Stadt zu entdecken. Bist du bereit für die Tour?
Anna: Ja, ich bin bereit.
Alfred: Wir haben genug Zeit, um viele Orte in Münster zu sehen.

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	Anna: Wo beginnt unsere Tour? Was ist in Münster berühmt?
Alfred: Ich habe im Internet nachgesehen und Informationen über die Sehenswürdigkeiten in Münster gesammelt. Unsere Stadtrundfahrt beginnt an der Promenade. 
Anna: Ist das nicht das historische Viertel von Münster?
Alfred: Genau. Eine weitere Sehenswürdigkeit in Münster bietet der St. Paulus Dom. Er wurde 1264 errichtet.
Anna: Wie fantastisch!
Alfred: Aber kaum ein Gebäude in Münster ist so bekannt wie das fürstbischöfliche Schloss. Es wurde im Stil des Barocks erbaut und gilt heute als eine der Hauptattraktionen in Münster. 
Anna: Und welche Gerichte sind in Münster berühmt?
Alfred: Die berühmtesten Gerichte Münsters sind Pumpernickel, Mettwurst und Pickert. Münster ist eine der schönsten Städte in Deutschland.
Anna: Ich stimme dir vollkommen zu.
Alfred: Die Sonne sinkt. Lass uns beeilen, wir dürfen die Hochzeit nicht verpassen. Du siehst in diesem Kleid wunderschön aus.
Anna: Danke, du siehst in diesem Anzug auch sehr schick aus.
Alfred: Danke! Bist du bereit für ein bisschen Spaß?
Anna: Ja, ich bin bereit.
Alfred: Lass uns gehen!

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	Daniel: Ah, Alfred, wie schön dich hier zu sehen! Willkommen!
Alfred: Ich wünsche dir und deiner Frau unendlich viel Glück.
Anna: Herzlichen Glückwunsch!
Daniel: Vielen Dank!
Alfred: Wir haben ein Geschenk für euch.
Daniel: Oh, vielen Dank. 
Anna: Alfred, ich liebe dieses Lied sehr.
Alfred: Möchtest du mit mir tanzen?
Anna: Sehr gerne.
Alfred: Wem gehört dieses Lied?
Anna: Dieses Lied ist „Federkleid“ und ist von Faun. Ich mag dieses Lied sehr.
Alfred: Das Lied klingt sehr schön. Welche Musikrichtung hörst du gerne?
Anna: Ich höre alles, von klassischer Musik bis Popmusik. Und du? Welche Musik hörst du?
Alfred: Meistens Rockmusik.
Anna: Was ist dein Lieblingslied?
Alfred: Es gibt viele. Eines davon ist Rammsteins „Du hast“.
Anna: Die Lieder von Rammstein sind schön.
Alfred: Also, ich hole mir ein Getränk. Möchtest du auch etwas?
Anna: Ein Bier, bitte.
Alfred: Ich bringe es dir sofort. Hier, bitte!
Anna: Danke!
Daniel: Habt ihr Spaß?
Alfred: Ja, wir haben viel Spaß.
Daniel: Wie habt ihr euch kennengelernt?
Alfred: Wir gehen auf die gleiche Universität.
Daniel: Wie schön!
Anna: Und wie hast du Alfred kennengelernt?
Daniel: Wir sind Kindheitsfreunde. Wir sind zusammen aufgewachsen.
Anna: Und wie hast du deine Frau kennengelernt?
Daniel: Wir haben uns 2022 über einen gemeinsamen Freund kennengelernt. Wir sind seit zwei Jahren zusammen.
Anna: Wie schön!
Daniel: Los, tanzen wir!
Anna: Wir hatten wirklich einen unvergesslichen Abend! Ich habe noch nie in meinem Leben so viel getanzt! Hey, Alfred, was ist dir denn passiert?
Alfred: Mir geht es nicht so gut.
Anna: Was ist denn? Hast du Schmerzen?
Alfred: Mir ist übel.
Anna: Du solltest zum Arzt gehen.
Alfred: Nein, es geht schon.
Anna: Was soll das heißen, es geht schon? Los Alfred, wir gehen ins Krankenhaus.

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	Sekretärin: Wie kann ich Ihnen helfen?
Alfred: Hallo, mein Name ist Alfred Müller, mein Personalausweis, bitte.
Sekretärin: Bitte warten Sie hier. Wir werden Sie rufen.
Arzt: Alfred Müller, bitte kommen Sie herein. Was ist Ihre Beschwerde?
Alfred: Hallo Herr Doktor. Ich fühle mich sehr schlecht. Mir ist übel und mir dreht sich der Kopf.
Arzt: Seit wann haben Sie diese Beschwerden?
Alfred: Seit ungefähr einer Stunde.
Arzt: Was haben Sie gegessen oder getrunken?
Alfred: Ich habe bei einer Hochzeit Snacks gegessen und zu viel Alkohol getrunken.
Arzt: Das könnte die Ursache Ihrer Beschwerden sein. Ich möchte Sie gründlicher untersuchen. Bitte legen Sie sich auf die Liege und drehen Sie sich mit dem Rücken zu mir. Atmen Sie tief ein und aus. Haben Sie noch andere Beschwerden?
Alfred: Ja, mir ist ein bisschen kalt.
Arzt: Okay. Ich werde Ihre Temperatur messen. 37,5 Grad. Sie haben kein Fieber. Bitte öffnen Sie den Mund. Es sieht gut aus. Ihr Hals ist nicht gerötet. Lassen Sie uns Ihren Blutdruck messen. Bitte den Arm frei machen. 130 zu 90. Ihr Blutdruck ist leicht erhöht. Wir sollten auch Ihre Blutwerte überprüfen. Ich werde Ihnen Blut abnehmen. Okay! Drücken Sie bitte kräftig auf das Wattestäbchen! 
Laut den Ergebnissen der Blutuntersuchung haben Sie höchstwahrscheinlich eine Lebensmittelvergiftung. Zuerst werden wir Ihnen eine Infusion legen. Ich verschreibe Ihnen ein Medikament. Nehmen Sie es eine Woche lang zweimal täglich. Ich schreibe Ihnen eine Krankschreibung für zwei Tage.
Alfred: Ich verstehe, vielen Dank, Herr Doktor!
Arzt: Gute Besserung!
Anna: Geht es dir jetzt besser, Alfred?
Alfred: Ja, viel besser. Aber jetzt müssen wir eine Apotheke in der Nähe finden.
Anna: Einen Moment, ich schaue im Internet nach. Okay, ich habe eine gefunden. Die nächste offene Apotheke ist etwa 500 Meter entfernt.
Alfred: Wir können zu Fuß gehen.
Anna: Komm, lass uns gehen.
Alfred: Endlich sind wir in der Apotheke angekommen.

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	Apotheker: Wie kann ich Ihnen helfen?
Alfred: Der Arzt hat ein Rezept verschrieben. Hier ist das Rezept.
Apotheker: Lassen Sie mich nachsehen, ob wir dieses Medikament haben.
Alfred: Danke, ich warte.
Apotheker: Ja, wir haben es.
Alfred: Wie soll ich das Medikament einnehmen?
Apotheker: Lassen Sie mich die Gebrauchsanweisung nachsehen. Nehmen Sie das Medikament zweimal täglich. Eine Tablette morgens, die zweite abends. Nehmen Sie diese Tabletten eine Woche lang.
Alfred: Vor oder nach dem Essen?
Apotheker: Auf nüchternen Magen.
Alfred: Hat das Medikament irgendwelche Nebenwirkungen?
Apotheker: Nein, aber nehmen Sie es nicht länger als eine Woche.
Alfred: Okay. Wie viele Tabletten sind in der Packung?
Apotheker: In einer Packung sind 25 Tabletten. Brauchen Sie noch etwas anderes?
Alfred: Nein, danke. Wie viel kostet eine Packung?
Apotheker: Eine Packung kostet 50,90 €.
Alfred: Okay, ich nehme es. Hier ist meine Kreditkarte.
Apotheker: Bitte geben Sie den PIN ein! Danke, gute Besserung.
Alfred: Danke. Auf Wiedersehen. Es ist schon Morgen. Wir sollten ins Hotel zurückkehren und auschecken.
Anna: Die Check-out-Zeit ist um 12:00 Uhr. Übrigens können wir auf dem Weg zur Bank gehen und Geld abheben.
Alfred: Kannst du das Geld nicht an einem Geldautomaten abheben?
Anna: Leider nicht. Der Geldautomat hat meine Bankkarte eingezogen.
Alfred: Dann sollten wir sofort zu einer Bank gehen.

TEMA	
BANKADA
	Bankangestellter: Wie kann ich Ihnen helfen?
Anna: Mein Name ist Anna Schütze. Der Geldautomat hat meine Bankkarte geschluckt.
Bankangestellter: Haben Sie Ihre PIN hintereinander dreimal falsch eingegeben?
Anna: Ja, ich habe meine PIN dreimal falsch eingegeben.
Bankangestellter: Verstanden. Der Geldautomat hat aus Sicherheitsgründen Ihre Karte eingezogen. Sie müssen die Karte sperren lassen und eine neue beantragen.
Anna: Okay. Wie beantrage ich eine neue Bankkarte und wie viel kostet es?
Bankangestellter: Die Sperrung ist kostenlos, aber eine neue Bankkarte kostet 12 €.
Anna: Okay.
Bankangestellter: Haben Sie Ihren Ausweis dabei? Wir benötigen Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse und Ihr Geburtsdatum.
Anna: Ja, hier ist er.
Bankangestellter: Bitte füllen Sie dieses Formular aus und unterschreiben Sie!
Anna: Okay.
Bankangestellter: Wir werden Ihre Karte an Ihre Adresse schicken.
Anna: Wann kommt sie an?
Bankangestellter: Es dauert ungefähr zwei Wochen.
Anna: Vielen Dank. Ich habe noch eine Bitte: Ich möchte Geld von meinem Konto abheben.
Bankangestellter: Natürlich, wie lautet Ihre Kundennummer?
Anna: 123456.
Bankangestellter: Wie viel möchten Sie abheben?
Anna: Ich möchte 200 € abheben.
Bankangestellter: Okay. Hier, bitte.
Anna: Danke. Könnte ich auch mein Kontostand erfahren?
Bankangestellter: Natürlich! Ihr aktueller Kontostand beträgt 1000 €.
Anna: Vielen Dank.
Bankangestellter: Haben Sie noch weitere Wünsche?
Anna: Nein, danke. Wir haben alle unsere Aufgaben erledigt. Jetzt ist es Zeit, aus dem Hotel auszuchecken. Der Zug nach Paderborn fährt um 12 Uhr.
Alfred: Wir haben wirklich eine schöne Zeit gehabt. Wir können jetzt nach Hause zurückgehen.
 
 










































































 EK-4 Diyaloglar ile Fransızca Tematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 

TEMA	
YOLDA
	Chloé : Excusez-moi, je suis nouvelle en ville. Comment puis-je aller à l'Université de Franche-Comté ? 
Louis : L'Université de Franche-Comté se trouve à l’avenue de l’Observatoire. 
Chloé : C'est loin d'ici ? 
Louis : Non, c'est assez proche. Vous pouvez y aller à pied. Ça dure environ 15 minutes. 
Chloé : D'accord, et comment puis-je aller à l’avenue de l’Observatoire ? 
Louis : C'est très simple. Vous descendez cette rue jusqu'au carrefour. Au carrefour, tournez à gauche et continuez tout droit environ 500 mètres jusqu'à la Rue Louis Pergaud. Traversez la rue et tournez à la première droite sur le Boulevard Xavier Marmier. Continuez tout droit, vous allez voir un parc sur votre droite. Au feu rouge, tournez à droite. Passez par la Rue de Trepillot et tournez à gauche au carrefour dans l’Avenue Léo Lagrange. L'Université de Franche-Comté est là. 
Chloé : D'accord. Tout droit, à gauche au carrefour, tout droit jusqu'à la Rue Louis Pergaud, puis à gauche. Au feu rouge à droite et... Je n'ai pas compris.  
Louis : Allons à l'université ensemble, venez avec moi ! 
Chloé : Vous êtes étudiant ? 
Louis : Oui. 
Chloé : Dans quelle filière ? 
Louis : Je suis en Licence de Lettres Modernes. 
Chloé : C'est aujourd'hui mon premier jour à l'université. Je suis en Licence de lettres classiques.  
Louis : C'est bien, et vous connaissez le campus de l’Université de Franche-Comté ? 
Chloé : Je ne connais pas. Comment je peux aller à ma faculté ? 
Louis : C'est à distance de marche. Cette route mène au campus universitaire. La faculté de lettres classiques se trouve dans le bâtiment C12, sur le campus central. 
Chloé : Merci beaucoup pour votre aide. 
Louis : De rien ! Comment vous vous appelez ? 
Chloé : Je m'appelle Chloé. Et vous ? 
Louis : C'est un joli prénom ! Je m'appelle Louis. Enchanté. Au fait, tu peux me tutoyer. 
Chloé : D'accord, tu viens d'où Louis ? 
Louis : Je suis d’ici, et toi ? 
Chloé : Je viens de Grenoble. Tu habites où exactement ? 
Louis : J'habite dans une résidence étudiante Rue de Picardie. Et toi ? 
Chloé : Je suis dans un appart à la Rue de Pontarlier. 
Louis : Quel âge as-tu ? 
Chloé : J'ai 18 ans. Et toi ? 
Louis : J'ai 20 ans. Nous sommes arrivés à ta faculté ! 
Chloé : Ça te dit de prendre un café ensemble après le cours ? 
Louis : Oui, ça serait cool ! Je t'appellerai après le cours. Quel est ton numéro de téléphone ? 
Chloé : OK ! Mon numéro est le 06 14 12 67 88 
Louis : Je vais t’appeler, à bientôt ! 
Chloé : À très bientôt ! 

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	Marie : Allô.
Louis : Salut Chloé.
Marie : Pardon, avec qui est-ce que je parle ?
Louis : C’est Louis. Et vous, qui êtes-vous ?
Marie : Je suis Marie Deschamps.
Louis : Est-ce bien le 06 34 89 55 55 ?
Marie : Non. C'est le 06 34 89 55 45.
Louis : Oh, je suis désolé ! J'ai composé un mauvais numéro.
Marie : Pas de problème, au revoir !
Louis compose le bon numéro :
Chloé : Allô !
Louis : Chloé ?
Chloé : Oui.
Louis : Salut Chloé, c'est Louis.
Chloé : Salut Louis. Comment ça va?
Louis : Ça va bien merci. Et toi? 
Chloé : Je vais bien aussi, merci. 
Louis : Tu es libre aujourd'hui ?
Chloé : Oui, je suis libre.
Louis : Est-ce que tu voudrais venir au café qui est dans le campus avec moi ?
Chloé : Ça serait génial. À quelle heure ?
Louis : À une heure et demie. Est-ce que c'est bon pour toi ?
Chloé : Zut, j'ai un cours à ce moment-là. Mon cours fini a trois heures. Ça te va à trois heures? 
Louis : Oui, trois, c'est ok ! Alors on se voit au café à trois heures. À bientôt.
Chloé : À bientôt !

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
	Chloé : Bonjour tout le monde !
Louis : Salut ! Comment ça va ?
Chloé : Merci, ça va bien. Et toi ?
Louis : Moi aussi, ça va. Voici mon amie Chloé. Elle est de Dijon.
Marie : Bonjour Chloé. Moi, c’est Marie. Je viens de Bordeaux.
Olivier : Salut Chloé. Moi, c’est Olivier. Je viens de Montpellier.
Chloé : Enchantée.
Olivier : Quel âge as-tu, Chloé ?
Chloé : J’ai dix-huit ans. Et toi ?
Olivier : Dix-neuf. Mais Marie a vingt ans.
Louis : Je suis plus âgé que vous. Je suis né le 20 décembre 2002. J’ai vingt-deux ans.
Chloé : Alors, ton signe astrologique est Sagittaire.
Louis : Exactement. Et toi, quel est ton signe ?
Chloé : Mon signe est Bélier. Je suis née en avril.
Marie : Super, moi je suis Poissons. Je suis née en mars. Dis-moi Chloé, dans quelle filière étudies-tu ?
Chloé : J’étudie en Licence Pédagogie de français. Je viens de m’inscrire. Et toi ?
Marie : Moi, j’étudie en Faculté de médecine.
Chloé : Tu es en quelle semestre ?
Marie : Deuxième. Et toi ?
Olivier : Moi aussi je suis en deuxième semestre; en Linguistique.
Chloé : Moi, je suis en premier semestre.
Olivier : Chloé, que penses-tu de la Licence Pédagogie de français à Besançon ?
Chloé : Mes camarades de classe sont sympas, l’ambiance est super… Étudier ici est agréable.
Louis : Oh mon Dieu, je suis très en retard. Désolé, j’ai un cours à 14h00.
Chloé : Au revoir !
Louis:  À bientôt! 

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	Chloé : Pardon, où sont les pommes de terre ?
Vendeur : Là-bas, devant, dans le rayon des légumes.
Chloé : J’ai regardé là-bas, mais je ne les ai pas vues.
Vendeur : À droite, devant, juste à l’entrée.
Chloé : Merci, je vais regarder encore une fois.
Chloé : Ah, Louis, quelle belle coïncidence !
Louis : Oui.
Chloé : Je dois faire des courses d’urgence. Mon frigo est vide.
Louis : Je veux acheter des légumes et des fruits frais. Est-ce qu’il y a des promotions en ce moment ?
Chloé : Les pommes sont en promotion. Les pommes de Rouen. Cinq euros le kilo.
Louis : Super, un kilo s’il te plaît ! Est-ce qu’il y a des épinards ?
Chloé : Ils sont juste là-bas, à côté des oignons.
Louis : Merci beaucoup !
Chloé : Alors, as-tu acheté tout ce dont tu avais besoin ?
Louis : J’ai besoin d’un litre de lait, d’une bouteille de cola et d’une bouteille d’eau.
Chloé : Ils sont dans le rayon des boissons.
Louis : Merci.
Chloé : Tout est bon ?
Louis : Oui, merci, c’est tout. As-tu besoin de quelque chose ?
Chloé : Hm. De quoi ai-je besoin ? Une minute, je vais regarder ma liste de courses. Il me faut un kilo de riz, une botte de persil, 250 g de fromage, 100 g de salami et un pot de miel.
Louis : Quel type de salami veux-tu ?
Chloé : Du salami de dinde.
Louis : Les salamis sont à côté des produits carnés, le riz est dans le rayon des céréales, le fromage dans le rayon des fromages et le persil avec les fruits et légumes. Regarde, le miel est dans le rayon des promotions. Tu as besoin d’autre chose ?
Chloé : Non, c’est tout. On peut aller à la caisse maintenant. On a de la chance, il n’y a pas de longue file d’attente.
Vendeur : Voulez-vous un sac ?
Chloé : Non, j’ai mon sac.
Vendeur : Ça fait 50 euros.
Chloé : Tenez. Je voudrais payer par carte.
Vendeur : Votre carte est-elle sans contact ?
Chloé : Oui.
Vendeur : Passez votre carte devant le terminal.
Vendeur : Merci beaucoup. Je vous souhaite une bonne journée.
Louis : Bonne journée !
Vendeur : Bonne journée, voulez-vous un sac ?
Louis : Oui, s’il vous plaît.
Vendeur : Ça fait 45 euros 56 centimes, s’il vous plaît. Voulez-vous payer par carte ?
Louis : Je préfère payer en espèces. Tenez !
Vendeur : Voici votre monnaie : 4 euros 44.
Louis : Merci.
Chloé : Les sacs de courses sont très lourds.
Louis : Je vais t’aider jusqu’à chez toi. Donne-moi les sacs !
Chloé : Tu es sûr ?
Louis : Oui.
Chloé : Merci beaucoup pour ton aide.

TEMA	
EVDE
	Annalisa: Benvenuto!
Alberto: Grazie per l’invito. Dove posso appendere il mio cappotto?
Annalisa: Nell armadio qui.
Alberto: Grazie.
Annalisa: Siediti per favore, al tuo agio. 
Alberto: Grazie.
Annalisa: Vuoi bere un caffè oppure qualcosa di freddo?
Alberto: Prendo un caffè.
Annalisa: Con latte o senza latte?
Alberto: Senza latte.
Annalisa: Va bene, telo porto subito. Ecco il caffè senza latte per te e quello con latte per me. 
Alberto: Ooo, grazie. 
Annalisa: Di niente.
Alberto: Quanti metri quadrati è l’appartamento?
Annalisa: Cento metri quadrati.
Alberto: Non è tanto grande per te? Quante camere ci sono?
Annalisa: Penso di no. Questo appartamento è perfetto per me. È molto accogliente e tranquillo. Ci sono una sala, due camere da letto e una cucina. E poi c’è un bagno e un balcone. 
Alberto: Che bello! Com’è la posizione dell’appartamento?
Annalisa: È proprio in centro. La fermata dell’autobus e il centro commerciale sono vicini qui. 
Alberto: L’appartamento ti appartiene o l’hai affitatto? 
Annalisa: L’ho affittato.
Alberto: È caro? Quanto paga al mese?
Annalisa: No, è economico. 800 euro al mese. Il pagamento delle quote è 200 euro. Il costo del riscaldamento dipende dall’utilizzo. 
Alberto: È economico e bello. È al quarto piano ma non c’è l’ascensore. Per questo motivo è così economico. Posso visitare la casa?
Annalisa: Certo.
Alberto: Qui c’è il corridoio. Purtroppo è troppo stretto. Qui ci sono due camere a destra.
Annalisa: Le camere sono abbastanza luminose. 
Alberto: Sì, è vero. Di fronte c’è un grande soggiorno. 
Alberto: il soggiorno ha anche un balcone!
Annalisa: Sì, ma non è grande. 
Alberto: Qui è la cucina?
Annalisa: Sì, è comoda e ha vista sul fiume. 
Alberto: Qui è il bagno?
Annalisa: Sì, piccolo ma luminoso.
Alberto: C’è il garage?
Annalisa: Sì, ogni appartamento in questo condominio ha il suo garage.
Alberto: Allora, si riscalda con il gas naturale o con la stufa?
Annalisa: Si riscalda con il gas naturale.
Alberto: Si riscalda bene?
Annalisa: Sì sì, la casa ha la facciata sud ed è ben isolata.
Alberto: L’appartamento è molto bello. C’è tutto il necessario. 
Annalisa: Sono d’accordo. Sono molto contenta di questo appartamento. 
Alberto: È ora di mangiare. Hai fame? So che c’è un buon ristorante vicino qui? Mangiamo insieme?

TEMA	
RESTORANDA
	Louis : Nous y voilà enfin. Entrons.
Serveur : Bonjour, bienvenue dans notre restaurant. Avez-vous une réservation ?
Louis : Non, malheureusement pas. Avez-vous une table pour deux personnes ?
Serveur : Oui, ce n’est pas un problème. Où souhaitez-vous vous asseoir ?
Louis : Près de la fenêtre, s’il vous plaît.
Serveur : Je suis désolé, les tables près de la fenêtre sont réservées.
Chloé : Ce n’est pas grave, une table près de l’entrée nous convient.
Serveur : Un instant s’il vous plait ! Oui, la table à l’entrée est encore libre. Venez, s’il vous plaît ! C’est juste ici, dans le coin. Cette table vous convient ?
Louis : Parfait, c’est bien. Pourrions-nous avoir le menu ?
Serveur : Bien sûr. Avez-vous choisi ?
Louis : Oui, pour moi, une soupe Garbure et du coq au vin.
Serveur : Très bien. Et pour vous ? Je vous recommande le plat du jour, blanquette de veau.
Chloé : Alors je prendrai une soupe gratinée à l'oignon et une blanquette de veau.
Serveur : Parfait. Que souhaitez-vous boire ?
Chloé : Du vin, s’il vous plaît.
Louis : Pour moi, un thé.
Serveur : Voulez-vous un dessert ?
Chloé : Oui, je prendrais une île flottante, s’il vous plaît.
Louis : Pour moi, de la mousse au chocolat.
Serveur : Très bien, cela arrive tout de suite. Souhaitez-vous autre chose ?
Chloé : Non, merci.
Serveur : Voici vos plats. Bon appétit !
Louis : Merci beaucoup.
Serveur : Tout va bien ?
Chloé : Pourriez-vous m’apporter une serviette de plus ?
Louis : Et moi, je voudrais un peu plus de pain, s’il vous plaît.
Serveur : Bien sûr ! J’arrive tout de suite.
Chloé : Merci beaucoup.
Serveur : Je vous en prie. Bon appétit !
Louis : L’addition, s’il vous plaît.
Serveur : Bien sûr ! Souhaitez-vous payer ensemble ou séparément ?
Louis : Ensemble, s’il vous plaît.
Serveur : Bien sûr ! Souhaitez-vous payer en espèces ou par carte ?
Louis : Nous allons payer en espèces.
Serveur : 80 euros, s’il vous plait. 
Louis : Voici, gardez la monnaie.
Serveur : Merci beaucoup et je vous souhaite une bonne journée.
Chloé : Au revoir.
Louis : Tu as aimé le repas ?
Chloé : Oui, c’était très délicieux. On fait quoi maintenant ?
Louis : En fait, j’ai une bonne idée. Mon meilleur ami Jean se marie aujourd’hui. Le mariage est à 20h00 à Paris, et je suis invité. Tu veux m’accompagner ?
Chloé : Bien sûr, j’adorerais venir. Mais qu’est-ce que je vais porter au mariage ? J’ai besoin d’une belle robe.
Louis : Et moi, j’ai besoin d’un costume élégant.

TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	Chloé : Que penses-tu de la robe rouge en vitrine ?
Louis : Je l’aime bien. Allez, essaie-la !
Vendeur : Comment puis-je vous aider ?
Chloé : Je voudrais essayer la robe rouge en vitrine.
Vendeur : Quelle taille faites-vous ?
Chloé : Je fais du 36.
Vendeur : Très bien, suivez-moi ! Essayez cette robe.
Chloé : Où puis-je l’essayer ?
Vendeur : Les cabines d’essayage sont là-bas. La robe vous plaît-elle ?
Chloé : La couleur est parfaite. Mais elle ne me va pas. Avez-vous une taille au-dessus ?
Vendeur : Nous avons une taille 38.
Chloé : D’accord, je vais l’essayer.
Chloé : Est-ce que la robe me va ?
Louis : Elle te va très bien.
Chloé : Je l’aime aussi. Combien coûte-t-elle ?
Vendeur : Elle coûte 400 euros.
Chloé : Elle est très élégante. J’aime bien la couleur et elle me va parfaitement. Je la prends.
Vendeur : Avez-vous besoin d’autre chose ?
Louis : Oui, je cherche un costume. Où se trouvent les costumes ?
Vendeur : Au deuxième étage.
Louis : Ce costume est élégant, mais il coûte 1000 euros. C’est trop cher. Peut-être que je trouverai quelque chose de moins cher. Ah, il y a des promotions là-bas. Ce costume est très beau, mais il ne m’ira pas, il est trop serré. Excusez-moi, avez-vous une taille au-dessus de celui-ci ?
Vendeur : Essayez celui-ci.
Louis : Merci. Celui-ci est parfait.
Vendeur : Avez-vous besoin d’autre chose ?
Louis : Avez-vous des nœuds papillon ?
Vendeur : Bien sûr ! Ils sont là-bas. Aujourd’hui, les nœuds papillon et les cravates sont à moitié prix.
Louis : Hmm, je vais prendre un nœud papillon pour aller avec ce costume. Quelle couleur ira le mieux ?
Vendeur : Je pense que celui-ci ira parfaitement.
Louis : Je le prends.
Vendeur : Avez-vous besoin d’autre chose ?
Louis : Non, merci.
Vendeur : Bonne journée !

TEMA	
GARDA
	Louis : Nous avons fini nos achats. Maintenant, nous pouvons partir pour Paris.
Chloé : D’accord.
Louis : La gare est juste là. Allons acheter nos billets pour Paris. Mais où peut-on les acheter ?
Chloé : Nous pouvons acheter les billets au guichet.
Louis : Bonjour, je voudrais deux billets pour Paris.
Employé : Aller simple ?
Louis : Aller-retour, s’il vous plaît.
Employé : Quand souhaitez-vous voyager ?
Louis : Nous voulons prendre le premier train.
Employé : Le premier train part dans quinze minutes.
Louis : Cela nous convient.
Employé : Cela fera 120 euros. Souhaitez-vous payer par carte ?
Louis : Non, je vais payer en espèces. Tenez.
Employé : Voici vos billets et votre monnaie, 80 euros.
Louis : Merci ! Le train risque-t-il d’être en retard ?
Employé : Non, il arrivera à l’heure.
Louis : Merci beaucoup.
Employé : Au revoir !
Annonce : Mesdames et Messieurs, votre attention s'il vous plaît. Le train à destination de Paris Montparnasse, va partir voie…
Chloé : Le train part bientôt. Montons.
Louis : Allons-y et trouvons nos places.
Chloé : Voici nos sièges.
Annonce : Prochaine station : Gare de Montparnasse.
Louis : Chloé, lève-toi, nous descendons ici. Trouvons maintenant un hôtel convenable. Allons vers le centre-ville.
Chloé : Ah, regarde !
Chloé : Cet hôtel est vraiment beau de l’extérieur.
Louis : Cet hôtel 5 étoiles au centre de Paris doit avoir de jolies chambres avec vue.
Chloé : Oui, entrons voir.

TEMA	
OTELDE
	Réceptionniste : Bonjour, bienvenue à l’Hôtel de Paris !
Louis : Bonjour, nous aimerions avoir deux chambres, s’il vous plaît.
Réceptionniste : Bien sûr, pour combien de nuits ?
Louis : Juste pour une nuit.
Réceptionniste : Très bien. Nous avons des chambres disponibles. Souhaitez-vous une chambre double ?
Louis : Non, nous voulons deux chambres simples. Le petit déjeuner est inclus ?
Réceptionniste : Oui, inclus.
Louis : Y a-t-il Internet dans les chambres ?
Réceptionniste : Oui, toutes les chambres disposent d’Internet, d’une salle de bain, de toilettes, d’un téléphone, d’une télévision, d’un réfrigérateur et de la climatisation.
Louis : Parfait, nous prenons les chambres.
Réceptionniste : Très bien, puis-je voir vos pièces d’identité ?
Louis : Bien sûr, les voici.
Réceptionniste : Merci. Veuillez remplir ce formulaire avec votre nom, adresse, date de naissance et nationalité.
Louis : Voilà !
Réceptionniste : Et signez ici, s’il vous plaît.
Louis : C’est fait.
Réceptionniste : Comment souhaitez-vous payer ?
Louis : Par carte bancaire. Voici ma carte.
Réceptionniste : Le paiement est effectué. Voici vos clés. Vos numéros de chambre sont 104 et 105.
Louis : À quel étage sont-elles ?
Réceptionniste : Au premier étage, juste à droite en sortant de l’ascenseur.
Louis : À quelle heure est servi le petit déjeuner ?
Réceptionniste : Le petit déjeuner est servi de 7h00 à 10h00 dans la salle à manger, au rez-de-chaussée. Vous pouvez également demander à être servi votre petit déjeuner en chambre. 
Louis : Merci beaucoup. Puis-je vous poser une dernière question ? Quels autres services proposez-vous dans l’hôtel ?
Réceptionniste : Nous mettons à la disposition de nos clients un restaurant, un bar, un salon de coiffure ainsi qu'une piscine. 
Louis : Très bien. À quelle heure devons-nous quitter la chambre ?
Réceptionniste : À midi.
Louis : Merci beaucoup.
Réceptionniste : Je vous en prie.
Louis : Encore merci.
Réceptionniste : Passez un bon séjour. Le bagagiste vous montrera vos chambres.
Louis : Parfait ! Au revoir.
Réceptionniste : Au revoir !
Louis : Oh là la, quelle belle chambre !
Chloé : Cet hôtel à Paris est incroyable ! Les chambres sont magnifiques, propres et les lits sont confortables. En plus, il est très bien situé, à seulement quelques mètres des Champs-Élysées.
Louis : Et la vue depuis la fenêtre est superbe.
Chloé : Reposons-nous un peu, puis allons explorer la ville ensemble.
Louis : On se retrouve à 17h00 dans le hall ?
Chloé : Oui, oui, ça me va.
Louis : Parfait, rendez-vous à 17h00 à la réception. À tout à l’heure !
Chloé : D’accord, à tout à l’heure !
Louis : Il est temps de découvrir la ville. Tu es prête pour la visite ?
Chloé : Oui, oui, je suis prête.
Louis : Nous aurons assez de temps pour voir beaucoup d’endroits célèbres à Paris.

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	Chloé : Par où commence notre visite ? Qu’est-ce qui est célèbre à Paris ?
Louis : J’ai regardé sur Internet et trouvé des informations sur les endroits touristiques de Paris. Notre tour commence par Montmartre.
Chloé : Ce n’est pas le quartier historique et artistique de Paris ?
Louis : Exactement. Un autre site touristique célèbre est la cathédrale Notre-Dame de Paris. Elle a été construite au XIIᵉ siècle.
Chloé : Génial !
Louis : Mais aucun monument à Paris n’est aussi célèbre que la tour Eiffel. Elle a été inaugurée en 1889.
Chloé : Quels sont les plats célèbres de Paris ?
Louis : Les plats les plus connus sont le croque-monsieur, la soupe à l’oignon et le steak-frites. Paris est l’une des plus belles villes du monde.
Chloé : Je suis entièrement d’accord avec toi.
Louis : Le soleil est en train de se coucher. Dépêchons-nous pour ne pas être en retard au mariage. Tu es ravissante dans cette tenue.
Chloé : Merci ! Tu es très élégant dans ce costume.
Louis : Merci beaucoup ! Tu es prête à profiter un peu?
Chloé : Oui, je suis prête.
Louis : Allons-y !

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	Jean : Ah, Louis, quelle belle surprise de te voir ici ! Bienvenue.
Louis : Je vous souhaite, à toi et à ton épouse, beaucoup de bonheur.
Chloé : Félicitations !
Jean : Merci beaucoup !
Louis : Nous avons un cadeau pour vous.
Jean : Oh, merci beaucoup.
Chloé : Louis, j’adore cette chanson.
Louis : Tu veux danser avec moi ?
Chloé : Avec plaisir.
Louis : C’est la chanson de qui ?
Chloé : C’est la chanson “Éternellement” de Tragédie. J’aime beaucoup cette chanson.
Louis : La chanson est vraiment belle. Quel genre de musique aimes-tu écouter ?
Chloé : J’aime tout écouter, de la musique classique à la pop. Et toi, quel style de musique préfères-tu ?
Louis : Généralement du rock.
Chloé : Quelle est ta chanson préférée ?
Louis : J’en ai beaucoup. L’une d’elles est “Un jour en France” de Bertrand Cantat.
Chloé : Les chansons de Bertrand Cantat sont magnifiques.
Louis : Je vais me chercher une boisson. Tu veux quelque chose ?
Chloé : Oui, du vin rouge, s’il te plaît.
Louis : Je t’apporte ça tout de suite. Tiens !
Chloé : Merci beaucoup !
Jean : Vous vous amusez bien ?
Louis : Oui, on s’amuse beaucoup.
Jean : Comment vous êtes-vous rencontrés ?
Louis : Nous étudions dans la même université.
Jean : C’est super !
Chloé : Et toi, comment connais-tu Louis ?
Jean : Nous sommes amis d’enfance. Nous avons grandi ensemble.
Chloé : Dit, comment as-tu rencontré ton épouse ?
Jean : Nous nous sommes rencontrés en 2011 grâce à un ami commun. Cela fait douze ans que nous sommes ensemble.
Chloé : C’est merveilleux !
Jean : Allez, venez danser !
Chloé : C’était vraiment une soirée inoubliable ! Je n’ai jamais autant dansé de ma vie ! Hé, Louis, qu’est-ce qui t’arrive ?
Louis : Je ne me sens pas bien.
Chloé : Qu’est-ce qui ne va pas ? Tu as mal quelque part ?
Louis : J’ai des nausées.
Chloé : Tu devrais aller voir un médecin.
Louis : Non, ça va, ce n’est rien.
Chloé : Comment ça « ce n’est rien » ? Allez, Louis, nous allons à l’hôpital.

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	Secrétaire : Comment puis-je vous aider ?
Louis : Bonjour, je m’appelle Louis Deschamps, voici ma carte d’identité !
Secrétaire : Veuillez patienter ici, nous vous appellerons.
Docteur : Louis Deschamps, entrez, s’il vous plaît. Quel est votre problème ?
Louis : Bonjour, Docteur. Je me sens très mal. J’ai des nausées et la tête qui tourne.
Docteur : Depuis quand ?
Louis : Depuis environ une heure.
Docteur : Qu’avez-vous mangé ou bu ?
Louis : J’ai mangé des amuse-gueules à un mariage et bu trop d’alcool.
Docteur : Cela pourrait être la cause de vos symptômes. Je vais vous examiner plus en détail. Allongez-vous sur la table d’examen et tournez-moi le dos. Inspirez profondément et expirez. Avez-vous d’autres symptômes ?
Louis : Oui, j’ai un peu froid.
Docteur : D’accord. Je vais prendre votre température. 37,5 degrés. Vous n’avez pas de fièvre. Ouvrez la bouche, s’il vous plaît. Tout semble en ordre. Votre gorge n’est pas rouge. Maintenant, je vais prendre votre tension. Relevez votre manche, s’il vous plaît. 130 sur 90. Votre tension est légèrement élevée. Je vais également vérifier vos valeurs sanguines. Je vais vous faire une prise de sang. C’est bon ! Appuyez fermement sur le coton, s’il vous plaît.
Docteur : D’après les résultats, vous avez probablement une intoxication alimentaire. Je vais vous mettre sous perfusion. Je vous prescris aussi un médicament à prendre deux fois par jour pendant une semaine. Je vous accorde un arrêt de travail de deux jours.
Louis : D’accord, merci beaucoup, Docteur !
Docteur : Bon rétablissement !
Chloé : Tu te sens mieux maintenant, Louis ?
Louis : Oui, beaucoup mieux. Mais maintenant, il nous faut trouver une pharmacie ouverte.
Chloé : Attends une minute, je regarde sur Internet. Voilà, j’ai trouvé. La pharmacie la plus proche est à environ 500 mètres.
Louis : Nous pouvons y aller à pied.
Chloé : Allez, viens.
Louis : Nous voilà enfin arrivés à la pharmacie.

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	Pharmacien : Comment puis-je vous aider ?
Louis : Le médecin m’a prescrit un médicament. Voici l’ordonnance.
Pharmacien : Je vais vérifier si nous avons ce médicament en stock.
Louis : Merci, j’attends.
Pharmacien : Oui, nous l’avons.
Louis : Comment dois-je prendre ce médicament ?
Pharmacien : Laissez-moi consulter la notice. Prenez ce médicament deux fois par jour : un comprimé le matin et un autre le soir. Vous devez le prendre pendant une semaine.
Louis : Avant ou après les repas ?
Pharmacien : À jeun.
Louis : Y a-t-il des effets secondaires ?
Pharmacien : Non, mais ne le prenez pas plus d’une semaine.
Louis : D’accord. Combien y a-t-il de comprimés dans une boîte ?
Pharmacien : Il y en a 25. Avez-vous besoin d’autre chose ?
Louis : Non, merci. Combien coûte la boîte ?
Pharmacien : Elle coûte 50 euros 90 centimes.
Louis : Très bien, je la prends. Voici ma carte bancaire.
Pharmacien : Veuillez entrer votre code, s’il vous plaît. Merci, bon rétablissement.
Louis : Merci beaucoup. Au revoir.
Louis : C’est déjà le matin. Nous devons retourner à l’hôtel pour faire le check-out.
Chloé : L’heure du départ est à 12h00. En passant, nous pourrions aller à la banque pour retirer de l’argent.
Louis : Tu ne peux pas retirer de l’argent à un distributeur ?
Chloé : Malheureusement, le GAB a avalé ma carte bancaire.
Louis : Dans ce cas, allons vite à la banque. 

TEMA	
BANKADA
	Banquier : Comment puis-je vous aider ?
Chloé : Je m’appelle Chloé Petit. Le GAB a avalé ma carte bancaire.
Banquier : Avez-vous saisi un mauvais code à plusieurs reprises ?
Chloé : Oui, j’ai saisi mon code trois fois de suite incorrectement.
Banquier : Je vois. Pour des raisons de sécurité, le distributeur a retenu votre carte. Vous devez annuler votre carte actuelle et en demander une nouvelle.
Chloé : D’accord. Comment puis-je demander une nouvelle carte bancaire, et combien cela coûte-t-il ?
Banquier : L’annulation est gratuite, mais le renouvellement de la carte coûte 12 euros.
Chloé : D’accord.
Banquier : Avez-vous votre pièce d’identité ? J’aurai besoin de votre nom, adresse et date de naissance.
Chloé : Oui, la voici.
Banquier : Veuillez remplir et signer ce formulaire, s’il vous plaît !
Chloé : C’est fait.
Banquier : Nous vous enverrons votre carte à votre adresse.
Chloé : Quand arrivera-t-elle ?
Banquier : Cela prendra environ deux semaines.
Chloé : Merci beaucoup. J’ai encore une demande : je souhaite retirer de l’argent de mon compte.
Banquier : Bien sûr. Quel est votre numéro de client ?
Chloé : 123456.
Banquier : Combien souhaitez-vous retirer ?
Chloé : Je voudrais retirer 200 euros.
Banquier : Très bien. Voici votre argent.
Chloé : Merci beaucoup. Est-ce que je pourrais aussi connaître mon solde?
Banquier : Bien sûr ! Votre solde actuel est de 1000 euros.
Chloé : Merci infiniment.
Banquier : Y a-t-il autre chose que je puisse faire pour vous ?
Chloé : Non, ça ira, merci.
Chloé : Nous avons fini toutes nos démarches. Il est temps de quitter l’hôtel. Le train pour Besançon part à 12h00.
Louis : Nous avons vraiment passé un bon moment. Il est temps de rentrer à la maison.
 
 
 









































































EK-5 Diyaloglar ile İtalyancaTematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 

TEMA	
YOLDA
	Annalisa: Mi scusi, sono nuova in questa città.  Come posso andare all’università di Roma Sapienza? 
Alberto: L’università di Roma Sapienza si trova a Tiburtino in piazzale Aldo Moro. 
Annalisa: È lontana da qui? 
Alberto: No, è vicina. Può andare a piedi. Ci vogliono circa quindici minuti.  
Annalisa: Allora, come posso andare a Tiburtino? 
Alberto: Tanto facile. Vada dritto in questa strada fino all’incrocio. Giri a sinistra all’incrocio e poi continui circa per 500 metri fino alla via Bari. Attraversi la strada e giri subito a destra in via Forli. Cammini dritto, vedrà un parco a destra. Giri a destra al semaforo. Prenda la via Universitaria e all’incrocio giri a sinistra in Via del Castro Laurenziano. C’è lì l’Università di Roma Sapienza.  
Annalisa: Allora, dritto, a sinistra all’incrocio, dritto fino alla via Bari e poi a sinistra. Al semaforo a destra e poi …. Non ho capito.  
Alberto: Allora, andiamo insieme all’università, venga con me! 
Annalisa: Lei è studente? 
Alberto: Sì. 
Annalisa: Che cosa studia? 
Alberto: La lingua e la letteratura italiana.  
Annalisa: Oggi è il mio primo giorno all’università. Studio l’insegnamento di italiano.  
Alberto: Bene, allora conosce la Sede Universitaria? 
Annalisa: Non lo conosco. Come posso andare alla facoltà? 
Alberto: È possibile andare a piedi. Questa strada porta alla Sede Universitaria. Il dipartimento di italianistica all’università di Roma Sapienza è presso la Facoltà di Lettere nell’edificio C12.  
Annalisa: Grazie per il Suo aiuto. 
Alberto: Prego, come si chiama Lei? 
Annalisa: Mi chiamo Annalisa e Lei? 
Alberto: Un bel nome. Sono Alberto, piacere. E a proposito, Le dispiace se ci diamo del tu? 
Annalisa: Va bene. Di dove sei, Alberto? 
Alberto: Sono di qui. E tu? 
Annalisa: Di Milano. Dove abiti qui? 
Alberto: Abito in un appartamento condiviso in via Catania. E tu? 
Annalisa: Io invece abito in un appartamento a Trastevere.  
Alberto: Quanti anni hai? 
Annalisa: Ho 18 anni, e tu? 
Alberto: Ne ho venti. Siamo arrivati alla tua facoltà! 
Annalisa: Ti va di bere un caffè insieme dopo la lezione? 
Alberto: Sì, volentieri. Ti chiamo dopo la lezione. Qual è il tuo numero di telefono? 
Annalisa: D’accordo. Il mio è 1782255555 
Alberto: Ti chiamerò. A più tardi.  
Annalisa: Ciao!

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	Maria: Pronto!
Alberto: Ciao Annalisa!
Maria: Mi scusi, chi parla?  
Alberto: Sono Alberto, e Lei? 
Maria: Io sono Maria Rossi. 
Alberto: Il numero non è 39 178 225 55 55? 
Maria: No, questo numero è 39 178 225 55 45.  
Alberto: Oh mi scusi, ho sbagliato il numero.  
Maria: Non c’è problema. Buona giornata!  
Alberto compone il numero corretto.
Annalisa: Pronto! 
Alberto: Annalisa? 
Annalisa: Sì. 
Alberto: Salve Annalisa, sono Alberto.  
Annalisa: Ciao Alberto. Come va?
Alberto: Bene grazie e tu?
Annalisa: Anch'io sto bene, grazie.
Alberto: Senti, hai tempo oggi?
Annalisa: Sì, ce l’ho. 
Alberto: Ti va di venire con me al bar nel campus?  
Annalisa: Sarebbe benissimo. A che ora?  
Alberto: All’una e mezza. Va bene? 
Annalisa: Mi dispiace ho una lezione a quell'ora. Finisce alle tre. È possibile vederci alle tre?
Alberto: Sì, va bene. Allora ci vediamo alle tre.
Annalisa: A presto.

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
	Annalisa: Ciao a tutti!
Alberto: Ciao, come va?
Annalisa: Bene, grazie. E tu?
Alberto: Anch’io sto bene. Questa è la mia amica Annalisa. È di Milano. 
Beatrice: Ciao Annalisa, sono Beatrice, di Siena. 
Michele: Ciao Annalisa, sono Michele, di Perugia. 
Annalisa: Piacere.
Michele: Tu quanti anni hai, Annalisa?
Annalisa: Ho diciotto anni. E tu?
Michele: Ho diciannove anni però Beatrice ne ha venti.
Alberto: Sono più grande di voi. Sono nato il venti dicembre 2002. Ho ventidue anni. 
Annalisa: Allora il tuo segno è il Sagittario. 
Alberto: È vero. Tu di che segno sei? 
Annalisa: Sono un Ariete. Sono nata ad aprile. 
Beatrice: Bene, io sono un Pesci, sono nata a Marzo. Allora che cosa studi, Annalisa?
Annalisa: Studio l’insegnamento di italiano. Mi sono appena iscritta. E tu?
Beatrice: Studio la medicina.
Annalisa: A che semestre sei? 
Beatrice: Al quarto. E tu?
Michele: Sono al secondo semestre del dipartimento di linguistica. 
Annalisa: Sono al primo semestre. 
Michele: Cosa pensi al dipartimento di insegnamento di italiano a Roma?
Annalisa: I miei compagni di classe sono bravi, l’ambiente è molto sincero… È bello studiare qui. 
Alberto: Mio dio, Faccio troppo tardi. Scusate, ho una lezione alle due. 
Annalisa: A presto!
Alberto: Ci vediamo! 

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	Annalisa: Scusi, dove sono le patate?
Commesso: Là, avanti, nel reparto delle verdure. 
Annalisa: Ci ho guardato ma non sono riuscita a vederle. 
Commesso: davanti, a destra, proprio all’ingresso. 
Annalisa: Va bene, vado a cercare ancora una volta. 
Annalisa: Ah, Alberto, che bella coincidenza!
Alberto: Certo.
Annalisa: Devo fare necessariamente la spesa, il frigo è vuoto. 
Alberto: Voglio comprare verdura e frutta fresca. C’è qualcosa in offerte speciali  adesso?
Annalisa: Le mele sono  in offerte. Le mele di Trentino. Cinque Euro al chilo. 
Alberto: Bene, allora ne compro un chilo. E poi compro degli spinaci.
Annalisa: Sono là, di fronte, accanto alle cipolle. 
Alberto: Grazie mille, ne compro un chilo e mezzo.
Annalisa: Allora, hai comprato tutto quello che vuoi?
Alberto: Ho bisogno di un litro di latte, una lattina di coca e una bottiglia d’acqua. 
Annalisa: Questi sono nel reparto delle bevande.
Alberto: Grazie.
Annalisa: Va bene così?
Alberto: Sì, grazie. Va bene così. Hai bisogno di qualcosa?
Annalisa: Hmm, che cosa mi serve? Un momento, controllo la lista della spesa. Mi servono un chilo di riso, un mazzetto di prezzemolo, 250 grammi di formaggio, 100 grammi di salame, un barattolo di miele. 
Alberto: Quale salame vuoi?
Annalisa: Della mortadella.
Alberto: I salami si trovano accanto ai prodotti di carne, il riso invece si trova accanto al grano, il formaggio è nel reparto dei formaggi e il prezzemolo è accanto alle verdure e frutte. Guarda, il miele si trova nel reparto di offerte speciali. Ti serve qualcos’altro?
Annalisa: No, basta così. Ci accomodiamo alla cassa. Siamo fortunati, non c’è la fila lunga per la cassa. 
La cassiera: Vorrebbe una busta?
Annalisa: No, ho una borsa. 
La cassiera: Tutto costa 50 euro. 
Annalisa: Ecco qui, voglio pagare con la carta di credito.
La cassiera: La Sua carta è contactless? (senza contatto)
Annalisa: Sì
La cassiera: Lei appoggi la carta al lettore.
Annalisa: grazie mille, buona giornata. 
Alberto: Buon giorno!
La cassiera: buon giorno, vuole una busta?
Alberto, sì, per favore.
La cassiera: Costa 45 euro e 56. Vorrebbe pagare con la carta di credito o in contanti?
Alberto: Vorrei pagare in contanti, per cortesia!
La cassiera: Il resto è 4 euro e 44. Buona giornata!
Alberto: Grazie, altrettanto!
Annalisa: Le borse della spesa sono troppo pesanti. 
Alberto: Ti do una mano fino a casa. Lasciami portarle!
Annalisa: Sei certo?
Alberto: Sì.
Annalisa: Grazie del tuo aiuto.

TEMA	
EVDE
	Annalisa: benvenuto!
Alberto: grazie per l’invito. Dove posso appendere il mio cappotto?
Annalisa: nell'armadio qui.
Alberto: Grazie
Annalisa: Siediti per favore, al tuo agio. 
Alberto: Grazie.
Annalisa: Vuoi bere un caffè oppure qualcosa di freddo?
Alberto: Prendo un caffè.
Annalisa: Con latte o senza latte?
Alberto: Senza latte.
Annalisa: va bene, telo porto subito. Ecco il caffè senza latte per te e quello con latte per me. 
Alberto: ohh, grazie. 
Annalisa: Di niente.
Alberto: Quanti metri quadrati è l’appartamento?
Annalisa: Cento metri quadrati.
Alberto: Non è tanto grande per te? Quante camere ci sono?
Annalisa: penso di no. Questo appartamento è perfetto per me. È molto accogliente e tranquillo. Ci sono una sala, due camere da letto e una cucina. E poi c’è un bagno e un balcone. 
Alberto: Che bello! Com’è la posizione dell’appartamento?
Annalisa: È proprio in centro. La fermata dell’autobus e il centro commerciale sono vicini qui. 
Alberto: L’appartamento ti appartiene o l’hai affitatto? 
Annalisa: L’ho affittato.
Alberto: È caro? Quanto paghi al mese?
Annalisa: No, è economico. 800 euro al mese. Il pagamento delle quote è 200 euro. Il costo del riscaldamento dipende dall’utilizzo. 
Alberto: È economico e bello. È al quarto piano ma non c’è l’ascensore. Per questo motivo è così economico. Posso visitare la casa?
Annalisa: Certo.
Alberto: Qui c’è il corridoio. Purtroppo è troppo stretto. Qui ci sono due camere a destra.
Annalisa: Le camere sono abbastanza luminose. 
Alberto: Sì, è vero. Di fronte c’è un grande soggiorno. 
Alberto: il soggiorno ha anche un balcone!
Annalisa: Sì, ma non è grande. 
Alberto: Qui è la cucina?
Annalisa: Sì, è comoda e ha vista sul fiume. 
Alberto: Qui è il bagno?
Annalisa: Sì, piccolo ma luminoso.
Alberto: C’è il garage?
Annalisa: Sì, ogni appartamento in questo condominio ha il suo garage.
Alberto: Allora, si riscalda con il gas naturale o con la stufa?
Annalisa: Si riscalda con il gas naturale.
Alberto: Si riscalda bene?
Annalisa: Sì sì, la casa ha la facciata sud ed è ben isolata.
Alberto: L’appartamento è molto bello. C’è tutto il necessario. 
Annalisa: Sono d’accordo. Sono molto contenta di questo appartamento. 
Alberto: È ora di mangiare. Hai fame? So che c’è un buon ristorante vicino qui? Mangiamo insieme?
Annalisa: Ho una fame da lupo! 
Alberto: Allora dai, andiamo a mangiare! 
TEMA	RESTORANDA
Alberto: Finalmente siamo arrivati. Dai, entriamo dentro.
Il cameriere: Buon giorno, benvenuti al ristorante. Avete prenotazione? 
Alberto: Purtroppo no. Avete un tavolo libero per due?
Il cameriere: Sì, non c’è problema. Dove vorreste sedervi?
Alberto: Vicino alla finestra, per favore.
Il cameriere: Mi dispiace ma i tavoli vicino alla finestra sono prenotati. 
Annalisa: Allora un qualsiasi tavolo vicino all’ingresso ci va bene.
Il cameriere: Un attimo! Sì il tavolo all’ingresso è libero. Prego, per favore. Qui subito il tavolo all’angolo. Questo va bene?
Alberto: Va bene. Possiamo prendere il menù?
Il cameriere: Certo, avete deciso?
Alberto: Per me un minestrone e una bistecca alla fiorentina. 
Il cameriere: Certo, E Lei Signora? Le consiglio i tortellini in brodo, la specialità del giorno, 
Annalisa: Allora prendo una zuppa di verdura e i tortellini in brodo.
Il cameriere: E da bere?
Annalisa: Una spremuta di frutta, per cortesia.
Alberto: Per me una coca.
Il cameriere: prendono il dolce?
Annalisa: Sì, desidero un tiramisù.
Alberto: Una panna cotta per favore.
Il cameriere: Ve li porto subito. Desiderano qualcos’altro?
Annalisa: No, grazie.
Il cameriere: Eccoli, anche il Suo cibo è qui.  Buon appetito.
Alberto: Grazie.
Il cameriere: C’è qualcosa che manca?
Annalisa: Mi può portare ancora un tovagliolo?
Alberto: Io vorrei ancora del pane.
Il cameriere: Certo, vi porto subito.
Annalisa: Grazie.
Il cameriere: Prego, buon appetito.
Alberto: Ci porta il conto?
Il cameriere: Certo! Vorrebbe pagare separatamente o tutto?
Alberto: Pago io tutto, per favore. 
Il cameriere: Va bene, paga con la carta?
Alberto: No, In contanti.
Il cameriere: 80 euro in totale.
Alberto: Ecco, tenga il resto.
Il cameriere: Grazie, buona giornata
Annalisa: Buona giornata.
Alberto: Ti sono piaciuti i cibi?
Annalisa: Sì, i cibi erano molto buoni. Allora che cosa facciamo adesso?
Alberto: Ho una buona idea. Il mio migliore amico Andrea si sposa oggi. Il matrimonio è alle otto a Firenze e sono invitato anch’io. Vuoi venire con me al matrimonio?
Annalisa: Sì, vengo volentieri. Però che cosa mi vesto al matrimonio? Ho bisogno di un bel vestito. 
Alberto: E anche io ho bisogno di un abito elegante da uomo. 

TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	Annalisa: Com’è il vestito rosso in vetrina?
Alberto: Mi è piaciuto. Dai, provalo!
La commessa: Come vi posso aiutare?
Annalisa: Vorrei provare il vestito rosso in vetrina. 
La commessa: Che taglia porta?
Annalisa: porto la taglia 36.
La commessa: va bene, viene con me e provi questo vestito!
Annalisa: Dove posso provarlo?
La commessa: I camerini sono là. Le è piaciuto il vestito?
Annalisa: Il colore rosso va bene ma non mi sta bene la taglia. C'è quella più grande? 
La commessa: C’è ne una dalla taglia 38. 
Annalisa: Va bene, lo provo.
Annalisa: Mi sta bene questo vestito?
Alberto: Ti sta molto bene.
Annalisa: Anche a me è piaciuto. Quanto costa?
La commessa: costa 400 euro.
Annalisa: È molto elegante. Mi è piaciuto il colore. Mi è stato a pennello. Lo compro.
La commessa: Qualcos’altro?
Alberto: Sì, cerco un abito da uomo. Dove posso trovare?
La commessa: Al secondo piano.
Alberto: Questo abito da uomo è molto elegante ma costa 1000 euro. Troppo caro. Forse posso trovare quello più economico. Ah, c’è qualcosa in saldo lì. Questo abito è molto bello ma non mi sta bene, troppo stretto. Scusi, C’è una taglia più grande di questo abito?
La commessa: Provi l’abito qui.
Alberto: Grazie. Questo va bene.
La commessa: Qualcos’altro?
Alberto: Avete papillone?
La commessa: Certo! C’è. Oggi c’è uno sconto del cinquanta per cento su papillon e cravatte. 
Alberto: Compro un papillon nuovo per questo abito. Che colore va bene all’abito?
La commessa: Va proprio bene questo papillon.
Alberto: Lo acquisto.
La commessa: C’è qualcos’altro che cerca?
Alberto: No, grazie.
La commessa: A presto!

TEMA	
GARDA
	Alberto: Abbiamo fatto spese. Ormai possiamo andare a Firenze. 
Annalisa: Va bene.
Alberto: La stazione ferroviaria è laggiù. Compriamo i nostri biglietti per Firenze. Ma dove possiamo comprare i biglietti?
Annalisa: Possimo acquistarli alla biglietteria. 
Alberto: Buon giorno, vorrei comprare due biglietti per Firenze. 
L’impiegato: Solo andata?
Alberto: Andata e ritorno, per favore.
L’impiegato: Per quando?
Alberto: Vorremmo prendere subito il prossimo treno.
L’impiegato: Il prossimo treno parte fra quindici minuti. 
Alberto: Ci va.
L’impiegato: Costa 120 Euro. Paga con la carta di credito?
Alberto: No, pago in contanti. Ecco.
L’impiegato: Ecco i vostri biglietti e il resto di 80 euro. 
Alberto: Grazie! Il treno fa tardi?
L’impiegato: No, arriva in tempo. 
Alberto: Grazie.
L’impiegato: Buona giornata!
L’annuncio: Attenzione! Il treno per Firenze sta per partire!
Annalisa: Il treno parte fra poco. Lo prendiamo.
Alberto: Andiamo e troviamo i nostri posti.
Annalisa: Questi sono i nostri posti.
L’annuncio: La prossimo stazione: La stazione ferroviaria di Firenze. 
Alberto: Annalisa, dai, scendiamo qui. Troviamo un buon albergo. Vieni, andiamo in centro.
Annalisa: Aaa, guarda!
Annalisa: Questo albergo sembra molto bello dall’esterno. 
Alberto: Questo albergo a cinque stelle nel centro di Firenze deve avere camere con viste spettacolari. 
Annalisa: Sì, allora ci entriamo. 

TEMA	
OTELDE
	Il reception: Buon giorno, Benvenuti in albergo Firenze.
Alberto: Buongiorno, vorremmo due camere.
Il reception: Certo, quante notti rimanete?
Alberto: Solo una notte.
Il reception: Va bene. Abbiamo camere. Vorreste una camera doppia?
Alberto: No, vorremmo due camere singole.
Il reception: La colazione è compresa?
Alberto: Sì, è compresa. C’è la connessione wifi nelle camere?
Il reception: Sì, in tutte camere ci sono la connesione wifi, il bagno, il telefono, la tv, il frigobar e l’aria condizionata.
Alberto: Va bene, vorremmo le camere. 
Il reception: Va bene, posso vedere le vostre carte di identità?
Alberto: Sì, certo. 
Il reception: Grazie, compilate questo modulo, per favore. Scrivete il nome, l’indirizzo, la data di nascita e la nazionalità. 
Alberto: Ecco qui!
Il reception: E firmate qui.
Alberto: Tutto va bene.
Il reception: Come volete fare il pagamento?
Alberto: Vorrei pagare con la carta di credito. 
Il reception: Il pagamento è effettuato. Ecco le vostre chiavi. I numeri delle camere sono 104 e 105. 
Alberto: A che piano?
Il reception: Al primo piano. Quando scendi dall’ascensore, subito a destra. 
Alberto: Quando comincia la colazione?
Il reception: La colazione è dalle sette alle dieci in sala da mangiare. La sala da mangiare è al piano terra. È possibile richiedere la colazione in camera.
Alberto: Grazie. Posso fare un’altro domanda. Quali altri servizi ci sono in albergo? 
Il reception: Abbiamo un ristorante, un bar, un parrucchiere e una piscina per i nostri clienti.
Alberto: Benissimo. A che ora si lascia la camera?
Il reception: Alle dodici.
Alberto: Grazie mille.
Il reception: Prego.
Alberto: Grazie ancora.
Il reception: Vi auguro un buon riposo.  Il portiere vi accompagna fino alle vostre camere. 
Alberto: Va bene, a presto.
Il reception: Buona giornata!
Alberto: ooo, che bella camera!
Annalisa: Un ottimo albergo a Firenze! Le camere sono belle, pulite e i letti sono comodi. Ha una bella posizione, è a pochi metri dalla piazza della Signoria. 
Alberto: E poi la camera ha una vista spettacolare.
Annalisa: Prima ci riposiamo un’po poi andiamo a girare insieme per la città. 
Alberto: Ci incontiramo alle cinque?
Annalisa: Sì sì, mi va bene. 
Alberto: Allora, alle cinque ci incontriamo alla reception. A più tardi.
Annalisa: D’accordo. Ci vediamo.
Alberto: È ora di visitare la città! Sei pronta a girare?
Annalisa: Sì sì. Sono pronta.
Alberto: Abbiamo abbastanza tempo per vedere tanti luoghi a Firenze. 

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	Annalisa: Da dove comincia il nostro viaggio? Per che cosa è famosa Firenze?
Alberto: Ho navigato sull’internet e ho avuto informazioni sui luoghi turistici a Firenze. Il nostro giro della città comincia dalla Piazza della Signoria. 
Annalisa: Non è il centro antico della città Firenze?
Alberto: È vero. Un altro posto turistico di Firenze è il Palazzo Vecchio. È stato costruito nel 1299. 
Annalisa: Perfetto!
Alberto: Però a Firenze nessun edificio è così famoso come la Cattedrale di Firenze. È stata costruita fra il 1296 e il 1436.
Annalisa: Allora, quali cibi sono famosi a Firenze?
Alberto: I cibi più famosi sono Bistecca alla Fiorentina, Lampredotto e Schiacciata Fiorentina. 
Firenze è una delle città più belle di Italia. 
Annalisa: Sono esattamente d’accordo con te. 
Alberto: Tramonta il sole. Sbrighiamoci. Sei molto bella in quel vestito!
Annalisa: Grazie, e tu sei molto elegante in quell’abito. 
Alberto: Sei pronta a divertirti un po’?
Annalisa: Sì, sono pronta.
Alberto: Dai, andiamo. 

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	Andrea: Aa, Alberto, che bello vederti qui! Benvenuti.
Alberto: Auguro felicità infinita a te a tua moglie. 
Annalisa: Congratulazioni!
Andrea: Grazie mille.
Alberto: Abbiamo un regalo per voi.
Andrea: Molte grazie.
Annalisa: Alberto, mi piace tanto questa canzone.
Alberto: Vuoi ballare con me?
Annalisa: Volentieri.
Alberto: Di chi è questa canzone?
Annalisa: Questa canzone che si chiama “Parla più piano” di Gianni Morandi. Amo tanto questa canzone.
Alberto: Questa canzone suona bene. Che tipo di musica ti piace ascoltare?
Annalisa: Mi piace ascoltare tutti i tipi dalla musica classica a quella pop. E tu? Che tipo di musica ascolti?
Alberto: Generalmente musica rock.
Annalisa: Quale canzone ti piace di più?
Alberto: ce ne sono tante. Una di loro si chiama “Morirò da re” di Maneskin.
Annalisa: le canzone di Maneskin sono belle.
Alberto: allora, io prendo qualcosa da bere. Vuoi anche tu?
Annalisa: Per me un vino, per favore.
Alberto: te lo porto subito. Ecco!
Annalisa: grazie.
Andrea: Vi divertite?
Alberto: Sì, ci divertiamo tanto.
Andrea: dove vi siete conosciuti?
Alberto: studiamo alla stessa università.
Andrea: che bello!
Annalisa: allora, e tu dove hai conosciuto Alberto? 
Andrea: Siamo amici da piccoli. Siamo cresciuti insieme. 
Annalisa: allora come hai conosciuto tua moglie?
Andrea: Nel 2022 ci siamo conosciuti grazie a un amico comune. Stiamo insieme da due anni.
Annalisa: che bello. 
Andrea: dai, balliamo.
Annalisa: Abbiamo passato veramente una serata indimenticabile. Non ho mai balloto così tanto in mia vita. Ehi, Alberto, cosa ti è successo?
Alberto: Non mi sento bene.
Annalisa: Che hai? Ti fa male? 
Alberto: Ho la nausea.
Annalisa: Dovresti andare dal medico.
Alberto: No, non c’è niente.
Annalisa: Ma che dici! Dai Alberto. Andiamo in ospedale.

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	La segretaria: Come posso aiutarvi?
Alberto: Salve! Mi chiamo Alberto Ceci. Ecco la mia carta d’identità.
La segretaria: Lei aspetti qui, per favore. La chiameremo.
Il medico: Signor Ceci, entra dentro per favore. Che disturbi ha?
Alberto: Salve Dottore! Mi sento proprio male. Ho la nausea e mi gira la testa.
Il medico: Da quando?
Alberto: Da circa un’ora.
Il medico: Cosa ha mangiato o bevuto?
Alberto: Ho mangiato degli spuntini e ho bevuto troppo alcol durante un matrimonio.
Il medico: Ciò che ha detto potrebbe essere il motivo dei suoi disturbi. Vorrei esaminare in un modo più dettagliato. Lei si stenda sul lettino, per cortesia e mi volti la sua schiena. Respiri profondamente. Ha qualche altro sintomo?
Alberto: Sì, ho un po’freddo.
Il medico: Va bene. Mi lasci controllare la sua febbre. 37,5 gradi. Non ha la febbre. Lei apra la bocca. Mi sembra bene. La gola non è arrossata. Le proviamo la pressione. Apra la parte superiore del braccio. 130 e 90. Ha la pressione un po’ alta. Le faccio l'impegnativa per l'analisi del sangue. Prelevo un campione di sangue per l'esame. Va bene! Faccia una forte pressione sul cotone per favore!
Il medico: Secondo gli esami del sangue Lei ha probabilmente un’intossicazione alimentare. Prima attacchiamo la flebo. E poi le prescrivo una medicina. Ne prenda due volte al giorno e segua la cura per una settimana. Le compilo un certificato medico durato di due giorni. 
Alberto: Ho capito. Grazie mille dottore.
Il medico: Guarisca presto.
Annalisa: Adesso stai meglio, Alberto?
Alberto: Sì sto meglio. Ma adesso dobbiamo trovare una farmacia qui vicina.
Annalisa: Un attimo, cerco sull’internet. Va bene, l’ho trovato. La farmacia aperta e più vicina è a cinque metri. 
Alberto: Possiamo andare a piedi.
Annalisa: Dai, ci andiamo.
Alberto: Finalmente siamo arrivati in farmacia. 

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	Il farmacista: Come vi posso aiutare?
Alberto: Il medico mi ha prescritto un farmace. Ecco qui la prescrizione medica
Il farmacista: Controllo se abbiamo questa medicina.
Alberto: Grazie, aspetto.
Il farmacista: Sì, ce l’abbiamo.
Alberto: Come devo usare la medicina?
Il farmacista: Leggo  le istruzioni per l’uso. Prenda la medicina due volte al giorno. Una compressa al mattino e quella seconda alla sera. Prenda queste medicine per una settimana.
Alberto: A stomaco vuoto o pieno?
Il farmacista: A stomaco vuoto.
Alberto: La medicina ha effetti collaterali?
Il farmacista: No, però non la usi più di una settimana.
Alberto: Va bene. E quante compresse ci sono in una confezione? 
Il farmacista: Ce ne sono 25. Ha bisogno di qualcos’altro?
Alberto: No, grazie. Quant’è una scatola di medicina? 
Il farmacista: Costa 50 euro e 90 centesimi.
Alberto: Va bene, lo prendo. Ecco la mia carta di credito.
Il farmacista: Inserisca il codice per cortesia. Grazie, Guarisca presto. 
Alberto: Grazie, buona giornata. È già la mattina. Dobbiamo ritornare in albergo e  lasciarlo. 
Annalisa: L’orario di lasciare l’albergo è entro le dodici. Nel frattempo possiamo passare in banca e ritirare i soldi. 
Alberto: Non li puoi ritirare dal bancomat?
Annalisa: Purtroppo, il bancomat ha trattenuto la mia carta.
Alberto: Allora dobbiamo subito andare in banca.

TEMA	
BANKADA
	Il banchiere: Buon giorno, come posso aiutarvi?
Annalisa: Mi chiamo Annalisa Bianchi. Il bancomat ha trattenuto la mia carta.
Il banchiere: Ha inserito il codice sbagliato? 
Annalisa: Sì, l’ho sbagliato tre volte. 
Il banchiere: Ho capito. Il bancomat ha trattenuto la carta per la sicurezza. Dovrebbe annullare la carta e richiederne una nuova.
Annalisa: Va bene. Allora come posso richiedere una nuova carta e quant’è? 
Il banchiere: Il processo dell’annullamento è gratuito ma avere una carta nuova costa 12 euro.
Annalisa: Va bene.
Il banchiere: Ha con Lei la carta d’identità? Sono richiesti nome, indirizzo e data di nascita. 
Annalisa: Sì, ce l’ho.
Il banchiere: Si prega di compilare e firmare questo modulo, per favore.
Annalisa: Va bene.
Il banchiere: Invieremo la carta al suo indirizzo. 
Annalisa: Quando arriva?
Il banchiere: Ci vogliono due settimane.
Annalisa: Grazie mille, ho un’altra richiesta: Vorrei ritirare dei soldi dal mio conto.
Il banchiere: Certo. Qual è il tuo numero di cliente?
Annalisa: 123456.
Il banchiere: Quanti soldi vorrebbe ritirare?
Annalisa: Vorrei ritirare 200 euro.
Il banchiere: Va bene, ecco i soldi. 
Annalisa: Grazie! Mi può dire quanto è il resto?
Il banchiere: Certo! Il resto attuale è 1000 euro. 
Annalisa: Grazie mille.
Il banchiere: Desidera qualcos’altro?
Annalisa: No, grazie.
Ananlisa: Abbiamo fatto tutto. È ora di lasciare l’albergo. Il treno per Roma parte alle dodici.
Alberto: Abbiamo passato veramente un bel tempo. Ormai possiamo ritornare a casa. 
 
 
 
 
 
 





 
 
 EK-6 Diyaloglar ile İspanyolca Tematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 

TEMA	
YOLDA
	María: Disculpa, soy nueva en esta ciudad. ¿Cómo puedo ir a la Universidad de Barcelona? 
Carlos: La Universidad de Barcelona está en Horta-Guinardó. 
María: ¿Está lejos de aquí?  
Carlos: No, está cerca. Puedes ir a pie. Andando tardas aproximadamente 15 minutos.  
María: Vale, ¿qué dirección debo tomar para ir a Horta-Guinardó? 
Carlos: Es muy sencillo. Sigue todo recto por esta calle hasta la rotonda. Gira a la izquierda en la rotonda y luego continúa todo recto unos 500 metros hasta llegar a la calle Valldaura. Cruza la calle e inmediatamente gira a la primera calle a la derecha en la rotonda al Paseo del Valle de Hebrón. Continúa todo recto y vas a ver un parque a la derecha. Gira a la derecha en el semáforo. Sigue recto cruzando la calle y gira a la izquierda en la calle Arturo Mundet. La Universidad de Barcelona está allí. 
María: De acuerdo, todo recto, a la izquierda en la rotonda, todo recto hasta la calle Valldaura, después a la izquierda. En el semáforo a la izquierda y … No lo he entendido. 
Carlos: Entonces, vamos juntos a la universidad, ¡ven conmigo! 
María: ¿Eres estudiante? 
Carlos: Sí. 
María: ¿En qué carrera estás? 
Carlos: En Filología Hispánica. 
María: Hoy es mi primer día en la universidad. Estoy en Educación Primaria. 
Carlos: Bien, pues, ¿conoces el campus de la Universidad de Barcelona?  
María: No lo conozoco. ¿Cómo puedo ir a mi facultad?  
Carlos: Puedes ir andando. Esta calle te lleva al campus universitario. El Departamento de Magisterio está en la Facultad de Educación, en el edificio Levante.   
María: Muchas gracias por tu ayuda.  
Carlos: ¡De nada! Por cierto, ¿cómo te llamas? 
María: Me llamo María, ¿y tú? 
Carlos: ¡Qué nombre más bonito! Me llamo Carlos. Encantado de conocerte. 
María: ¿De dónde eres, Carlos? 
Carlos: Soy de aquí, ¿y tú? 
María: De Madrid. ¿Dónde vives aquí? 
Carlos: En un apartamento en la calle de Jerez. ¿Y tú?  
María: Yo vivo en un piso en Sant Andreu. 
Carlos: ¿Cuántos años tienes? 
María: Tengo 18 años, ¿y tú? 
Carlos: Tengo 20 años. ¡Ya hemos llegado a tu facultad! 
María: ¿Después de la clase tomamos un café? 
Carlos: Sí, genial. Después de la clase, te llamo. ¿Cuál es tu número de teléfono? 
María: ¡De acuerdo! Mi número es el 600985123. 
Carlos: Te voy a llamar, ¡hasta luego! 
María: ¡Hasta luego!

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	Isabel: ¿Sí?
Carlos: Hola, María.
Isabel: Perdona, ¿con quién hablo?
Carlos: Soy Carlos. ¿Quién eres tú?
Isabel: Soy Isabel García.
Carlos: ¿Este no es el 638 225 55 55?
Isabel: No. Este es el 538 225 55 45.
Carlos: Vaya, ¡disculpa! Me he equivocado de número.
Isabel: No pasa nada, ¡adiós!
Carlos marca el número correcto:
María: ¿Sí?
Carlos: ¿María?
María: Sí.
Carlos: Hola María, soy yo, Carlos.
María: Hola Carlos. ¿Qué tal estás?
Carlos: Bien, gracias. ¿Y tú?
María: También estoy bien.
Carlos: ¿Tienes tiempo hoy?
María: Sí, tengo.
Carlos: ¿Quieres venir conmigo a la cafetería del campus?
María: Me parece (sería) genial. ¿A qué hora?
Carlos: A la una y media. ¿Te viene bien?
María: Ay, tengo clase a esa hora. Mi clase termina a las tres. ¿Te viene bien a las tres?
Carlos: Sí, me va bien. Nos vemos a las tres entonces.
María: ¡Nos vemos

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
	María: ¡Hola a todos!
Carlos: ¡Hola! ¿Qué tal?
María: Gracias, estoy bien. ¿Y tú?
Carlos: También estoy bien. Esta es mi amiga María. Ella es de Madrid.
Isabel: Hola, María. Yo soy Isabel, soy de Sevilla.
José: Hola, María. Yo soy José. Soy de Santander.
María: Mucho gusto.
José: ¿Cuántos años tienes, María?
María: Tengo dieciocho años. ¿Y tú?
José: Diecinueve. Pero Isabel tiene veinte años.
Carlos: Yo soy mayor que vosotros. Nací el 20 de diciembre de 2002. Tengo veintidós años.
María: Entonces, tu signo del zodiaco es Sagitario.
Carlos: Exacto. ¿Y cuál es tu signo?
María: Mi signo es Aries. Nací en abril.
Isabel: Qué bien, yo soy Piscis. Nací en marzo. María, ¿qué carrera estudias?
María: Estudio Educación Primaria. Acabo de matricularme. ¿Y tú?
Isabel: Yo estudio en la Facultad de Medicina.
María: ¿En qué curso estás?
Isabel: En segundo. ¿Y tú?
José: Yo también estoy en segundo, pero en la carrera de Lingüística.
María: Yo estoy en primero.
José: María, ¿qué opinas de la carrera de Educación Primaria en Barcelona?
María: Mis compañeros son buenos, el ambiente es agradable… Me gusta estudiar aquí.
Carlos: ¡Oh, Dios mío! Llego muy tarde. Perdonad, tengo clase a las 14:00.
María: ¡Adiós!
Carlos: ¡Nos vemos!

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	María: Perdón, ¿dónde están las patatas?
Dependiente: Allí, delante, en la sección de verduras.
María: He mirado ahí, pero no las he visto.
Dependiente: Están a la derecha, justo en la entrada.
María: Gracias, voy a mirar otra vez.
María: ¡Ah, Carlos, qué casualidad tan bonita!
Carlos: Sí.
María: Tengo que hacer la compra urgentemente. Mi nevera está vacía.
Carlos: Yo quiero comprar verduras y frutas frescas. ¿Hay algo en oferta ahora?
María: Las manzanas están de oferta. Manzanas de Asturias. El kilo cuesta 2,50 euros.
Carlos: ¡Genial! Un kilo, por favor. ¿Hay espinacas?
María: Están allí enfrente, al lado de las cebollas.
Carlos: ¡Muchas gracias!
María: Bueno, ¿has comprado todo lo que necesitabas?
Carlos: Necesito un litro de leche, una lata de refresco de cola y una botella de agua.
María: Están en la sección de bebidas.
Carlos: Gracias.
María: ¿Necesitas algo más?
Carlos: No, gracias, eso es todo. ¿Necesitas algo tú?
María: Hmm. ¿Qué necesito? Un momento, voy a revisar mi lista de compras. Necesito un kilo de arroz, un manojo de perejil, 250 g de queso, 100 g de salami y un tarro de miel.
Carlos: ¿Qué tipo de salami quieres?
María: Salami de pavo.
Carlos: Los fiambres están en la sección de carnicería, el arroz al lado de los cereales, el queso en la sección de lácteos y el perejil en la de frutas y verduras. Mira, la miel está en la sección de ofertas. ¿Necesitas algo más?
María: No, eso es todo. Ahora podemos ir a la caja. Qué suerte, no hay cola larga.
Cajero: ¿Quiere una bolsa?
María: No, tengo mi bolsa.
Cajero: Son 50 euros en total.
María: Aquí tiene. Quiero pagar con tarjeta.
Cajero: ¿Su tarjeta es contactless?
María: Sí.
Cajero: Acerque su tarjeta al terminal.
Cajero: Muchas gracias. Que tenga un buen día.
Carlos: ¡Buenos días!
Cajero: ¡Buenos días! ¿Quiere una bolsa?
Carlos: Sí, por favor.
Cajero: Son 45,56 euros, por favor. ¿Va a pagar con tarjeta?
Carlos: Prefiero pagar en efectivo. Aquí tiene.
Cajero: Aquí tiene su cambio, 4,44 euros.
Carlos: Gracias.
María: Las bolsas pesan mucho.
Carlos: Te ayudo a llevarlas hasta casa. ¡Dámelas!
María: ¿Estás seguro?
Carlos: Sí.
María: Muchas gracias por tu ayuda.

TEMA	
EVDE
	María: ¡Bienvenido!
Carlos: Gracias por la invitación. ¿Dónde puedo colgar mi abrigo?
María: En este armario.
Carlos: Gracias.
María: Siéntate, por favor, y descansa.
Carlos: Gracias.
María: ¿Quieres tomar algo?
Carlos: Quiero un café.
María: ¿Con leche o sin leche?
Carlos: Sin leche.
María: Vale, ahora mismo te lo traigo. Aquí tienes tu café sin leche y este es el mío con leche.
Carlos: ¡Oh, muchas gracias!
María: ¡De nada!
Carlos: ¿Cuántos metros cuadrados tiene el piso?
María: 100 metros cuadrados.
Carlos: ¿No es demasiado grande para ti sola? ¿Cuántas habitaciones tiene?
María: No, este piso es perfecto para mí. Es muy bonito y tranquilo. Tiene un salón, dos dormitorios y una cocina. Además, tiene un baño y un balcón.
Carlos: ¡Vaya, qué bien! ¿Y qué tal la ubicación?
María: Es muy céntrico. Hay una parada de autobús y un centro comercial cerca.
Carlos: ¿Es tuyo el piso?
María: No, vivo de alquiler.
Carlos: ¿Es caro? ¿Cuánto pagas al mes?
María: No, es barato. El alquiler es de 800 euros, y los gastos de comunidad son unos 200 euros al mes.
Carlos: No es caro y el piso es bonito. Está en la cuarta planta, pero no hay ascensor. Por eso es tan barato. ¿Puedo verlo?
María: ¡Por supuesto!
María: Este es el pasillo. Por desgracia, es muy estrecho. Aquí a la derecha hay dos habitaciones.
Carlos: Las habitaciones son bastante luminosas.
María: Sí, es verdad. Enfrente hay un salón grande.
Carlos: El salón tiene balcón.
María: Sí, pero no es muy grande.
Carlos: ¿Es esta la cocina?
María: Sí, la cocina es práctica y tiene vistas al río.
Carlos: ¿Y aquí es el baño?
María: Sí, es pequeño pero luminoso.
Carlos: ¿El edificio tiene garaje?
María: Sí, en este edificio cada piso tiene su propio garaje.
Carlos: ¿Se calienta bien la casa?
María: Sí, este piso está orientado al sur y tiene buen aislamiento.
Carlos: El piso es muy bonito. Tiene todo lo necesario.
María: Exacto, estoy muy contenta con este piso.
Carlos: Ya es hora de comer. ¿Tienes hambre? Conozco un buen restaurante cerca. ¿Vamos a comer juntos?
María: ¡Estoy muerta de hambre! Me suenan las tripas.
Carlos: ¡Pues nos vamos a comer!

TEMA	
RESTORANDA
Carlos: Por fin hemos llegado. Vamos a entrar.
Camarero: Buenas tardes, bienvenidos a nuestro restaurante. ¿Tienen reserva?
Carlos: No, por desgracia no. ¿Tienen una mesa libre para dos?
Camarero: Sí, no hay problema. ¿Dónde les gustaría sentarse?
Carlos: Junto a la ventana, por favor.
Camarero: Lo siento, pero las mesas al lado de la ventana están reservadas.
María: No pasa nada, una mesa cerca de la entrada está bien para nosotros.
Camarero: ¡Un momento! Sí, la mesa de la entrada aún está libre. ¡Por aquí, por favor! Está justo en la esquina. ¿Esta mesa les parece bien?
Carlos: Sí, está bien. ¿Nos puede traer el menú?
Camarero: Por supuesto. ¿Han decidido ya?
Carlos: Sí, para mí un gazpacho y un plato de cochinillo asado.
Camarero: Muy bien. ¿Y usted? Le recomiendo el plato del día, que es paella.
María: En ese caso, tomaré una crema de calabaza y paella.
Camarero: Perfecto. ¿Qué quieren para beber?
María: Un vaso de sangría, por favor.
Carlos: Para mí, un café solo.
Camarero: ¿Quieren algún postre?
María: Sí, yo quiero una tarta de Santiago, por favor.
Carlos: Para mí, una crema catalana.
Camarero: Enseguida se las traigo. ¿Algo más?
María: No, gracias.
Camarero: Aquí tienen, sus platos. ¡Que aproveche!
Carlos: ¡Gracias!
Camarero: ¿Necesitan algo más?
María: ¿Me puede traer otra servilleta, por favor?
Carlos: Yo quiero un poco más de pan.
Camarero: ¡Por supuesto! Ahora mismo los traigo.
María: Gracias.
Camarero: De nada. ¡Buen provecho!
Carlos: ¿Nos puede traer la cuenta?
Camarero: ¡Por supuesto! ¿Van a pagar juntos o por separado?
Carlos: Juntos, por favor.
Camarero: Muy bien. ¿Van a pagar con tarjeta?
Carlos: No, en efectivo.
Camarero: Son 40 euros en total.
Carlos: Aquí tiene, puede quedarse con el cambio.
Camarero: Muchas gracias. ¡Que tengan un buen día!
María: ¡Hasta luego!
Carlos: ¿Te ha gustado la comida?
María: Sí, estaba deliciosa. ¿Y ahora qué hacemos?
Carlos: En realidad, tengo una idea. Mi mejor amigo Luis se casa hoy. La boda es a las 20:00 en Madrid y estoy invitado. ¿Te gustaría venir conmigo?
María: ¡Por supuesto, encantada! Pero… ¿qué me pongo para la boda? Necesito un vestido bonito.
Carlos: Yo también necesito un traje elegante.

TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	María: ¿Qué te parece el vestido rojo del escaparate?
Carlos: Me gusta. Venga, ¡Pruébatelo!
Dependienta: ¿En qué puedo ayudarles?
María: Me gustaría probarme el vestido rojo del escaparate.
Dependienta: ¿Qué talla usas?
María: Uso la talla 36.
Dependienta: De acuerdo, ven conmigo. ¡Pruébate este vestido!
María: ¿Dónde puedo probármelo?
Dependienta: Los probadores están allí. ¿Te gusta el vestido?
María: El color es perfecto, pero no me queda bien. ¿Tenéis una talla más grande?
Dependienta: Sí, nos queda uno en la talla 38.
María: Vale, me lo voy a probar.
María: ¿Me queda bien el vestido?
Carlos: Te queda genial.
María: A mí también me gusta. ¿Cuánto cuesta?
Dependienta: Su precio es 40 euros.
María: Es muy elegante. Me encanta el color y me queda perfecto. Me lo llevo.
Dependienta: ¿Necesitáiss algo más?
Carlos: Sí, estoy buscando un traje. ¿Dónde están los trajes?
Dependienta: En la segunda planta.
Carlos: Este traje es elegante, pero cuesta 150 euros. Es demasiado caro. A lo mejor puedo encontrar algo más barato. ¡Ah! Allí hay rebajas. Este traje está genial. Pero me queda muy ajustado. Perdón, ¿tienen una talla más grande de este modelo?
Dependienta: Prueba este que tenemos aquí.
Carlos: ¡Gracias! Este sí me queda bien.
Dependienta: ¿Algo más?
Carlos: ¿Tenéis pajaritas?
Dependienta: ¡Por supuesto! Están allí. Hoy hay un 50% de descuento en pajaritas y corbatas.
Carlos: Hmm, voy a comprar una pajarita para este traje. ¿Qué color le queda mejor?
Dependienta: Creo que esta pajarita combina perfectamente.
Carlos: Me la llevo.
Dependienta: ¿Necesitan algo más?
Carlos: No, gracias.
Dependienta: ¡Hasta luego!

TEMA	
GARDA
	Carlos: Ya hemos terminado nuestras compras. Ahora podemos ir a Madrid.
María: De acuerdo.
Carlos: La estación de tren está allí. Vamos a comprar nuestros billetes para Madrid. Pero, ¿dónde podemos comprarlos?
María: Podemos comprarlos en la taquilla.
Carlos: Buenas tardes, quiero dos billetes para Madrid.
Empleado: ¿Solo ida?
Carlos: Ida y vuelta, por favor.
Empleado: ¿Cuándo quieren viajar?
Carlos: Queremos coger el próximo tren.
Empleado: El próximo tren sale en quince minutos.
Carlos: Nos parece bien.
Empleado: Son 120 euros en total. ¿Va a pagar con tarjeta?
Carlos: No, voy a pagar en efectivo. Aquí tiene.
Empleado: Aquí están sus billetes y 80 euros de cambio.
Carlos: ¡Gracias! ¿El tren puede tener retraso?
Empleado: No, llega a tiempo.
Carlos: Gracias.
Empleado: ¡Que tengan un buen viaje!
Anuncio: ¡Atención, atención! El tren con destino a Madrid está a punto de salir.
María: El tren está a punto de partir. Vamos a subir.
Carlos: Sí, vamos a buscar nuestros asientos.
María: Aquí están nuestros asientos.
Anuncio: Próxima estación: Estación de Atocha, Madrid.
Carlos: María, despiértate, tenemos que bajar aquí. Ahora vamos a buscar un hotel. Vamos al centro.
María: ¡Ah, mira!
María: Este hotel se ve precioso por fuera.
Carlos: Este hotel de 5 estrellas en el centro de Madrid seguro que tiene habitaciones con una vista espectacular.
María: Sí, venga, vamos a entrar.

TEMA	
OTELDE
	Recepcionista: ¡Buenas tardes, bienvenidos al Hotel Madrid!
Carlos: Buenas tardes, queremos dos habitaciones, por favor.
Recepcionista: Por supuesto. ¿Cuántas noches se van a quedar?
Carlos: Solo una noche.
Recepcionista: De acuerdo. Tenemos disponibilidad. ¿Desean habitaciones dobles?
Carlos: No, queremos dos habitaciones individuales.
Recepcionista: ¿Con desayuno incluido?
Carlos: Sí, incluido. ¿Hay internet en las habitaciones?
Recepcionista: Sí, todas las habitaciones tienen internet, baño, aseo, teléfono, televisión, nevera y aire acondicionado.
Carlos: Perfecto, las cogemos.
Recepcionista: Muy bien, ¿puedo ver sus documentos de identidad?
Carlos: Claro, aquí tiene.
Recepcionista: Gracias. Por favor, rellene este formulario con su nombre, dirección, fecha de nacimiento y nacionalidad.
Carlos: Aquí tiene.
Recepcionista: Y firme aquí, por favor.
Carlos: Listo.
Recepcionista: ¿Cómo desean pagar?
Carlos: Con tarjeta de crédito. Aquí tiene.
Recepcionista: Pago realizado. Aquí tienen sus llaves. Sus habitaciones son la 104 y la 105.
Carlos: ¿En qué planta están?
Recepcionista: En la primera planta, a la derecha al salir del ascensor.
Carlos: ¿A qué hora es el desayuno?
Recepcionista: El desayuno se sirve de 7:00 a 10:00 en el comedor, en la planta baja. También pueden solicitar el desayuno en la habitación.
Carlos: Gracias. Una pregunta más, ¿qué otros servicios ofrece el hotel?
Recepcionista: Disponemos de restaurante, bar, salón de belleza y piscina para nuestros huéspedes.
Carlos: ¡Genial! ¿A qué hora debemos hacer el check-out?
Recepcionista: A las 12:00 del mediodía.
Carlos: Muchas gracias.
Recepcionista: De nada.
Carlos: Gracias de nuevo.
Recepcionista: ¡Que descansen bien! El botones les llevará a sus habitaciones.
Carlos: ¡Perfecto! ¡Hasta luego!
Recepcionista: ¡Hasta luego!
Carlos: ¡Vaya, qué habitación más bonita!
María: ¡Un hotel increíble en Madrid! Las habitaciones son preciosas, limpias y las camas muy cómodas. Además, está en una ubicación excelente, a solo unos metros de la Puerta del Sol.
Carlos: Y la vista desde la habitación es espectacular.
María: Vamos a descansar un poco y después salimos a recorrer la ciudad.
Carlos: ¿Nos vemos a las 17:00?
María: Sí, sí, me parece bien.
Carlos: Perfecto, nos vemos en la recepción a las 17:00. Hasta luego.
María: ¡De acuerdo, hasta luego!
Carlos: ¡Es hora de descubrir la ciudad! ¿Lista para la visita?
María: Sí, sí, estoy lista.
Carlos: Tenemos suficiente tiempo para ver muchos lugares de Madrid.

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	María: ¿Por dónde empezamos nuestra visita? ¿Qué es lo más famoso de Madrid?
Carlos: He buscado en internet y he encontrado información sobre los sitios turísticos de Madrid. Vamos a empezar el tour en el Barrio de las Letras.
María: Es el barrio histórico de la ciudad, ¿no?
Carlos: Exacto. Otro sitio turístico imprescindible es el Palacio Real. Se construyó en el siglo XVIII.
María: ¡Qué interesante!
Carlos: Pero ningún edificio en Madrid es tan famoso como la Puerta del Sol. Es el centro de la ciudad y un lugar icónico.
María: ¿Y qué comida típica tiene Madrid?
Carlos: Los platos más famosos son el cocido madrileño, los callos a la madrileña y el bocadillo de calamares. Madrid es una de las ciudades más bonitas de España.
María: Totalmente de acuerdo contigo.
Carlos: Está anocheciendo. Vamos a darnos prisa si no, llegamos tarde a la boda. Por cierto, estás guapísima con ese vestido.
María: ¡Gracias! Tú también estás muy elegante con ese traje.
Carlos: ¡Gracias! ¿Lista para un poco de fiesta?
María: ¡Sí, lista!
Carlos: ¡Venga, vámonos!

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	Luis: ¡Ah, Carlos! ¡Qué alegría verte aquí! ¡Bienvenidos!
Carlos: Os deseo toda la felicidad del mundo a ti y a tu esposa.
María: ¡Felicidades!
Luis: ¡Muchísimas gracias!
Carlos: Tenemos un regalo para vosotros.
Luis: ¡Vaya, muchas gracias!
María: Carlos, me encanta esta canción.
Carlos: ¿Quieres bailar conmigo?
María: ¡Por supuesto!
Carlos: ¿De quién es esta canción?
María: Es de Alejandro Sanz, “Amiga mía”. Me encanta esta canción.
Carlos: Suena genial. ¿Qué tipo de música te gusta?
María: De todo, desde música clásica hasta pop. ¿Y tú? ¿Qué estilo escuchas tú?
Carlos: Normalmente rock.
María: ¿Cuál es tu canción favorita?
Carlos: ¡Tengo muchas! Una de mis favoritas es “La raja de tu falda” de Estopa.
María: Las canciones de Estopa son buenísimas.
Carlos: Voy a tomar algo de beber. ¿Quieres algo?
María: Sí, un refresco de limón, por favor.
Carlos: Ahora mismo te lo traigo. ¡Aquí tienes!
María: ¡Gracias!
Luis: ¿Os lo estáis pasando bien?
Carlos: Sí, ¡nos lo estamos pasando genial!
Luis: ¿Cómo os conocisteis?
Carlos: Estudiamos en la misma universidad.
Luis: ¡Qué bien!
María: ¿Y tú? ¿De dónde conoces a Carlos?
Luis: Somos amigos desde la infancia. Crecimos juntos.
María: ¿Y cómo conociste a tu esposa?
Luis: Nos conocimos en 2022 a través de un amigo en común. Llevamos dos años juntos.
María: ¡Qué bonito!
Luis: ¡Venga, vamos a bailar!
María: ¡Ha sido una noche increíble! ¡Nunca había bailado tanto en mi vida! ¡Eh, Carlos, ¿qué te pasa?!
Carlos: No me encuentro bien…
María: ¿Qué te pasa? ¿Te duele algo?
Carlos: Me duele el estómago, creo que me ha sentado mal algo.
María: ¡Deberías ir al médico!
Carlos: No, no es nada…
María: ¿Cómo que no es nada? ¡Vamos, Carlos, nos vamos al hospital ya!

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	Recepcionista: Buenas noches. ¿En qué puedo ayudarle?
Carlos: Hola, me llamo Carlos Ruiz. Aquí tiene mi documento de identidad.
Recepcionista: De acuerdo. Por favor, espere aquí. Le vamos a llamar en un momento.
Médico: Carlos Ruiz, pase, por favor. ¿Qué le pasa?
Carlos: Buenas noches, doctor. Me siento muy mal. Tengo náuseas y mareo.
Médico: ¿Desde cuándo?
Carlos: Desde hace aproximadamente una hora.
Médico: ¿Qué ha comido o ha bebido?
Carlos: He estado en una boda y he comido algunos aperitivos. También he bebido demasiado alcohol.
Médico: Quizás  sus síntomas pueden ser por eso. Vamos a hacer un examen más detallado. Acuéstese en la camilla y gírese hacia mí. Respire hondo. ¿Tiene algún otro síntoma?
Carlos: Sí, tengo frío.
Médico: Vale, voy a tomarle la temperatura. Tiene 37,5°C. No tiene fiebre. Abra la boca, por favor. Su garganta está bien, no está roja. Ahora voy a medirle la tensión. Levántese un poco la manga, por favor. 130/90, la tiene un poco alta. También vamos a hacer un análisis de sangre. Le sacaré un poco de sangre. Listo. Apriete el algodón contra el brazo, por favor.
Médico: Según los resultados del análisis, probablemente ha tenido una intoxicación alimentaria. Vamos a ponerle un suero. Además, le voy a recetar un medicamento. Tómelo dos veces al día durante una semana. También le voy a dar dos días de baja.
Carlos: Entendido, muchas gracias, doctor.
Médico: Que se mejore pronto.
María: ¿Te sientes mejor ahora, Carlos?
Carlos: Sí, mucho mejor. Pero ahora tenemos que buscar una farmacia.
María: Un momento, voy a mirar por Internet. Vale, ya he encontrado una. La farmacia de guardia más cercana está a 500 metros.
Carlos: Podemos ir caminando.
María: Venga, vámonos.
Carlos: ¡Por fin llegamos a la farmacia!

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	Farmacéutico: Buenas noches, ¿en qué puedo ayudarle?
Carlos: El médico me ha recetado un medicamento. Aquí tiene la receta.
Farmacéutico: Déjeme comprobar si tenemos este medicamento.
Carlos: Gracias, espero.
Farmacéutico: Sí, lo tenemos.
Carlos: ¿Cómo debo tomarlo?
Farmacéutico: Déjeme revisar las indicaciones. Debe tomarlo dos veces al día: una pastilla por la mañana y otra por la noche. Debe usarlas durante una semana.
Carlos: ¿Antes o después de comer?
Farmacéutico: En ayunas.
Carlos: ¿Tiene efectos secundarios?
Farmacéutico: No, pero no debe tomarlo más de una semana.
Carlos: De acuerdo. ¿Cuántas pastillas hay en la caja?
Farmacéutico: Hay 25 comprimidos. ¿Necesita algo más?
Carlos: No, gracias. ¿Cuánto cuesta?
Farmacéutico: Son 50,90 euros.
Carlos: Vale, me lo llevo. Aquí tiene mi tarjeta.
Farmacéutico: Introduzca el PIN, por favor. Gracias. ¡Que se mejore!
Carlos: Gracias. ¡Hasta luego! Ya está amaneciendo. Debemos volver al hotel y hacer el check-out.
María: La salida es a las 12:00. Por cierto, podemos pasar por un banco y sacar dinero.
Carlos: ¿No puedes sacar efectivo de un cajero automático?
María: No, por desgracia, el cajero se ha tragado mi tarjeta.
Carlos: En ese caso, tenemos que ir a un banco cuanto antes.

TEMA	
BANKADA
	Empleado del banco: Buenos días, ¿en qué puedo ayudarle?
María: Me llamo María Rodríguez. El cajero automático se ha tragado mi tarjeta.
Empleado del banco: ¿Ha introducido el PIN incorrecto varias veces seguidas?
María: Sí, lo he puesto mal tres veces.
Empleado del banco: Entiendo. Por motivos de seguridad, el cajero automático ha bloqueado su tarjeta. Debe cancelarla y solicitar una nueva.
María: De acuerdo. ¿Cómo puedo pedir una nueva tarjeta y cuánto cuesta?
Empleado del banco: La cancelación es gratuita, pero emitir una nueva tarjeta cuesta 4 euros.
María: Vale.
Empleado del banco: ¿Tiene su documento de identidad? Necesitamos su nombre, dirección y fecha de nacimiento.
María: Sí, aquí lo tiene.
Empleado del banco: Rellene este formulario y fírmelo, por favor.
María: Listo.
Empleado del banco: Le vamos a enviar la nueva tarjeta a su dirección.
María: ¿Cuánto tiempo tarda?
Empleado del banco: Aproximadamente dos semanas.
María: Muchas gracias. Una cosa más, quiero sacar dinero de mi cuenta.
Empleado del banco: Por supuesto. ¿Cuál es su número de cliente?
María: 123456.
Empleado del banco: ¿Cuánto quiere retirar?
María: 200 euros, por favor.
Empleado del banco: De acuerdo. Aquí tiene.
María: Gracias. ¿Puede decirme mi saldo actual?
Empleado del banco: Claro. Su saldo es 1000 euros.
María: Muchas gracias.
Empleado del banco: ¿Necesita algo más?
María: No, gracias.
María: Ya hemos terminado todo. Ahora es momento de hacer el check-out del hotel. El tren a Barcelona sale a las 12:00.
Carlos: Ha sido un viaje increíble. Ya podemos volver a casa.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 






EK-7 Diyaloglar ile Rusça Tematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 

TEMA	
YOLDA
	Алина: Простите, я иностранка. Вы не знаете, где находится главный корпус «МГУ имени М. В. Ломоносова»? 
Игорь: На Ленинских горах.   
Алина: А Ленинские горы далеко отсюда? 
Игорь: Нет, недалеко. Можно дойти пешком за 15 минут.   
Алина: А как добраться до Ленинских гор? 
Игорь: Идите прямо до проспекта Ломоносовского. Затем поверните налево. Далее идите прямо 500 метров до улицы Колмогорова. Перейдите через улицу. Дальше Вы увидите парк. Поверните направо на светофоре. Справа Вы увидите главный корпус МГУ. 
Алина: Хорошо. Прямо до проспекта Ломоносовского, потом налево, затем 500 метров прямо. Направо на светофоре и …. Запуталась.  
Игорь: Тогда идём вместе в университет. Пойдём! 
Алина: Вы студент? 
Игорь: Да.  
Алина: На каком факультете учитесь? 
Игорь: На филологическом.  
Алина: Это мой первый день в университете. Я учусь на кафедре РКИ. 
Игорь: Отлично. А вы знаете, где находится кампус МГУ? 
Алина: Нет, ещё. Как добраться до кафедры? 
Игорь: Совсем недалеко. Это дорога ведёт в кампус. РКИ находится в 1-ом корпусе филологического факультета в кабинете 867.  
Алина: Спасибо за помощь.  
Игорь: Пожалуйста. Как Вас зовут? 
Алина: Алина. А как Вас зовут? 
Игорь: Красивое имя. Меня зовут Игорь. Очень приятно познакомиться. Между прочим, можно перейти на «ты».  
Алина: Хорошо. Откуда ты, Игорь? 
Игорь: Я москвич. А ты? 
Алина: Я петербурженка. Где живёшь в Москве? 
Игорь: На проспекте Вернадского. А ты? 
Алина: А я на Тверской. 
Игорь: Сколько тебе лет? 
Алина: Мне 18.  А тебе? 
Игорь: Мне 20. Вот пришли на факультет. 
Алина: Сходим попить кофе после урока? 
Игорь: Хорошо, будет приятно. Позвоню тебе после урока. Какой у тебя номер телефона? 
Алина: Договорились. +7 925 358 95 96 
Игорь: Позвоню тебе. До встречи. 
Алина: До встречи.  

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	Екатерина: Ало!
Игорь: Привет, Александра. 
Екатерина: Простите, кто это?
Игорь: Это Димитрий, а Вы кто?
Екатерина: А это Екатерина Позднякова.
Игорь: Разве это +7 926 745 45 75?
Екатерина: Нет, это +7 926 745 55 75.
Игорь: Ой, извините, ошибся номером. 
Екатерина: Ничего, всего хорошего.
Игорь:набирает правильный номер:
Алина: Ало!
Игорь: Саша?
Алина: Да, это я.
Игорь: Привет, Саша, это Дима. 
Алина: Привет, Дима, Как ты?
Игорь: Спасибо, хорошо. А как ты?
Алина: Тоже хорошо.
Игорь: У тебя есть время сегодня?
Алина: Да, есть.
Игорь: Пойдём со мной в кафе в кампусе. 
Алина: Пойдём. А во сколько?
Игорь: Пол второго. Пойдёт?
Алина: Жаль, что у меня урок в это время. Заканчивается в три. В три пойдёт? 
Игорь: Да, пойдёт. Встретимся в три часа. 
Алина: До встречи!

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
	Алина: Привет всем!
Игорь: Привет! Как дела?
Алина: Спасибо, хорошо. А как у тебя дела?
Игорь: Тоже хорошо. Это моя подруга Алина. Она из Москвы.
Екатерина: Привет, Алина! Я Екатерина. Я из Екатеринбурга.
Михаил: Привет, Алина! Я Михаил из Краснодара. 
Алина: Очень приятно. 
Михаил: Сколько тебе Алина?
Алина: Мне 18, а тебе?
Михаил: Восемнадцать. Но Екатерине девятнадцать. 
Игорь: Я старше вас. Родился 20 Декабря 2004 года. Мне двадцать лет.
Алина: Тогда ты стрелец по зодиаку. 
Игорь: Верно. А кто ты по зодиаку?
Алина: Я овен. Родилась в апреле.
Екатерина: Хорошо, а я рыба. Родилась в марте. Алина, а на каком факультете учишься?
Алина: Я учусь в институте Тюркологии. Я только выступила. А ты?
Екатерина: Я учусь на медицинском факультете. 
Алина: На каком курсе?
Екатерина: На четвёртом курсе. А ты?
Михаил: Я на четвёртом курсе филологического факультета.
Алина: Я на первом курсе.
Михаил: Алина, что ты думаешь об институте Тюркологии в Москве?
Алина: Друзья по институту хорошие, атмосфера приятная… Хорошо тут учиться.
Игорь: Боже мой! Опоздал сильно. Простите, друзья, у меня урок в 14.00.
Алина: Не опаздывай, беги! . 
Игорь: Пока, пока!
Алина: Пока!

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	Алина: Извините, где картошка?
Продавец: Там, впереди, в отделе овощей.
Алина: Я там посмотрела, но не нашла.
Продавец: Прямо впереди, справа у входа.
Алина: Спасибо, посмотрю ещё раз.
Алина: О, Игорь, какая встреча!
Игорь: Да.
Алина: Мне срочно нужно сделать покупки. Холодильник пустой.
Игорь: Я хочу купить свежие овощи и фрукты. Сейчас есть скидки на что-то?
Алина: На яблоки есть скидка. Яблоки фуджи. 15 рублей за килограмм.
Игорь: Отлично, дайте килограмм, пожалуйста! А шпинат есть?
Алина: Шпинат там, напротив, рядом с луком.
Игорь: Большое спасибо!
Алина: Ты всё купил, что хотел?
Игорь: Мне нужно ещё литр молока, банку колы и бутылку воды.
Алина: Они в отделе напитков.
Игорь: Спасибо.
Алина: Это всё?
Игорь: Да, спасибо, всё. А тебе что-то нужно?
Алина: Нуу, что мне нужно? Минутку, я посмотрю свой список покупок. Мне нужен пакет риса, пучок петрушки, 250 граммов сыра, 100 граммов салями и баночка мёда.
Игорь: Какую салями хочешь?
Алина: Индюшиную.
Игорь: Салями в отделе мясных продуктов, рис — там, где крупы, сыр — в сырном отделе, а петрушка — там, где овощи и фрукты. Смотри. Мёд — в отделе скидок. Тебе ещё что-то нужно?
Алина: Нет, всё. Мы можем идти на кассу. Нам повезло, там нет очереди.
Продавец: Нужен пакет?
Алина: Нет, у меня есть сумка.
Продавец: С вас 500 рублей.
Алина: Вот, пожалуйста. Я хочу оплатить картой.
Продавец: Ваша карта поддерживает бесконтактную оплату?
Алина: Да.
Продавец: Поднесите карту к терминалу.
Продавец: Спасибо большое. Хорошего дня!
Игорь: Хорошего дня!
Продавец: Добрый день! Нужен пакет?
Игорь: Да, пожалуйста.
Продавец: С вас 450 рулей. Картой будете платить?
Игорь: Наличными. Вот, пожалуйста.
Продавец: 50 рублей сдачи.
Игорь: Спасибо.
Алина: Пакеты очень тяжёлые.
Игорь: Я помогу тебе донести до дома. Дай мне пакеты!
Алина: Ты уверен?
Игорь: Да.
Алина: Спасибо большое за помощь.

TEMA	
EVDE
	Алина: Добро пожаловать.
Игорь: Спасибо за приглашение. Куда я могу повесить пальто?
Алина: В этот шкаф.
Игорь: Спасибо.
Алина: Садись, отдохни.
Игорь: Спасибо.
Алина: Хочешь что-нибудь выпить?
Игорь: Я бы выпил кофе.
Алина: С молоком или без?
Игорь: Без молока.
Алина: Хорошо, сейчас принесу. Вот твой кофе без молока, а это мой кофе с молоком.
Игорь: О, спасибо.
Алина: Пожалуйста.
Игорь: Сколько квадратных метров твоя квартира?
Алина: 100 квадратных метров.
Игорь: Для одного человека это не слишком большая квартира? Сколько здесь комнат?
Алина: Нет, эта квартира для меня идеальна. Она очень красивая и тихая. Здесь есть гостиная, две спальни и кухня. Также есть ванная и балкон.
Игорь: Вау, замечательно! А как с расположением?
Алина: Очень центральное. Рядом автобусная остановка и торговый центр.
Игорь: Это твоя собственная квартира?
Алина: Нет, я её снимаю.
Игорь: Это дорого? Сколько ты платишь в месяц?
Алина: Нет, недорого. Аренда стоит 80 000 рублей, а коммуналка примерно 2000 рублей в месяц.
Игорь: Это недорого, и квартира хорошая. Она на 4 этаже, но без лифта. Поэтому и дёшево. Можно осмотреть квартиру?
Алина: Конечно!
Алина: Здесь коридор. К сожалению, он очень узкий. Здесь справа две комнаты.
Игорь: Комнаты довольно светлые.
Алина: Да, верно. Напротив большая гостиная.
Игорь: В гостиной есть балкон.
Алина: Да, но он небольшой.
Игорь: Это кухня?
Алина: Да, кухня удобная и с видом на реку.
Игорь: Это ванная?
Алина: Да, маленькая, но светлая.
Игорь: У дома есть гараж?
Алина: Да, у каждой квартиры в этом доме есть свой гараж.
Игорь: А как с отоплением? Хорошее?
Алина: Да, квартира с южной стороны и и с отоплением всё хорошо.
Игорь: Квартира очень хорошая. Всё необходимое есть.
Алина: Именно, я очень довольна этой квартирой.
Игорь: Сейчас время ужина. Ты голодна? Я знаю хороший ресторан поблизости. Пойдём поужинаем?
Алина: Я голодна как волк. Живот урчит.
Игорь: Ну, тогда пойдём есть!
 
TEMA	
RESTORANDA
Игорь: Наконец-то прибыли. Давай, входим.
Официант: Добрый день, добро пожаловать в наш ресторан. У вас есть бронь?
Игорь: Нет, к сожалению, нет. У вас есть столик на двоих?
Официант: Да, без проблем. Где бы вы хотели сесть?
Игорь: У окна, пожалуйста.
Официант: К сожалению, столики у окна забронированы.
Алина: Хорошо, нам подойдет столик у входа.
Официант: Минуточку! Да, столик у входа свободен. Пожалуйста, идите за мной! Вот он, в углу. Этот столик вам подходит?
Игорь: Да, подходит. Можно меню?
Официант: Конечно. Вы уже выбрали?
Игорь: Да, мне, пожалуйста, борщ и говядина.
Официант: Хорошо. А вы? Рекомендую блюдо дня – манты.
Алина: Тогда мне грибной суп и манты.
Официант: Хорошо. Что будете пить?
Алина: Айран, пожалуйста.
Игорь: А мне чай.
Официант: Хотите десерт?
Алина: Да, мне, пожалуйста, пахлаву.
Игорь: А мне – рисовый пудинг.
Официант: Сейчас все принесу. Еще что-нибудь?
Алина: Нет, спасибо.
Официант: Вот ваш заказ. Приятного аппетита!
Игорь: Спасибо.
Официант: Что-нибудь еще?
Алина: Можете принести еще салфетку?
Игорь: А мне немного хлеба, пожалуйста.
Официант: Конечно, сейчас принесу.
Алина: Спасибо.
Официант: Пожалуйста. Приятного аппетита!
Игорь: Можно счет?
Официант: Конечно! Будете платить вместе или отдельно?
Игорь: Вместе, пожалуйста.
Официант: Наличными или картой?
Игорь: Наличными.
Официант: Все вместе 800 рублей.
Игорь: Пожалуйста, сдачи не надо.
Официант: Спасибо, хорошего дня!
Алина: До свидания!
Игорь: Тебе понравилась еда?
Алина: Да, очень вкусно. Что будем делать дальше?
Игорь: У меня есть идея. Мой лучший друг Димитрий сегодня женится. Свадьба в 20:00 в Москве, и я приглашен. Хочешь пойти со мной?
Алина: Конечно, с удовольствием. Но что мне надеть? Мне нужно красивое платье.
Игорь: А мне нужен элегантный костюм.

TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	Алина: Как тебе это красное платье на витрине?
Игорь: Мне нравится. Примерь его!
Продавец: Чем я могу вам помочь?
Алина: Я хочу примерить красное платье с витрины.
Продавец: Какой у вас размер?
Алина: 36.
Продавец: Хорошо, идите за мной! Примерьте это платье!
Алина: Где я могу его примерить?
Продавец: Примерочные вон там. Платье вам подошло?
Алина: Цвет мне нравится, но платье мне мало. Есть на размер больше?
Продавец: У нас есть один из 38 размера.
Алина: Хорошо, я его примерю.
Алина: Как мне идет это платье?
Игорь: Очень красиво.
Алина: Мне тоже нравится. Сколько оно стоит?
Продавец: 4000 рублей.
Алина: Очень элегантное. Цвет мне подходит, и размер тоже. Я беру его.
Продавец: Вам что-нибудь еще нужно?
Игорь: Да, я ищу костюм. Где находятся костюмы?
Продавец: На втором этаже.
Игорь: Этот костюм стильный, но стоит 10 000 рублей. Это слишком дорого. Может быть, я найду что-то дешевле. О, там скидка. Этот костюм красивый, но мне не подходит, слишком узкий. Простите, есть на размер больше?
Продавец: Примерьте этот костюм!
Игорь: Спасибо. Этот подходит.
Продавец: Вам что-нибудь еще нужно?
Игорь: У вас есть бабочки?
Продавец: Конечно! Вот там. Сегодня на бабочки и галстуки скидка 50%.
Игорь: Ну, к этому костюму я куплю новую бабочку. Какой цвет подойдет?
Продавец: Думаю, эта бабочка идеально подойдет.
Игорь: Беру.
Продавец: Вам что-нибудь еще нужно?
Игорь: Нет, спасибо.
Продавец: До свидания!

TEMA	
GARDA
	Игорь: Мы закончили покупки. Теперь мы можем поехать в Анкару.
Алина: Хорошо.
Игорь: Вокзал прямо здесь. Давайте купим билеты в Москву. Где мы можем купить билеты?
Алина: Мы можем купить билеты в кассе.
Игорь: Здравствуйте, я хотел бы купить два билета в Москву.
Кассир: В один конец?
Игорь: Нет, туда и обратно, пожалуйста.
Кассир: Когда вы хотите ехать?
Игорь: Мы хотим сесть на первый поезд.
Кассир: Первый поезд отправляется через 15 минут.
Игорь: Подходит.
Кассир: Стоимость билетов 1200 рублей. Вы будете платить картой?
Игорь: Нет, я оплачу наличными. Вот.
Кассир: Вот ваши билеты и сдача 300 рублей.
Игорь: Спасибо! Поезд задержится?
Кассир: Нет, он будет вовремя.
Игорь: Спасибо.
Кассир: До свидания!
Объявление: Внимание! Поезд в Москву отправляется!
Алина: Поезд скоро уходит. Пойдем, сядем в поезд.
Игорь: Пойдем, найдем наши места.
Алина: Вот наши места.
Объявление: Следующая станция: Москва.
Игорь: Алина, давай вставай, мы выходим на этой станции. Теперь давай найдем отель. Поехали в центр города.
Алина: Смотри, смотри!
Алина: Этот отель выглядит красиво снаружи.
Игорь: В этом пятизвездочном отеле в центре города, наверное, есть комнаты с прекрасным видом.
Алина: Да, давай зайдем.

TEMA	
OTELDE
	Рецепционист: Здравствуйте, добро пожаловать в отель «Арбат»!
Игорь: Здравствуйте, нам нужно две комнаты.
Рецепционист: Конечно, на сколько ночей?
Игорь: На одну ночь.
Рецепционист: Хорошо. У нас есть свободные комнаты. Вы хотите двухместные?
Игорь: Нет, нам нужны две одноместные комнаты.
Рецепционист: Включен ли завтрак?
Игорь: Да, включен. А в номерах есть интернет?
Рецепционист: Да, в каждом номере есть интернет, ванная комната, туалет, телефон, телевизор, холодильник и кондиционер.
Игорь: Хорошо, мы забронируем эти комнаты.
Рецепционист: Хорошо, могу я взять ваши документы?
Игорь: Конечно, вот.
Рецепционист: Спасибо, пожалуйста, заполните эту форму. Напишите ваше имя, адрес, дату рождения и гражданство.
Игорь: Вот.
Рецепционист: И подпишите здесь!
Игорь: Все готово.
Рецепционист: Как вы хотите оплатить?
Игорь: Я хочу заплатить картой. Вот.
Рецепционист: Оплата принята. Вот ваши ключи. Ваши номера 104 и 105.
Игорь: На каком этаже?
Рецепционист: На первом этаже. Когда выйдете из лифта, сразу направо.
Игорь: Когда завтрак?
Рецепционист: Завтрак с 7:00 до 10:00 в столовой на первом этаже. Вы можете заказать завтрак в номер.
Игорь: Спасибо. Можно еще один вопрос? Какие еще услуги есть в отеле?
Рецепционист: У нас есть ресторан, бар, парикмахерская и бассейн.
Игорь: Отлично. Когда нужно освободить номер?
Рецепционист: До 12:00.
Игорь: Спасибо большое.
Рецепционист: Пожалуйста.
Игорь: Еще раз спасибо.
Рецепционист: Хорошего отдыха. Белбой покажет вам номера.
Игорь: Отлично! До свидания!
Рецепционист: До свидания!
Игорь: Вау, какая классная комната!
Алина: Отличный отель в Москве! Комнаты красивые, чистые, кровати удобные. Местоположение отличное, всего в нескольких метрах от Красной площади.
Игорь: И вид из окна потрясающий.
Алина: Давай немного отдохнем, а потом пойдем гулять по городу.
Игорь: Встретимся в пять?
Алина: Да, да, пойдёт.
Игорь: Хорошо, встречаемся в 17:00 на ресепшн. Увидимся.
Алина: Договорились, до встречи.
Игорь: Пора погулять по городу. Ты готова к прогулке?
Алина: Да, я готова.
Игорь: У нас есть достаточно времени, чтобы увидеть много интересных мест в Москве.

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	Алина: С чего начинается наша экскурсия? Чем знаменита Москва?
Игорь: Я посмотрел в интернете и узнал о туристических местах Москвы. Наш тур начинается с Красной Площади.
Алина: Это же исторический район Москвы, не так ли?
Игорь: Да, так. Ещё одно туристическое место в Москве — это Большой театр. Её построили в средине 19 века.
Алина: Здорово!
Игорь: Но ни одно здание в Москве не знаменито так, как Собор Василия Блаженного. Его построили в 1561 году.
Алина: А какие блюда Москвы самые знаменитые?
Игорь: Самые известные блюда Москвы — это солянка старомосковская, блины и пельмени. Москва — один из самых красивых городов России.
Алина: Полностью с тобой согласна.
Игорь: Солнце садится. Давай поторопимся, чтобы не опоздать на свадьбу. Ты великолепно выглядишь в этом наряде.
Алина: Спасибо, ты тоже очень элегантен в этом костюме.
Игорь: Спасибо! Готова немного повеселиться?
Алина: Да, готова.
Игорь: Тогда пошли!

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	Димитрий: А, Игорь, как приятно видеть тебя здесь! Добро пожаловать.
Игорь: Желаю вам и супруге бесконечного счастья.
Алина: Поздравляю!
Димитрий: Большое спасибо!
Игорь: У нас есть для вас подарок.
Димитрий: О, большое спасибо.
Алина: Игорь, я очень люблю эту песню.
Игорь: Потанцуешь со мной?
Алина: С удовольствием.
Игорь: Чья это песня?
Алина: Это песня Лмитрия Шостаковича «Пусский вальс». Мне очень нравится эта песня.
Игорь: Песня звучит очень красиво. Какую музыку ты любишь слушать?
Алина: От классической до поп-музыки, я люблю слушать всё. А ты? Какой стиль музыки тебе нравится?
Игорь: Обычно рок.
Алина: Какая твоя любимая песня?
Игорь: У меня много любимых песен. Одна из них — «Звезда по имени солнце» Виктора Цоя.
Алина: У Цоя хорошие песни.
Игорь: А я пойду возьму себе напиток. Ты что-то хочешь?
Алина: Мне айран, пожалуйста.
Игорь: Сейчас принесу. Вот, держи!
Алина: Спасибо!
Димитрий: Вам весело?
Игорь: Да, нам очень весело.
Димитрий: Где вы познакомились?
Игорь: Мы учимся в одном университете.
Дмитрий: Как здорово!
Алина: А Вы откуда знаете Игоря?
Дмитрий: Мы друзья с детства. Вместе выросли.
Алина: А как Вы познакомились с женой?
Дмитрий: Мы познакомились через общего друга в 2022 году. Мы вместе уже два года.
Алина: Как здорово!
Дмитрий: Давайте потанцуем.
Алина: Это был действительно незабываемый вечер! Никогда в жизни я так много не танцевала! Эй, Игорь, что с тобой?
Игорь: Мне нехорошо.
Алина: Что случилось? Тебе больно?
Игорь: У меня тошнота.
Алина: Тебе нужно к врачу.
Игорь: Нет, со мной всё в порядке.
Алина: Как это ""всё в порядке""? Пошли, Игорь, поедем в больницу.

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	Секретарь: Чем могу вам помочь?
Игорь: Здравствуйте, меня зовут Игорь Георгиевич. Вот документы!
Секретарь: Пожалуйста, подождите здесь. Мы вас позовём.
Доктор: Игорь Георгиевич, заходите, пожалуйста. На что жалуетесь?
Игорь: Здравствуйте, доктор. Я чувствую себя очень плохо. У меня тошнота и кружится голова.
Доктор: Как давно?
Игорь: Примерно час.
Доктор: Что вы ели или пили?
Игорь: На свадьбе я ел закуски и выпил много алкоголя.
Доктор: Это может быть причиной ваших жалоб. Я хочу провести более детальный осмотр. Пожалуйста, лягте на кушетку и повернитесь ко мне спиной. Глубоко вдохните и выдохните. У вас есть ещё какие-то жалобы?
Игорь: Да, мне немного холодно.
Доктор: Хорошо. Давайте измерим вашу температуру. 37,5 градуса. У вас нет температуры. Пожалуйста, откройте рот. Всё в порядке. Ваше горло не воспалено. Теперь измерим ваше давление. Откройте, пожалуйста, предплечье. 130 на 90. У вас немного повышенное давление. Я также проверю ваши анализы крови. Мне нужно взять у вас кровь. Готово! Прижмите ватный тампон, пожалуйста!
Доктор: По результатам анализа крови у вас, скорее всего, пищевое отравление. Сначала я поставлю вам капельницу. Ещё выпишу вам лекарство. Принимайте его два раза в день в течение недели. Я дам вам больничный на два дня.
Игорь: Понял. Большое спасибо, доктор!
Доктор: Выздоравливайте!
Алина: Тебе лучше, Игорь?
Игорь: Да, мне намного лучше. Но нам нужно найти ближайшую аптеку.
Алина: Подожди минутку, я посмотрю в интернете. Всё, нашла. Самая близкая аптека открыта, она примерно в 500 метрах отсюда.
Игорь: Мы можем дойти пешком.
Алина: Пойдём.
Игорь: Наконец-то мы добрались до аптеки.

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	Фармацевт: Чем могу вам помочь?
Игорь: Доктор выписал мне рецепт. Вот рецепт.
Фармацевт: Сейчас посмотрю, есть ли у нас это лекарство.
Игорь: Спасибо, я подожду.
Фармацевт: Да, оно у нас есть.
Игорь: Как принимать это лекарство?
Фармацевт: Сейчас посмотрю инструкцию. Принимайте лекарство два раза в день. Одну таблетку утром и одну вечером. Пейте эти таблетки в течение недели.
Игорь: До или после еды?
Фармацевт: Натощак.
Игорь: А есть ли у лекарства побочные эффекты?
Фармацевт: Нет, но не принимайте его больше одной недели.
Игорь: Понял. А сколько таблеток в упаковке?
Фармацевт: В упаковке 25 таблеток. Вам нужно что-то ещё?
Игорь: Нет, спасибо. Сколько стоит одна упаковка?
Фармацевт: 120 рублей за упаковку.
Игорь: Хорошо, я беру. Вот моя кредитная карта.
Фармацевт: Введите пароль, пожалуйста! Спасибо, выздоравливайте.
Игорь: Спасибо. До свидания. Уже утро. Нам нужно вернуться в отель и выписаться.
Клара: Время выписки — 12:00. До этого мы можем зайти в банк и снять деньги.
Игорь: Ты не можешь снять деньги в банкомате?
Клара: К сожалению, нет. Банкомат забрал мою карту.
Игорь: Тогда нам нужно срочно идти в банк.

TEMA	
BANKADA
	Сотрудник банка: Чем могу вам помочь?
Алина: Меня зовут Алина Позднякова. Банкомат забрал мою банковскую карту.
Сотрудник банка: Вы несколько раз ввели неправильный пароль?
Алина: Да, я ввела неправильный пароль три раза.
Сотрудник банка: Понятно. Банкомат забрал вашу карту из соображений безопасности. Вам нужно заблокировать карту и заказать новую.
Алина: Хорошо. Как подать заявку на новую карту и сколько это стоит?
Сотрудник банка: Блокировка карты бесплатная, но новая карта стоит 100 рублей.
Алина: Хорошо.
Сотрудник банка: У вас есть удостоверение личности? Мне нужно ваше имя, адрес и дата рождения.
Алина: Да, вот мой документ.
Сотрудник банка: Пожалуйста, заполните и подпишите эту форму.
Алина: Хорошо.
Сотрудник банка: Мы отправим карту на ваш адрес.
Алина: Когда она придёт?
Сотрудник банка: Примерно через две недели.
Алина: Большое спасибо. У меня есть ещё одна просьба: я хочу снять деньги со своего счёта.
Сотрудник банка: Конечно. Какой у вас номер клиента?
Алина: 123456.
Сотрудник банка: Какую сумму вы хотите снять?
Алина: Я хочу снять 2000 фунтов.
Сотрудник банка: Хорошо. Вот ваши деньги.
Алина: Спасибо. Могу ли я узнать мой баланс?
Сотрудник банка: Конечно! Ваш текущий баланс — 1000 рублей.
Алина: Большое спасибо.
Сотрудник банка: У вас есть ещё вопросы?
Алина: Нет, спасибо.
Алина: Мы сделали все дела, теперь пора выписаться из отеля. Поезд в Москву отправляется в 12:00.
Игорь: Мы прекрасно провели время. Теперь можно возвращаться домой.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 EK-8 Diyaloglar ile Arapça Tematik Diyalog İçerikleri 
 

TEMA	
YOLDA
	١. على الطريق 
مريم: عفوا، أنا جديدة في هذه المدينة. كيف يمكنني الذهاب إلى جامعة الأزهر؟ 
رياض: تقع جامعة الأزهر في منطقة نصر. 
مريم: هل هي بعيدة عن هنا؟ 
رياض: لا هي قريبة. تستطيعين المشي. ستستغرق حوالي ١٥ دقيقة. 
مريم: إذًا، كيف سأصل إلى منطقة نصر؟ 
رياض: الأمر بسيط جدًا. من هذا الشارع، اتجهي مباشرة حتى الدوار. انعطفي يسارًا عند الدوار ثم اتجهي حوالي ٥٠٠ متر إلى شارع الهرم. اعبري الشارع واتجهي يمينًا فورًا إلى شارع المخيم. تقدمي للأمام مباشرة وسترين حديقة على اليمين. انعطفي يمينًا عند الأضواء. اعبري شارع الزمالك وانعطفي يسارًا عند الدوار إلى شارع المنيب. جامعة الأزهر هناك. 
مريم: حسنًا. للأمام مباشرة، يسارًا عند الدوار، مستقيمًا حتى شارع الهرم، ثم يسارًا. أنعطف يمينًا عند الأضواء و... لم أفهم. 
رياض: إذًا لنذهب إلى الجامعة معًا، تعالي معي! 
مريم: هل حضرتكَ طالب؟ 
رياض: نعم. 
مريم: في أي قسم تدرس حضرتكَ؟ 
رياض: في قسم اللغة العربية وآدابها. 
مريم: اليوم أول يوم لي في الجامعة. أدرس في قسم تدريس اللغة العربية. 
رياض: جيد، هل تعرفين حرم جامعة الأزهر؟ 
مريم: لا أعرف. كيف سأذهب إلى كليتي؟ 
رياض: إنها على مسافة قريبة. هذا الطريق يؤدي إلى الحرم الجامعي. قسم تدريس اللغة التركية بجامعة الأزهر، في كلية العلوم والآداب، مبنى C12. 
مريم: شكرا جزيلا على مساعدتك. 
رياض: العفو! ما اسم حضرتكِ؟ 
مريم: اسمي مريم. وأنتَ ما اسم حضرتكَ؟ 
رياض: اسم جميل. وأنا اسمي رياض. تشرفتُ بمعرفتكِ. بالمناسبة، يمكنكِ أن تتكلمي معي بصيغة أنتَ. 
مريم: حسنا، من أين أنتَ يا رياض؟ 
رياض: أنا من هنا، وماذا عنكِ؟ 
مريم: أنا من الإسكندرية. أين تسكن هنا؟ 
رياض: أسكن في شقة بشارع المنيب. وأنتِ؟ 
مريم: وأنا أقيم في شقة في شارع السادات. 
رياض: كم عمركِ؟ 
مريم: عمري ١٨ عاما. وأنتَ؟ 
رياض: وأنا عمري ٢٠ عاما. لقد وصلنا إلى كليتكِ! 
مريم: ما رأيكَ في تناول القهوة بعد الدرس؟ 
رياض: نعم، سيكون أمرا جميلا. سأتصل بكِ بعد الدرس. ما رقم هاتفكِ؟ 
مريم: إذا اتفقنا. رقم هاتفي هو ٠١٠٩٠٨٨٥٣٥٢ 
رياض: سأتصل بكِ، إلى اللقاء! 
مريم: إلى اللقاء. 

TEMA	
TELEFONDA
	ليلى: ألو.
رياض: مرحبا مريم.
ليلى: عفوا، من يتكلم؟
رياض: أنا رياض، ومن حضرت ِك؟
ليلى: أنا ليلى نصر.
رياض: أليس هذا الرقم 55 55 225 961؟
ليلى: لا، هذا الرقم 45 55 225 .961
رياض: آه، أعذريني! لقد اتصلت بالرقم الخطأ.
ليلى: ليست مشكلة، مع السالمة!
يتصل رياض بالرقم الصحيح:
مريم: ألو!
رياض: مريم؟
مريم: نعم.
رياض: مرحبا مريم، انا، رياض.
مريم: مرحبا رياض، كيف حال َك؟
رياض: انا بخير، شكرا. وأنت كيف حالك؟
مريم: أنا أيضا بخير.
رياض: هل لديك وقت اليوم؟
مريم: نعم، لدي.
رياض: هل تأتين معي إلى المقهى في الحرم الجامعي؟
مريم: هذا سيكون رائع. في أي ساعة؟
رياض: في الواحدة والنصف. هل يناسبك؟
مريم: للألسف، عندي فصل في الساعة الواحدة والنصف. ينتهي فصلي عند الثالثة. هل تناسبك الساعة الثالثة؟
رياض: نعم تناسبني. أراك في الساعة الثالثة إذن.
مريم: إلى اللقاء! 

TEMA	
ÜNİVERSİTEDE
	مريم: مرحبا بالجميع!
رياض: مرحبا! كيف حالك؟
مريم: أنا بخير، شكرا. وأنت؟
رياض: وأنا بخير أيضًا. هذه صديقتي مريم. هي من الإسكندرية. 
ليلى: مرحبا مريم. أنا ليلى. أنا من القاهرة.
محمد: مرحبا مريم. أنا محمد. أنا من الصعيد.
مريم: تشرفت بمعرفتكما.
محمد: كم عمرك يا مريم؟
مريم: عمري ثمانية عشر عامًا. وأنت؟
محمد: تسعة عشر. لكن ليلى تبلغ من العمر عشرين عامًا.
رياض: أنا أكبر منكم. لقد ولدت في 20 ديسمبر 2002. عمري اثنين وعشرين سنة.
مريم: إذن برجك هو القوس.
رياض: بالضبط. إذن ما هو برجك؟
مريم: برجي هو برج الحمل. لقد ولدت في أبريل.
ليلى: جميل، أنا برج الحوت. لقد ولدت في مارس. حسنا في أي قسم تدرسين يا مريم؟
مريم: أنا أدرس في قسم تدريس اللغة العربية. لقد قمت بالتسجيل للتو. وأنت؟
ليلى: أنا أدرس في كلية الطب.
مريم: في أي فصل دراسي أنت؟
ليلى: أنا في الفصل الثاني. وأنت؟
محمد: وأنا أيضا في الفصل الدراسي الثاني من قسم علم اللغة.
مريم: أنا في الفصل الدراسي الأول.
محمد: ما رأيك في قسم تدريس اللغة العربية في القاهرة يا مريم؟
مريم: زملائي في الصف جيدون، وجو الصف جميل جدًا ... من الجميل أن أدرس هنا.
رياض : يا إلهي لقد تأخرت كثيرا . لا تؤاخذوني، لدي حصة في الساعة 14.00.
مريم: مع السلامة!
رياض: إلى اللقاء!

TEMA	
SÜPERMARKETTE
	مريم: عفوا، أين البطاطس؟ 
البائع: هناك، في الأمام، في قسم الخضروات. 
مريم: نظرت هناك ولكن لم أتمكن من رؤيتها.
البائع: هي في الأمام على اليمين، عند المدخل مباشرة. 
مريم: شكرًا لك، لأنظر مرة أخرى. 
مريم:آه رياض، يا لها من صدفة رائعة!
رياض: نعم.
مريم: لا بد لي من التسوق بشكل عاجل. فثلاجتي فارغة. 
رياض: أريد شراء الخضار والفواكه الطازجة. هل هناك أشياء ضمن التخفيضات الآن؟ 
مريم: التفاح عليه تخفيضات. تفاح الدقهلية. الكيلو بخمسة جنيه. 
رياض: جميل، كيلو واحد من فضلك! هل لديك السبانخ؟
مريم: إنها هناك بجانب البصل.
رياض: شكرا جزيلا لك!
مريم: إذًا، هل اشتريت كل ما تريد؟
رياض: أحتاج إلى لتر حليب وعلبة كولا وزجاجة ماء. 
مريم: إنها في قسم المشروبات.
رياض: شكرا لك.
مريم: هل كل شيء تمام؟ 
رياض: نعم، شكرا لك، هذا كله. هل أنت بحاجة لشيء؟ 
مريم: هممم. أنا بحاجة لماذا؟ لحظة، لألقي نظرة على قائمة التسوق الخاصة بي. أنا بحاجة إلى كيلو أرز، وحفنة من البقدونس، و250 جرامًا من الجبن، و100 جرام من المرتديلا، وجرة من العسل. 
رياض: أي نوع من المرتديلا تفضلين؟ 
مريم: مرتديلا الديك الرومي. 
رياض: المرتديلا بجانب منتجات اللحوم، والأرز بجانب الحبوب، والجبن في قسم الجبن، والبقدونس بجانب الفواكه والخضروات. أنظري. العسل موجود في قسم التخفيضات. هل تحتاجين إلى أي شيء آخر؟
مريم: لا، هذا كل شيء. الآن يمكننا الذهاب إلى الخزنة. نحن محظوظون، لا يوجد طابور طويل عند الخزنة. 
البائع: هل تريدين كيسا؟
مريم: لا، لدي حقيبة.
البائع: الكل 50بخمسين جنيه. 
مريم: تفضل. أريد أن أدفع عن طريق البطاقة. 
البائع: هل بطاقتك غير تلامسية؟
مريم: نعم.
البائع: أمسك بطاقتك مقابل جهاز نقطة البيع. 
البائع: شكرا جزيلا لك. يوما سعيدا. 
رياض: يوما سعيدا!
البائع: يوما سعيدا، هل تريد كيسا؟ 
رياض : نعم، لو سمحت. 
البائع: 45.56 جنيه من فضلك. هل تريد الدفع بالبطاقة؟
رياض: أريد أن أدفع نقدًا. تفضل!
البائع: وهذا الباقي هو 4.44 جنيه.
رياض: شكرا لك.
مريم: أكياس التسوق ثقيلة جدًا. 
رياض: سأساعدك حتى المنزل. أعطني الأكياس!
مريم: هل أنت متأكد؟
رياض: نعم.
مريم: شكرا جزيلا لمساعدتك.
 
TEMA	
EVDE
	مريم: أهلا وسهلا. 
رياض: شكرا على الدعوة. أين يمكنني تعليق معطفي؟
مريم: في الخزانة هنا. 
رياض: شكرا لك.
مريم: من فضلك اجلس واسترح.
رياض: شكرا لك.
مريم: هل تريد أن تشرب شيئا؟
رياض: قهوة من فضلك. 
مريم: مع الحليب أو بدونه؟
رياض: بدون حليب.
مريم: حسنًا، سأحضرها على الفور. هذه قهوتك بدون حليب، وهذه قهوتي بالحليب.
رياض: اه شكرا. 
مريم: العفو!
رياض: كم متر مربع الشقة؟
مريم: 100 متر مربع. 
رياض: ولكن أليست كبيرة جدابالنسبة لك؟ كم عدد الغرف فيها؟ 
مريم: لا، هذه الشقة مثالية بالنسبة لي. جميلة جدا وهادئة. تحتوي على غرفة معيشة وغرفتي نوم ومطبخ. كما تحتوي على حمام وشرفة. 
رياض: واو عظيم! كيف هو الموقع؟
مريم: مركزي جدًا. توجد محطة للحافلات ومركز للتسوق في مكان قريب. 
رياض: هل هي شقتك الخاصة؟ 
مريم: لا، أنا مستأجرة. 
رياض: هل هي غالية؟ كم تدفعين شهريا؟
مريم: لا، إنها رخيصة. الإيجار ثمانمائة جنيه، والرسوم الشهرية حوالي مئتين جنيه. 
رياض: إنها ليست باهظة الثمن والشقة جميلة. إنها في الطابق الرابع ولكن لا يوجد مصعد. لهذا السبب فهي رخيصة جدًا. هل يمكنني التجول في المنزل؟ 
مريم: طبعا!
مريم: هذا هو الممر. لسوء الحظ إنه ضيق جدًا. هناك غرفتان على اليمين هنا. 
رياض: الغرف مشرقة جدًا.
مريم: نعم، هذا صحيح. مقابل هذه توجد غرفة معيشة كبيرة.
رياض: غرفة المعيشة بها شرفة. 
مريم: نعم، لكنها ليست كبيرة.
رياض: هل هذا هو المطبخ؟
مريم: نعم، المطبخ عملي ويطل على النهر.
رياض: هل هذا هو الحمام؟
مريم: نعم، إنه صغير ولكنه مشرق.
رياض: هل يوجد للمنزل مرآب؟
مريم: نعم، كل شقة في هذا المبنى لها مرآب خاص بها. 
رياض: هل يتم تدفئة الشقة بشكل جيد؟
مريم: نعم، هذا المنزل مواجه للجنوب ومعزول جيدًا.
رياض: الشقة جميلة جداً. هناك كل ما هو ضروري.
مريم: بالضبط، أنا سعيدة جدًا بهذه الشقة. 
رياض: الآن حان وقت الأكل. هل أنت جائعة؟ أعرف مطعمًا جيدًا قريبًا. ما رأيك في تناول العشاء معاً؟ 
مريم: أنا جائعة مثل الذئب. معدتي تذمر. 
رياض: هيا إذن، لنذهب لتناول العشاء!
 
TEMA	
RESTORANDA
	رياض: وأخيرا وصلنا. هيا لندخل.
النادل: يوما سعيدا، مرحبا بكما في مطعمنا. هل لديكما حجز؟ 
رياض: لا للأسف. هل عندك طاولة فارغة لشخصين؟ 
النادل: نعم عندنا، لا مشكلة. أين تريدان الجلوس؟ 
رياض: عند النافذة من فضلك. 
النادل: للأسف، الطاولات بجوار النافذة محجوزة. 
مريم: حسنًا، أي طاولة موجودة عند المدخل مناسبة لنا. 
النادل: لحظة! نعم، الطاولة عند المدخل لا تزال فارغة. تعالان من فضلكما! هنا على الزاوية بالضبط. هل هذه الطاولة مناسبة؟ 
رياض: طيب، هي مناسبة. هل يمكننا الحصول على القائمة؟
النادل: بالطبع.  هل قررتما ماذا تريدان؟
رياض: نعم، لي حساء العدس والفلافل.
النادل: على رأسي. وماذا عنك؟ أوصيك بطبق اليوم الكشري.
مريم: إذًا، سأتناول حساء الدجاج والكشري. 
النادل: حسنا، ماذا تريدان أن تشربان؟
مريم: كوب من اللبن من فضلك!
رياض: وشاي لي أيضا. 
النادل: هل تريدان حلوى؟
مريم: نعم، أريد البسبوسة.
رياض: وأنا بلح الشام من فضلك.
النادل: قادم على الفور. هل لديكما أي طلبات أخرى؟  
مريم: لا، شكرًا.
النادل: تفضلا طعامكما. بالصحة والعافية! 
رياض: شكرا لك.
النادل: هل هناك أي شيء ناقص؟
مريم: هل يمكنك أن تحضر لي منديلًا آخر؟
رياض: أريد المزيد من الخبز.
النادل: بالطبع! سأحضرهما على الفور. 
مريم: شكرا.
النادل: العفو. بالصحة والعافية!
رياض: الحساب من فضك!
النادل: بالطبع! هل تريدان الدفع معًا أو بشكل منفصل؟
رياض: معاً من فضلك. 
النادل: بالطبع! هل ستدفعان عن طريق البطاقة؟
رياض: لا، سوف ندفع نقدًا. 
النادل: جميعها تكلف ثمانين جنيه.
رياض: تفضل، احتفظ بالباقي.
النادل: شكرا وأتمنى لكما يوما سعيدا. 
مريم: وداعا. 
رياض: هل أعجبك الطعام ؟ 
مريم: نعم، كان الطعام لذيذًا جدا. إذا ماذا نفعل الآن؟ 
رياض: في الواقع، لدي فكرة جيدة. صديقي المفضل أحمد سيتزوج اليوم. حفل الزفاف في الأقصر الساعة الثامنة مساء وأنا مدعو أيضًا. ما رأيك في الذهاب معي إلى حفل الزفاف؟ 
مريم: بالطبع، سأأتي بكل سرور. ولكن ماذا سأرتدي في حفل الزفاف؟ أحتاج إلى فستان جميل. 
رياض: وأنا أيضا أحتاج إلى بدلة أنيقة.
 
TEMA	
MAĞAZADA
	مريم: ما رأيك في الفستان الأحمر الموجةد على نافذة العرض؟
رياض: أعجبني. هيا جربيه!
الموظفة: كيف يمكنني مساعدتك؟
مريم: أريد تجربة الفستان الأحمر الموجود على نافذة العرض.
الموظفة: ما مقاسك؟
مريم: مقاسي 36. 
الموظفة: حسنًا، تعالي معي! جربي هذا الفستان!
مريم: أين يمكنني تجربته؟
الموظفة: كبائن القياس هناك. هل أعجبك الفستان؟
مريم: اللون جميل. لكن هذا لم يناسب مقاسي. هل عندك مقاس أكبر؟
الموظفة: يوجد مقاس واحد من 38.
مريم: حسنًا، لأجربه.
مريم: هل لاق علي الفستان؟
رياض: إنه لائق عليك جدا. 
مريم: أنا أيضا أعجبني جدا. كم سعره؟
الموظفة: سعره أربعمائة جنيه. 
مريم: أنيق جدًا. أعجبني لونه. إنه يناسبني تماما. سأشتريه.
الموظفة: هل تحتاجان إلى أي شيء آخر؟
رياض: نعم، أبحث عن بدلة. أين البدلات؟ 
الموظفة: في الطابق الثاني. 
رياض: هذه البدلة أنيقة ولكن سعرها ألف جنيه، غالية جدا. ربما يمكنني العثور على شيء أرخص. آه، هناك خصومات. هذه البدلة جميلة. لكنها لا تناسبني، فهي ضيقة جدًا. عذرًا، هل يوجد مقاس أكبر لهذه البدلة؟
الموظفة: جرب هذه البدلة هنا! 
رياض: شكرا. هذه جيدة. 
البائع: هل تحتاج إلى أي شيء آخر؟
رياض: هل عندك بابيون ؟
البائع: طبعا! هناك. يوجد اليوم خصم بنسبة خمسين بالمائة على البابيون وربطات العنق. 
رياض: حسنًا، لأشتري ربطة بابيون جديدة لهذه البدلة. ما اللون الذي يتناسب معها؟ 
البائع: أعتقد أن البابيون هذه مناسبة تمامًا. 
رياض: سأشتريها. 
البائع: هل هناك أي شيء آخر تبحث عنه؟
علي : لا شكرا . 
البائع: إلى اللقاء!

TEMA	
GARDA
	رياض: لقد قمنا بالتسوق. الآن يمكننا الذهاب إلى الأقصر.
مريم: حسنًا.
رياض: محطة القطار هناك. الآن لنشتري تذاكرنا إلى الأقصر. ولكن أين يمكننا شراء التذاكر؟
مريم: يمكننا شراءها من شباك التذاكر. 
رياض: يوما سعيدا، أريد شراء تذكرتين إلى الأقصر. 
الموظف: طريق واحد؟
رياض: ذهابًا وإيابًا من فضلك.
الموظف: متى تريد السفر؟ 
رياض: نريد أن نستقل القطار الأول. 
الموظف: أول قطار سيغادر بعد خمس عشرة دقيقة. 
رياض: هذا يناسبنا.
الموظف: السعر مائة وعشرون جنيه. هل ستدفع عن طريق البطاقة؟ 
رياض: لا، سأدفع نقدًا. تفضل. 
الموظف: هذه تذكرتك والباقي ثمانين جنيه. 
رياض: شكرا لك! هل سيتأخر القطار؟
الموظف: لا، سيأتي في الوقت المحدد.
رياض: شكرا لك.
الموظف: وداعا!
إنذار: انتبهوا، انتبهوا! قطار الأقصر يغادر!
مريم: القطار سيغادر قريبا. هيا لنركب القطار. 
رياض: فلنذهب ونبحث عن أماكننا. 
مريم: هذه مقاعدنا. 
إنذار: المحطة التالية: محطة قطار الأقصر. 
رياض: مريم، قومي، لننزل هنا. الآن لنجد الفندق المناسب. تعالي لنذهب إلى المركز. 
مريم: آه، انظر!
مريم: يبدو هذا الفندق جميل جدا من الخارج.
رياض: يقع هذا الفندق ذو الخمس نجوم في وسط الأقصر، وأنا متأكد من أنه يحتوي على غرف تتمتع بإطلالات جميلة للغاية. 
مريم: نعم، هيا لندخل.

TEMA	
OTELDE
	موظف الاستقبال: يوما سعيدا، أهلا وسهلا بكم في فندق الأقصر! 
رياض: يوما سعيدا، نريد غرفتين.
موظف الاستقبال: بالتأكيد، كم ليلة ستقضيان هنا؟
رياض: ليلة واحدة فقط.
موظف الاستقبال: حسنًا. لدينا غرفة. هل تريدان غرفة مزدوجة؟
رياض: لا، نريد غرفتين فرديتين.
موظف الاستقبال: هل تتضمن الإفطار؟ 
رياض: نعم متضمنة. هل يوجد إنترنت في الغرف؟
موظف الاستقبال: نعم، جميع الغرف بها إنترنت وحمام ومرحاض وهاتف وتلفزيون وثلاجة وتكييف. 
رياض: حسنًا، نحن سنحجز الغرف.
موظف الاستقبال: حسنًا، هل يمكنني الحصول على هويتك؟
رياض: أكيد تفضل . 
موظف الاستقبال: شكرا لك، يرجى ملء هذا النموذج. من فضلك أكتب اسمك وعنوانك وتاريخ ميلادك وجنسيتك.
رياض: تفضل! 
موظف الاستقبال: وقم بالتوقيع هنا!
رياض: حسنا.
موظف الاستقبال: كيف تريد أن تدفع؟
رياض: أريد الدفع عن طريق بطاقة الائتمان. تفضل.
موظف الاستقبال: تم استلام المبلغ. المفاتيح الخاصة بكما هنا. أرقام غرفتكما هي 104 و 105. 
رياض: في أي طابق؟ 
موظف الاستقبال: في الطابق الأول. إنها على اليمين مباشرة عندما تنزل من المصعد.  
رياض: ومتى الفطور ؟
موظف الاستقبال: الفطور في صالة الطعام من الساعة السابعة إلى الساعة العاشرة. وصالة الطعام في الطابق الأرضي. كما يمكنك طلب وجبة الفطورإلى الغرفة.
رياض: شكرا. هل يمكنني أن أسأل شيئا آخر؟ ما هي الخدمات الأخرى المتوفرة في الفندق؟ 
موظف الاستقبال: لدينا مطعم وبار وصالون لتصفيف الشعر وحمام سباحة لضيوفنا. 
رياض: جيد جداً. متى وقت الخروج من الغرف؟
موظف الاستقبال: الساعة الثانية عشر.
رياض: شكرا جزيلا لك. 
موظف الاستقبال: على الرحب والسعة. 
رياض: شكرا لك مرة أخرى. 
موظف الاستقبال: أتمنى لك راحة جيدة. سيأخذكما خادم الفندق إلى الغرف.
رياض: جيد! إلى اللقاء!
موظف الاستقبال: مع السلامة!
رياض: واو، يا لها من غرفة جميلة!
مريم: فندق ممتاز في الأقصر! الغرف لطيفة للغاية ونظيفة والأسرة مريحة. الموقع جيد، على بعد أمتار قليلة من وادي الملوك.
رياض: كما أن المنظر من الغرفة رائع. 
مريم: لنرتاح قليلاً أولاً، ثم نتجول في المدينة معًا. 
رياض: نلتقي في الساعة الخامسة؟
مريم: نعم، نعم، مناسب لي.
رياض: جيد، نلتقي في صالة الاستقبال الساعة الخامسة. أراك لاحقًا. 
مريم: اتفقنا، إلى اللقاء.
رياض: حان الوقت لاستكشاف المدينة. هل أنت مستعدة للرحلة؟ 
مريم: نعم نعم أنا مستعدة.
رياض: لدينا ما يكفي من الوقت لرؤية العديد من الأماكن في الأقصر.

TEMA	
ŞEHİRDE
	مريم: من أين تبدأ جولتنا؟ بماذا تشتهر الأقصر؟
رياض: بحثت في الإنترنت وتعرفت على الأماكن السياحية في الأقصر. تبدأ جولتنا في المدينة من معبد الكرنك.
مريم: أليس المكان التاريخي في الأقصر؟
رياض: بالضبط. المكان السياحي الآخر في الأقصر هو وادي الملوك. تم إنشاؤه عام 1539 قبل الميلاد.
مريم: عظيم!
رياض: لكن لا يوجد مكان في الأقصر مشهور مثل معبد الأقصر تم بناؤه في عام 1400 قبل الميلاد. 
مريم: إذن ما هي الأكلات المشهورة في الأقصر؟ 
رياض: أشهر أكلات الأقصر هي الكشري والكمونية والمحشي. الأقصر هي واحدة من أجمل المدن في مصر.
مريم: أنا أتفق معك تماما.
رياض: بدأت الشمس بالغروب. هيا لنسرع لكي لا نتأخر على حفل الزفاف. تبدين رائعة في هذا الزي.
مريم: شكرًا لك، وأنت أيضا تبدو أنيقًا جدًا بهذه البدلة. 
رياض: شكرا لك! هل أنت مستعدة لبعض المرح؟
مريم: نعم، أنا مستعدة. 
رياض: هيا لنذهب!

TEMA	
DÜĞÜNDE
	أحمد: آه، رياض، كم هو جميل رؤيتك هنا! أهلا بكما. 
رياض: أتمنى لك ولزوجتك سعادة إلى الأبد. 
مريم: مبروك!
أحمد: شكرا جزيلا لك! 
رياض: عندنا لكما هدية. 
أحمد: آه شكرا جزيلا . 
مريم: رياض، أحب هذه الأغنية كثيراً.
رياض: ما رأيك في الرقص معي؟
مريم: بكل سرور.
رياض: لمن هذه الاغنية ؟
مريم: هذه الأغنية هي أغنية تامر حسني ""يا نور عيني"". أنا حقا أحب هذه الأغنية كثيرا. 
رياض: الأغنية تبدو جميلة جداً. ما نوع الموسيقى التي تحبين الاستماع إليها؟
مريم: أحب الاستماع إلى كل شيء من الموسيقى الكلاسيكية إلى موسيقى البوب. وماذا عنك؟ ما نوع الموسيقى التي تستمع إليها؟
رياض: أستمع عادة إلى موسيقى الروك. 
مريم: ما هي أغنيتك المفضلة؟
رياض: هناك الكثير. واحدة منها هي أغنية ""يا رايح"" لرشيد طه.
مريم: أغاني رشيد طه جميلة. 
رياض: حسنا سأحضر لنفسي مشروبا. هل أنت أبضا ترغبين في ذلك؟ 
مريم: أعطني كوبًا من اللبن من فضلك.
رياض: سأحضره على الفور. تفضلي!
مريم: شكرا!
أحمد: هل تستمتعان؟
رياض: نعم، لقد استمتعنا كثيرًا.
أحمد: أين تعرفتما على بعضكما؟
رياض: ندرس في نفس الجامعة. 
أحمد: كم هو جميل!
مريم: حسنا، أنتما أين تعرفتما على بعض؟
أحمد: نحن أصدقاء الطفولة. لقد نشأنا معا.
مريم: كيف تعرفت على زوجتك؟
أحمد: التقينا من خلال صديق مشترك في عام 2022. نحن معا لمدة عامين. 
مريم: ما أجملها!
أحمد: هيا، لنرقص.
مريم: لقد قضينا أمسية لا تُنسى حقًا! لم أرقص هكذا أبدا في حياتي! يا رياض ما بك؟
رياض: لا أشعر أنني بخير.
مريم: ماذا حدث؟ هل تشعر بألم؟
رياض: أشعر بالغثيان.
مريم: يجب عليك أن تذهب إلى الطبيب.
رياض: لا، أنا بخير.
مريم: كيف تقول أنك بخير؟ هيا يا رياض، لنذهب إلى المستشفى.

TEMA	
HASTANEDE
	السكرتيرة: كيف يمكنني مساعدتك؟
رياض: مرحبًا، اسمي رياض ثابت، وهذه بطاقة هويتي! 
السكرتيرة: من فضلك انتظر هنا. سوف ننادي عليك.
الطبيب: رياض ثابت، تفضل بالدخول. ما هي شكواك؟
رياض: مرحبا دكتور. لا أشعر أنني بخير. أشعر بالغثيان والدوار. 
الطبيب: منذ متى؟
رياض: منذ حوالي ساعة.
الطبيب: ماذا أكلت وشربت؟
رياض: تناولت وجبات خفيفة وشربت الكثير من الكحول في حفل الزفاف.
الطبيب: قد يكون هذا هو سبب شكواك. أريد أن أفحصك بالتفصيل. من فضلك استلق على النقالة وأدر ظهرك نحوي. خذ نفسا عميقا. هل لديك أي شكاوى أخرى؟
رياض: نعم، أشعر بالبرد قليلاً. 
الطبيب: حسنا. دعني أقيس درجة حرارتك. 37.5 درجة. ليس لديك حمى. من فضلك افتح فمك. تبدو جيدة. حلقك ليس أحمر. لنقيس ضغط الدم لديك. افتح ذراعك العلوي. ضغط دمك مرتفع قليلاً 90 من 180. لنفحص قيم دمك أيضا. سوف آخذ منك الدم لإجراء فحص الدم. نعم!  إضغط بقوة على القطن من فضلك!
الطبيب: حسب نتائج فحص الدم، من المرجح أنك مصاب بتسمم غذائي. أولا، سوف نعطيك مصل. كما سأكتب لك دواء أيضا. خذه مرتين في اليوم لمدة أسبوع. سأكتب لك تقريرا لمدة يومين. 
رياض: فهمت، شكرًا جزيلا يا دكتور! 
الطبيب: بالشفاء العاجل!
مريم: هل أنت أفضل الآن يا رياض؟
رياض: نعم، أنا أفضل بكثير. لكننا الآن بحاجة إلى العثور على صيدلية قريبة. 
مريم: لحظة، لألقي نظرة على الإنترنت. حسنا، لقد وجدت أقرب صيدلية. أقرب صيدلية مفتوحة تبعد حوالي 500 متر. 
رياض: يمكننا أن نذهب سيرا على الأقدام.
مريم: هيا لنذهب.
رياض: وأخيراً وصلنا إلى الصيدلية.

TEMA	
ECZANEDE
	الصيدلي: كيف يمكنني مساعدتك؟
رياض: الطبيب كتب لي وصفة طبية. الوصفة هنا. 
الصيدلي: لأرى إذا كان هذا الدواء موجود عندنا.
رياض: شكرا، أنا في الانتظار.
الصيدلي: نعم، موجود. 
رياض: كيف عليك أن أتناول الدواء؟
الصيدلي: لألقي نظرة على تعليمات الاستخدام. تناول الدواء مرتين في اليوم. قرص واحد في الصباح، والثاني في المساء. تناول هذه الأقراص لمدة أسبوع.
رياض: قبل الأكل أم بعده؟
الصيدلي: على الريق. 
رياض: طيب هل الدواء له آثار جانبية؟
الصيدلي: لا، لكن لا تتناوله لأكثر من أسبوع.
رياض: حسنًا. كم عدد الأقراص الموجودة فيه؟
الصيدلي: يوجد 25 في العلبة. هل تحتاج إلى أي شيء آخر؟
رياض: لا شكرا. بكم العلبة الواحدة؟ 
الصيدلي: العلبة بـ 50.90 جنيه.
رياض: حسنا، سأشتريه، تفضل هذه بطاقتي الائتمانية. 
الصيدلي: من فضلك اضغط على كلمة المرور! شكرا لك وبالشفاء العاجل.
رياض: شكرا لك. مع السلامة. لقد حان الصباح. علينا العودة إلى الفندق والخروج. 
مريم: وقت الخروج في الساعة الثانية عشر. على فكرة، يمكننا زيارة أحد البنوك وسحب الأموال.
رياض: ألا يمكنك سحب النقود من ماكينة الصراف الآلي؟
مريم: للأسف. لقد ابتلع جهاز الصراف الآلي بطاقتي.
رياض: إذًا يجب أن نذهب إلى البنك فورًا.

TEMA	
BANKADA
	المصرفي: كيف يمكنني مساعدتك؟
مريم: اسمي مريم سعيد. لقد ابتلع جهاز الصراف الآلي بطاقتي الخاصة بي.
المصرفي: هل قمت بإدخال كلمة المرور الخاصة بك بشكل غير صحيح مرارا وتكرارا؟
مريم: نعم، لقد أدخلت كلمة المرور الخاصة بي بشكل غير صحيح ثلاث مرات.
المصرفي: لقد فهمت. ابتلعت ماكينة الصراف الآلي التابعة للبنك البطاقة المصرفية لأسباب أمنية. يجب عليك إلغاء بطاقتك والتقدم بطلب للحصول على بطاقة جديدة.
مريم: حسنًا. فكيف يمكنني التقدم بطلب للحصول على بطاقة مصرفية جديدة وكم تكلفتها؟
المصرفي: الإلغاء مجاني، ولكن تجديد البطاقة يكلف اثنا عشر جنيه.
مريم: حسنًا. 
المصرفي: هل بطاقة هويتك معك؟ مطلوب معلومات عن الاسم والعنوان وتاريخ الميلاد.
مريم: نعم، إنها هنا. 
المصرفي: املأي هذا النموذج ووقعي عليه من فضلك!
مريم: حسنًا.
المصرفي: سنرسل بطاقتك إلى عنوانك.
مريم: متى ستأتي؟
المصرفي: سيستغرق الأمر حوالي أسبوعين.
مريم: شكرا جزيلا لك. لدي طلب آخر: أريد سحب الأموال من حسابي.
المصرفي: بالتأكيد، ما هو رقم حسابك؟
مريم: 123456.
المصرفي: كم من المال تريدين سحبه؟
مريم: أريد سحب مائتي جنيه.
المصرفي: حسنًا. تفضلي. 
مريم: شكرا. هل يمكنني أيضًا معرفة رصيدي؟
المصرفي: بالطبع! رصيدك الحالي هو ألف جنيه.
مريم: شكرا جزيلا لك. 
المصرفي: هل لديك أي طلب آخر؟
مريم: لا، شكرًا لك. 
مريم: لقد أتممنا كل أعمالنا. والآن حان الوقت لتسجيل الخروج من الفندق. يغادر قطار القاهرة الساعة الثانية عشر. 
رياض: لقد قضينا وقتًا ممتعًا حقًا. يمكننا العودة إلى المنزل الآن.

